Our parents warned us for years about the 'dangers' of the internet while knowing nothing about it, then finally dove in and fell for every. Single. One.

My Mum gave lectures to my kids about using Roblox and the like. 

She won't have any Paypal or Ebay account incase "Someone gets my details "

Fills in every online survey that offers as much as a 50p off  coupon.  Then wonders why she gets phonecalls from random companies. 
If I told them to stop clicking on viruses, they would get defensive and wholeheartedly deny it even with an ad on their phone's lock screen.
When I was around 10, I installed mine craft on my mums laptop with her permission. 6 years later, I still hear how it's minecraft that's slowing her computer down (it's been gone for 4+ years) and every time I look at her computer she's installed some myscrapnook or some other shit 
"everytime you watch youtube it slows the internet down and ruins the computer"

My dad, who has like 50 toolbars and never used incocnito for anything, so his history was full of strange porn and him always clicking on these "hot girl in your area" things 
Your video games are giving us viruses!!!

*Proceeds to install 27 toolbars*
My parents were worried that the internet is “addictive”. Now my job completely revolves around it. To them I must have turned into a drug dealer.
Yeah, I was talking about this yesterday.

We need real parental controls to keep my parents from accessing bad content online.
Because all they said was “the internet is dangerous” because the news said so, they never actually looked into it...and no matter how many times i say “dont click that link” they will always click that link
my mum is travelling to another country next week to meet up with her new boyfriend who she's (according to my observations and calculations) been talking to for about 2-3 weeks over tinder and whatsapp...
Just this morning my mom told me two of her Facebook friends sent her the same message saying Facebook was gonna start charging people, yadda yadda yadda, the same old thing everyone’s seen before. I told her without even looking at it that it was fake spam and to just ignore it. Along with the wall of text about Facebook charging people, they had a pic of Zuckerberg that linked to god knows what site. She goes “But... there’s a picture of Mark Zuckerberg with it. I think it’s real.” 🙄
I know for a fact my parents would spill any and all of our personal and bank details into some website on their tablet without a second thought if they thought it would let them illegally stream scottish football matches on it. And wouldn't see a problem. Meanwhile my mum is still suspicious because I met my gf on Tinder and 'you never know with the internet'
Grandpa(80) got a call from his "ISP", who then asked for all his personal details, passwords etc. WHICH HE GAVE THEM. Luckily the bank was on the ball and got on to him at the first weird transaction. 

He shut down the computer for the next six months. 
Do you know who gives money to Nigerian princes? Middle aged divorced women with adult children that live too far away to have regular contact with.
Me, reformatting our PC for the 3rd or 4th time, circa 2002: "Why did you click on the ad? Haven't I told you *so many times* not to click on any ads?"

My mom: "Well, it said there are five secrets to having a flat stomach! I want to have a flat stomach!"
Legit.. i remember being in a typing class in grade 5. Learning "home row" and we finally got the internet. 

Rule 1 - never trust anything you see on the internet.

2018 - google is considered fact checking... well played 
Ironic, they could save everyone from fake news, but not themselves
The amount of stupid shit I see my grandparents doing online or over the phone scares me. I know they don’t understand it but goddamn it’s frustrating
And when you hear about people who pay strangers on the internet because they said they love them and need the money to solve some problems before they meet, it’s usually the women around 50s that give out the money and then call for help that they have been defrauded.
I literally respect how they manage that. Back when I was doing IT support I regularly set up a sandbox VM and intentionally try to get it infected with whatever is out there. Searching for free porn, free screen saver, watch full movie online, click on every shady ads I can find and a lot of time I find a lot of free porn and screen savers but are still not infected.
Our parents were afraid of the digital depths they did not know.

We, in our knowledge, swam safely.

The parents, seeing the safety of their children, began to blindly swim our waters.

They knew not of the waves, and the tide, and before long began to founder.

Edit: Obligatory "yay I got gilded"

I've been here for six years and never had gold before lol
At school and on tv they always "give advice" (read: fearmonger) on the dangers of the internet, yet none of them actually know what they truly are, 4chan  managed to find out the location of a quarry in Spain because a licence plate wasnt blured out. It is incredibly easy to find out where someone lives, completely legaly. 
My dad once got an email from a Nigerian prince who claimed he was my dad’s long-lost distant cousin. He was requesting my dad send him money so the prince could in turn send my dad back $1 million.

Apparently, my mom had a bad gut feeling about it and told me about the email. This was in 2004, btw, and I was a young teen at the time. I told my dad that it sounded like a scam.

Thankfully, he listened to me and didn’t send money. He realized in hindsight that the email didn’t make sense. Why would the guy need a few thousand dollars in order to give us $1 million?

Obviously, now we all know about the scam, but in 2004, it either wasn’t widely known or I just didn’t encounter any discussions on it in my restricted internet usage back then.

I do wonder how my prince of a great uncle is doing out in Nigeria now, though. I hope he is still ruling the wealthy nation.
The only people that ever send me chain messages are people I know over the age of 40, I seem to remember a huge amount of parents panicking in the late 90s/early 00s about kids doing it and now they're all doing it in 2018.
When dad got me my laptop, I could barely convince him that Amazon is a safe place to buy shit from that is used all over the fucking world.   
And PayPal, he'd never use that.
This is my mum to a tee. She forwards me emails from scammers on the reg to ask if it's actually Apple and does she owes 200 dollars 
My mom always asks me to fix her computer, and each time i do i remove all her toolbars. Also every time i fix her computer, i find 27 new toolbars.
Not only that, we have to mop that shit up for them and even point them out how deep in shit they are because they aren't even fucking aware, but you never know if your girlfriend you met on internet, videochatted with every single night could be a serial killer or something...
My mom yesterday called me over, asked me to help her get the photos from her phone to the flash drive she just bought. I told her I couldn't do that because it was a memory card reader and not a flash drive. 
My dad is (and was) a computer engineer. He's almost 60 and he is god damned computer wizard. 
Makes me wonder what will be the new “dangers” we warn our kids about?
We need to make a video for our parents about safety on the internet, but for them to actually listen to us, it needs to be produced poorly, put on a VHS tape, and sold on QVC for 3 easy payments of $49.95.
*Hawt Shingles You Shay?*
Some of the scams people have reported to me just make my draw drop. The last report I took was from a woman who bought €900 worth of iTunes vouchers and gave their numbers to a man on the phone to pay off a non existent debt she owed to a foreign company who had accidentally put too much money on her card in a refund she never asked for.
When i was a kid i tried to tell my mum that princess Diana had died and she told me to stop believing bullshit on the internet and now she shares fake “virgin australia is giving away free flights to everyone who shares this!!!!” links on facebook
Internet went shit after they let the muggles in.
Don't you dare uninstall my WEATHERBUG!!!!! I need my AOL installed to check my EMAIL!!!
Ha, both my parents and my inlaws have fallen for various shit.  Both my dad and FIL have fallen for the 'microsoft call'.  My MIL got a call from my 'son' who was in a car accident and needed money.  At least she called me first.  I have had to remove viruses or reformat computers a few times.  Pretty crazy, but it makes me look like a computer genius...

The worst is the lady down the street from my parents.  She is some kind of high value target.  I am not even sure where it originated from but it has morphed into stalking in just about every phase of her day.  They have gotten thousands(six figures) of dollars from her reportedly.  There is some local involvement as well, they will watch her house.  They harass her with pizza deliveries, towing her car out of her driveway, calling all day and night, tried to install a security system, my parents and other neighbors have gotten calls asking if she is home,  various other things, unless she gives them money.   She is 83 and lives by herself, no children.  Pretty scary.  The police are involved but I don't think they have had any luck helping.  


I once got yelled at for 'changing google' they had changed their logo for a holiday and my stepfather demanded I change it back
OMG who else cried? Like for FREE iANDROID 3
Shit, you're right
I still won't click any adverts because they were 100% all scams when I was growing up on dial up.  No idea how youtube or facebook actually makes money from adverts. 
This thread has made me extremely happy that my dad’s was in IT for 20+ years. The only thing I ever had to show him was that you don’t have to go to google.com then type in your search in chrome. Just search directly from the url bar, as it is a google search bar as well. 
I am so, so happy that my mother is an intelligent, reasonably tech savvy woman. She's turning 60, and both avoids social media (thank god) *and* actually uses the internet for things like internet banking without ever falling for a scam or phishing email (which *holy shit* there's a lot of aimed at older people).

The extent of my help being required for tech matters for her, ever, was setting up a sound bar that I bought her for Christmas and I think that's just because she was lazy...
All through my teenage years my mother scolded me for playing video games while I'm typing this she is playing Candy Crush.

_SMH_
My dad is 60 and he's a network tech so he's the one that helps ME out occationally
It's really annoying. I install a game and my parents say that's what slowing it down when they just open like 30 random tabs and download useless crap.
To be fair, i did install kazaa and limewire effectively giving every computer they bought aids 
I flew across the country to meet a guy I met on the internet. And now we’re married. 
“Don’t believe everything you read on the internet.” 

~believes every propaganda post on FB as fact while dismissing news organizations that have decades of history. 
My mom thinks you have to read the terms and conditions.
Dont you go on this "pirate bay" thing, or you might get a virus! 

-my mother, her computer slowed by 500% from multiple "boosters and antivrus freeware". 
The age old "it's different because it's me" approach to things...
"Do as I say, don't do as I do."
People who think they know the most, in my experience, are usually the most gulable and easily tricked. 
This is funny. Today my mum and I were talking about some issues I have with my wrists and she said "It all started when you were on the computer all the bloody time.. What were you doing on there anyway?"

Thanks mum, for being so concerned that 16 years later you are asking me what I was upto. Today my mother learned about MSN, myspace, and bebo. 

I left out the part where I was talking to strangers.
I can't count how many times my friends' parents got mad at us for installing STEAM games. They would say it's giving us a virus!!! While I would go into chrome and find 50 toolbars. 
Like all my friends on Facebook who love filling out those quizzes. You know, "Your (most likely security question answer) + your (second most likely security question answer) = your Harry Potter/Jedi/Minion/etc. name.
This is why I hate internet scammers so much. Not for me, but because I know their targets are people like my mom. I worry about my mom online the way she worried about me as a child in real life.
It’s /almost/ funny how these people would call in (used to do a tech job for a living ) and doubt who they’re calling.... but would believe they won the lottery in like Thailand or Australia despite never having been there. 

Or how they’d have “viruses” because java or adobe needed to open in a new window but they’ll download any ol program. 

-used to make people erase and reinstall from scratch because they were too stupid to go ahead and listen to simple steps so I made them lose anything and suck it up. I don’t feel bad, it’s what happens when you don’t listen to the real people. 
RemindMe! 2 Minutes Hi 
Oh man, I love this. Slightly related tangent...

For years and years and years and years as I grew up my parents blamed me for their computer being sluggish and slow, having adware, and being hit occasionally with viruses. We're talking that it'd get so bad they'd turn on the computer and it would go instantly into locked up, slow mode from pop ups and just BS. I'd have to fix the shit every time, and I argue with them that it wasn't me. But every time something went wrong with it, it was my fault. Fast-forward: I come of age, get my own computer and move out (not really this quickly or in this order), and it's like the levees fucking broke with their computer. Every time I go visit them, there is something wrong with their computer. They might as well buy a new computer on a monthly basis at this rate, because I can't even handle the shit they get themselves into. Stacks on stack on stacks of those shitty tool bars in their internet browsers.

I won't even get started on my mom's cell phone. She's recently complained to me about it dying to quickly, and it is just loaded and loaded with shitty apps. She doesn't even have a timer for when to turn off the screen. She sets it down and it stays on... 

It gives me a little bit of justice knowing it wasn't actually my fault growing up.
When i was 13-16, I had **constant** fights with my mom for **spending all my time on the computer**. I used to spend over 10 hours in front of the PC, on the internet. 

Hey mom! At least I was being productive and learning to code websites, and not spending all my day playing video games (nothing wrong with that, but 10+ hours of daily gaming ain't healthy yo).

These weren't small arguments... it really affected me, and I even remember crying and (rage induced) throwing stuff on my PC when being criticised for spending too much time on it. Fortunately, it never broke. But... I later decided, maybe my parents are right and I should focus more on a degree. So when I started college, I cut back my time on the internet. BIGGEST REGRET EVER.

Well, guess what mom?! The whole world now spends their time in front of one now, and I could have had a better headstart if you would just let me be! I was a 15-year-old who could make websites at a time when being able to develop a website from scratch was still a "Wow" for most people (~10 years ago).

I love my mom, but I am still fucking salty over it. "Making websites is not a career, get a degree in something useful". FUCK! I had websites with over 10k daily unique visitors. I used to run a forum with 500 active members and posters. Not huge, but if only I would have kept that up.

Now, it's a much much more saturated market than before.
“I don’t want a debit card with a chip, that’s how they get ya!”

Minutes later:

“Hey this African fella needs my help getting his money back and is gonna pay me to help.”

🤦🏻‍♂️
My mum once tried to remember my email address to "win a free ipad" since she didn't have an email address. After a bit she asked me for it, and we had a long talk
Reading these stories about ignorant parents has always made me happy my dad was into computers before I was born and still maintains a better knowledge of most of it than I do. He sold his Commodore 64 before I was born to buy baby stuff, back when that was worth quite a bit. 
I refuse family and friends of friends tech support now.  IT Sys Admin is my career so I get asked a lot.

Thankfully my excuse that I’m too busy works. Also I always hated how they would promise to pay you via money or food or beer but NEVER follow through. That and “ Well you touched my PC that one time 6 years ago, and now it’s running like shit again it’s your fault because I didn’t do anything since you touched it last”


Now I just always tell them some ridiculous number it would cost them to have me do it. It’s always a random amount and may even be different in the same conversation.  It’s an asshole tactic but it works! 
To add to this: Fox news did to their brains what they said video games would do to ours.  
In my defense. I just want to look at porn. The providers keep wanting to give me a virus. 
No matter how obviously fake and shitty it looks, my mom cannot tell a fake ad from a real news story. She’ll (double) click on anything. 

Oh, but she shreds every single piece of junk mail that comes into the house, even if it’s totally benign. 
This is my mom. When I got my first computer, one of her rules was that none of my friends could touch it, because they would break it. She meant physically damage it and in its function. So we never could play games together or look at anything on message boards, etc.

Flash forward to 2010 and I buy my mom her first computer, a laptop. She cracked the screen, the volume buttons on the body no longer work, she has overheated it several times, has managed somehow to delete system files and has infected it several times. I also bought her a Fire tablet last Christmas and the screen is already shattered.

Turns out all that time she was projecting how she would treat technology on my friends.
Shit mom said warned me about growing up:
Games are no good,
Shopping online is no good,
You don't need to always carry your laptop around.

After 3 years of owning an iPad and 1000+ levels of candy crush, shes the result of what she had been warning me about. Not sure addicted herself or extreme method of getting point across. She now has two iPads- one to play candy crush and one to watch her shows. 😓
So reading all of those stories about parents getting scammed, I thought I should bring up my case, a complete opposite.

My dad once decided to actually TROLL BACK a Nigerian prince. 
He (dad) would say stuff like "why don't you take $1000 from the money you wanna give me?" and stuff like that. I don't remember the specifics anymore, but it was neat. 
Dad kept negotiating with the guy like this for a MONTH until the Nigerian realized that my dad doesn't intend to give him any money.

Dad's barely computer literate, btw. But that doesn't mean he can't troll, right?
The thing they always worried about was like creeps finding you in person, which is *such* a tiny danger compared to things like phishing.
I feel lucky in that my Dad is the source of many of my good internet/computer habits, and the he's the one pushing Linux on me when  I have a complaint about Windows. Seems like lots of people here have to suffer with technology illiterate parents
My SO recently removed administrator access from his mom on her own computer. She had installed so much spyware she couldn't be trusted with it anymore.
The scary thing is: is this going to happen to us?

Are we going to be really ignorant and scared of some future technology? To the extent that the generations below us mock us for our stupidity? 


My Dad, who is in his seventies, remembers his dad being annoyed and disbelieving about Sputnik reaching space. 
yaasss
They did?  Funny, mine never touched the intarweb, wouldn't know what to do with it.  He designed systems for nuclear missile subs... using slide rules, protractors, stone knives and bear skins.
I'm guessing the bear skins were to keep the vacuum tubes warm?
I'm the "tech guy" in my house simply because I'm on my computer a lot. I suck at computers but I at the very least know how to do basic system maintenance. 

My dad had spyware on his laptop for god knows how long before I managed to fix it and I still don't have a clue where he picked it up. My mother is just as bad. I found out her Kindle had some pretty nasty malware simply because it tried to attack my computer from it. 

They still have both of these devices.

My younger brother doesn't turn his laptop on for a while. My parents didn't want to pay for antivirus on it, he doesn't install a Windows Update and gets slammed with Ransomware that the update would have prevented that basically bricked it.

I told them I could fix it, they smash it with a hammer and throw it out and refuse to buy him a replacement because he "can't be trusted", despite me explaining that really, it's their fault for not being responsible enough.

And I swear to god if I have to explain to them how to do the very simple task of moving folders to a USB drive again I am going to eat the damn thing.


If i was in your situation, i'd havee 99999 bazillionabytes of usb drives in my digestive system.
Wannacry?
It's wild. I installed Adblock on my moms computer. She made me delete it "cus you never know with the Internet!" Then when she started getting pop ups again she blamed me and said she was getting those ads because I installed iTunes.
I had to repeat to my dad constantly that Dark Souls wasn't a virus that slowed down every single thing in the house. The problem arose when someone was watching netflix and everyone was using the internet at once, but it was my fault nonetheless.
Parents are just older children having babies. When you get to be a parents age you'll see nothing transformative happened to you. You'll see it's almost all be the seat of your pants.

I'd try to hide my lack of life experince by giving people (who you may come to be blamed the exact same by the next generation you create) the benefit of the doubt. 
My mom has 90,000 unread emails on her Mac desktop. She works at home and on the computer with tons of Adobe software and doesn’t know why the computer never loads anything. Can’t imagine the total number of emails on there. She yells that the computer is slow when there’s less than 7 GB left of memory and it was “probably me and my brother”. Yep, for sure

Also it’s 13 years old. 
EVERYONE ON CLUB PENGUIN IS A PEDO, ALL OF THEM, YOU ARE THE ONLY CHILD ON THAT WEBSITE, BELIEVE NOTHING ON THE INTERNET

*cites an article from facebook to prove movies and video games make you violent*
My dad: The only thing people sell on Facebook Marketplace is bikinis and underwear. 
Me: That’s just the algorithm showing you what it knows you’re interested in. You’re a pervert. 
If by "dangers" they meant crippling addiction to the internet, completely overwriting any time I could be spending actually learning stuff, or being productive, then yes, I fell for it hard. Except my parents and grandparents never taught me about the "dangers" of the internet. I was raised by a single mom, so while she was making sure food was on the table, I was mostly raised by the internet. 
I often commend my 74 year old dad for using a PC with Chrome, zero toolbars, and only has ONE anti-virus system.  I rarely have to be his I.T. department. 

He's never been particularly book smart and he suffered a minor stroke several years ago.  Anyone younger than him has no fucking excuse for not being able to use a PC and the internet except willful ignorance.  


Mines 61 and much further behind, your old man has done bloody well there. 
Wow, thats impressive. I’m honestly the only person in my family who knows how to connect an HDMI cable to the DVD player / Sky box
Clicks internet explorer sixty times with thirty toolbars a piece because it wont open. Wonders why the computer is running slowly.
Not all of us are safe about it. My friend is absolute shit at seeing what isn't and is obviously a virus. He will go to the download sites that have the very small skip ad in the top right of the screen and clicks the HUGE FUCKING GREEN GLOWING DOWNLOAD BUTTON that is obviously not the real thing. You would think that the guy being 23 had learned by now with growing up in the internet not to click the big green download button. 
Can't tell you how many times I cleaned up my mother's machine and she would complain that I'd fucked it up somehow, that it was running slower, that she needed.to delete a bunch of photos and such from the hard drive so it would run faster. Tried to explain over and over "That's not how it works..." Finally washed my hands of it all and said, "Do what you want. I'm not helping you with this any more if you're not going to listen to me."

I think I need to walk over to the r/raisedbynarcissists sub for a while...
My parents computer couldn’t open google chrome and they asked me to help so I did but I couldn’t do a thing sense there was 40 tabs open in edge (can’t even make this up) so I close it all down and then deleted any of their unneeded temporary files and everything in the recycling bin and I deleted chrome and downloaded it again and then the c drive broke down and it was my fault because I “broke the computer”



Yeah I totally didn’t just built a new computer from scratch 3 months ago so what do I know?
The biggest scam of all - all the elderly who fell for the TrumpBot Facebook posts. Who were convinced not to trust real news sources. 
Been saying this for awhile, the whole "fake news" thing is 100% planned by them. It's basic psychology that people will believe something that is repeated by a person in power, especially one they're a big supporter of. Having all their followers believe that any news article or even entire stations/companies are fake news removes the threat of losing their support because of a negative story about them. It doesn't hurt either that most people are totally brainwashed and wouldn't stop supporting Trump for anything, I've seen a scary amount of people saying they'd want to see a Trump family theocratic monarchy. 

But I've just gotten so tired of disproving these types of people and the articles they post, I can post mountains of scientific facts and reputable sources disproving their post but they'll believe the YouTube video or blog that has never posted a single accurate story ever.
You honestly believe that private news corporations with everything to gain and nothing to lose by pushing their agenda through exaggerating the facts and distorting the truth will not do so? You're the naive one here.  Ironic that you talk about basic psychology fooling people when you're the one being fooled by those very same corporations in their pushback against the "'fake news' story" that goes against their interests because it exposes them. 
The two concepts aren't mutually exclusive.

It's not inconceivable that *everyone* has an angle...
So when a mainstream news site is "exposed" without a credible source it's true but when Trump/other conservatives or a site that operates without any credible evidence is exposed that's fake news? The bias is getting out of control. I'm just as much not a liberal as I'm not a conservative, but the levels of bullshit between the two are not even comparable, the hypocrisy of the right has gotten out of control. 

Not to mention your post is just another example of whataboutism, one groups misdeeds do not justify those of another. I don't believe anything unless it's verified by multiple sources. But blogs and YouTube videos aren't actual sources to begin with, they don't cite sources or verify their claims, they "report" whatever they want their readers to believe. 

Yes the mainstream media makes plenty of mistakes but that's mostly to do with the nature of the 24hr news cycle and the race to be the first to report rather than knowingly misrepresenting facts. But every organization chooses what to report, being private organizations they have that right to do so. But there's a huge difference between interpreting things differently and just blatantly falsifying information. I find it hilarious that a group that freaks out over a story being reported before all the facts emerge, who also ignores actual scientific facts, has no problem taking a YouTube video or blog without a single cited source as hard facts. 

If you're somebody who actually believes that and then peddles Russian collusion conspiracy theories you're a fucking hypocrite.
Yeah, no. Crap like Pizzagate is 100% bullshit. Russian collusion has about 19 federal prosecutors investigating it.

Crawl back over to T_D or Moscow or wherever you came from.
19 prosecutors investigating it and absolutely no proof to show for it.  You think that just because they were sent to investigate something, it HAS to be legitimate?
The difference is that professional federal law enforcement personnel deems it investigation worthy. This alone should make you think.
Yes, the same people who lied to us about weapons of mass destruction. Sounds like real reputable sources. You’re right, that alone should make you think twice about the unfounded claims they’re making now.
When even people who would publicly lie in support of a government draw a line and get offboard another government of the same party then you know shit's gotta be much much worse this time.
Did you just have a stroke?
Politicians have never told a lie!
It's not that hard to believe. The Cold War was a real thing, and Russia is still a repressive dictatorship, headed for many years now by a former head of the KGB... why would *anything* have changed since the bad old days of spies, saboteurs and exploding cigars?
I don't dispute that Russia has it's own agenda and is no better than America when it comes to interventionism but really whenever you talk about Trump colluding with Russia especially while ignoring anything Hillary Clinton or the Democrats did with them just reeks of whining because you lost an election you were thoroughly expecting to win.

Brexit for example is another one, another attitude that pisses me off is that you people all come across off as incredibly elitist because rather than admitting that people might just not like your politics and disagree with you you have decided that in order to lose the country must have been under the influence of Russia to have voted to leave the EU for example.

It's an incredibly arrogant attitude and I don't fucking care how much I get downvoted for saying it, you're a bunch of elitist pricks that can't take the fact people have different opinions from you, I'm extremely glad you all lost.
I don't think you understand that anti-Trump people are far from monolithic. It may look like a big mass of unthinking, entitled hatred from your perspective, but that is what a defensive mindset does. I believe if Hillary had won but as much evidence of conspiracy with Russia had been found, plenty of Democrats would be happy to take her down. She is not our hero, our god - she's a highly capable politician with ethical flaws, admired by some and despised by others in the party. However none of her unethical shit matters to me now because *Hillary is not the goddamn president*. Also I don't care much about Brexit because that's a British problem and I'm not British. Trump/Russia, *if it turns out to be true*, is as big an American problem as there ever was.
Considering the fact that I got 43 people downvoting me in less than an hour then yes, I think I'm right in viewing it as a mass of unthinking and entitled hatred, because that's what it is.

Oh and yes, if it turns out to be true by all means, be concerned, because it would be an issue. However these investigations have been going on for years and have turned up absolutely nothing. The reason they even got started in the first place wasn't because of any kind of patriotic sense of duty as Trump's opposition claims but it is because they are sore losers and are extremely pissed off he won, partly because they did literally everything they could to rig the elections in their favour which is hilarious.

Also, in regards to Hillary Clinton, it should matter, because she's the alternative being put up even today by people and it pisses me off that again, the people even on this sub acting like they've got some moral justification to go after Trump completely ignore anything Hillary is doing generally.

I'm going to keep repeating it until the day I die, the people who whine about Trump are nothing more than a bunch of elitist losers who think they're better than everybody else and they can't take the fact that they lost.
Is the Earth flat?

Do vaccines cause autism?

Are humans causing climate change?

Im genuinely interested in hearing your opinions. Thanks.
Are you perhaps suggesting that because I don't go along with Russian conspiracy bullshit I must therefore believe in other crap by default?

You guys are desperate.
Well I'm just curious. Do you? 
No and as for climate change, people who declare it is man made are just as clueless as the people who aren't oh and you're not curious, you're blatantly trying to dig for something to paint me with.
I am indeed curious about your opinions. So if I understand right your answer is "no" to all three?
Oh no, it's an ancap.
Voluntaryist.
So you say.
Why?
Because the_donald told him
I'm guessing you forgot the /s
Yeah. It's a real tinfoil hat thing. Who would believe the Candidate's son would say "I love it" to the leak of stolen data by Russian operatives, and then meet those operatives in the Candidate's home office tower. And who would believe the President would write, from his desk on Air Force One, some bullshit story about adoptions to cover for his son.

And who would believe that same President would, hours after firing the head of the FBI, meet with top Russian ~~diplomats~~ spies and say how great it was to get the pressure off of him with Russia.

Ha! Total internet scam stuff, huh?
Damn. My parents never warned anything about going on the Internet. They were more like, get on that shit, it's the future. That's all they knew.
They were busy teaching us to fearing it when they should have been busy teaching themselves to understand it.
My parents know nothing about the internet. They click all the click bait, go to links that their older eyes shouldn't be seeing and fall for all the "take this quiz" links. Thank God for virus cleaners, I'm waiting for their computers to explode one day. 
Not true at all. My father was the very first person I knew who had the internet at his office, back in the early 90s. They had something before Prodigy, but I remember logging into that service around that time when I went to see him at work one day. He died a few years ago, and never fell for anything online. My mom doesn't know as much, but she's smart enough to stay away from scams and phishing activities. 
Both my parents have about 9000 tabs open at a time and don't realize it unless I point it out. The worst part is seeing what kind of porn they watch. Yuck. 
My mom added so many things to her PC that it just refused to work anymore. That was in 2005. She still has the thing because she insists it's still a good PC because her and dad had it custom built in 1995 by a professional PC shop, aka some greasy haired dude that lived in a run down house in a town of 50 people who they trusted because they both grew up in a similarly small town.
I'm late to the party but here goes. 

My dad fell for one of those pop ups that verbally says something like, "your computer is infected with a malicious Trojan, please call this number immediately to have it removed".

Well, he called the number and a middle eastern guy answers the phone. My dad explains why he's calling and follows the man's every step to install a program that allows them to remotely use his computer.

Cut to a day or two later. My dad nonchalantly mentions how he is having someone fix his computer. "But you have a mac" I said, "it's pretty difficult to get a virus on a mac". 

He explains to me that it won't have anymore viruses because, "I paid a guy 100 bucks to instal a program and hes going to remove any viruses" 

After he explained what he had done, I was mortified. I told him that you practically left your whole life in the hands of some random guy, and worse, you paid him.

I called his wife, my step mom, and told her to unplug the computer. We went to his place, and I spent the rest of the day backing up his photos and business information and reinstalling his os
**Protip: Parents** (and people in general) **are not interchangeable.**
The parents who warned their kids about people stealing their haxxors are actually running the botnets that are seeding #fakenews stories that they set up reading some 133t .txts to bitcoin their children's tuition and data consumption.


Your Parents Love You.
Also: If your parents were too stupid to understand computers in the 90's, they're too stupid to now.  

**AlsoProtip: If you're parents are stupid, you are also likely to be stupid.**
Then your parents must have been stupid (because that totally has something to do with how stupid YOU are)


Judging by your stupidity and claims that come out of it...
What stupidity? Pretty sure two dumb people more often than not create another dumb person. Although, being bad with computers can be attributed to age\-based mental degradation.
I hate repeating myself, even if it's to a different person...

Then your parents must have been stupid.
Did you fail high school biology or something.
I didn't, that's why I know that the only thing that affects your intelligence, that's also coming from parents, is mental illnesses.

Kids with any kind of critical thinking act like they believe their parents or their bs regarding stuff such as religion, but then do whatever they want when they aren't around, go figure.

If parents are so delusional, and brainwash their kids all the time, then why their kids aren't that stupid?

Sorry about you and your mentally ill family, though. Also, nice argument, you sure showed me.
If dumb people always created dumb offspring, there would not be a steady increase in intelligence during human history.
Basic genetics: you inherit traits from your parents. The Flynn effect primarily happens due to environmental reasons like better nutrition and access to resources. It has generally ended in first world countries lol.
I was gonna try and be fair and say there's no possible way they could have known that the person at the other end was Russian intelligence, but then I remembered that they literally had the red scare drilled into their gotdamn heads as children. 
Runescape taught me how devious the internet scammers can be. 
As someone that works with consumers technology, I am witness to this!!! 
This entire thread is making me thankful for my tech savvy dad and willing to learn mum. Mum even learned how to stream on Facebook the other day without me knowing! Amazes me. 
I told my parents this a few days ago, they yelled at me for thinking they were stupid enough to fall for that crap. All the while they complain about how they’re stuff is so slow and their tech sucks
I'm 37 years old. When I first discovered the internet back in the 90s (and yes I did *discover* it) I never used my real name or divulged my real details online. I wasn't the only one to be cautious like thes either. Then when the whole facebook/social media thing happened people went from divulging nothing about themselves online to divulging absolutely everything.

What happened? 
People are stoopid.  And attention seeking and creepy voyeurists.

No facebook for me. 
I thought Obama was going to relieve my pre-2008 mortgage if I gave him the social security of my entire household. 
The amount of spyware on my father’s computer and how many times I need to fix that shit is bloody ridiculous. Actually so sick of it 😂
If you ever get the chance check how many tabs they have open on their phones. 
This, definitely
My dad once spent $150 on an eBay auction that said “instructions on how to get a free phone” but his English is really poor so he thought he was actually getting a really good phone for $150. Spent hours on the phone with eBay after that one.
My dad does things in the field of computers, but my mom only know how to use microsoft word and excel. On the internet, she send me links to those jank musty crusty ass fake bait news pages saying this is why people shouldn't play video games.
My husband works in IT so naturally my parents treat him like their own personal IT person. One day I get a call from my step mom demanding to know why my husband put iCloud on her phone and accusing him of stealing her information. It took both of us and my sister to convince her you automatically get iCloud when you have iTunes.
Her computer is slow, because she never turns it off. She also insists on using internet explorer. Ton of stuff downloaded that I don't know why. Same for her phone. 
“I blame that YouTube for the viruses”
>downloads music from random websites
Yeah, look at elsagate or nasa lies. They believe all of that shit. 
In their defense, we didn't listen either and just ended up giving all of our info to any social network site that popped up.
Jesus.  In order for this to be true, you’d have to be a teenager.  The number of children and high schoolers on reddit is too damn high.  And I am getting too damn old.
27, my dude. You old.
Dude, tell me about it. I was explaining this to my mom a few months ago. I was pointing out that six years ago, the family would yell at us kids for being on our phones too much during family get togethers. Now, the kids have learned when is the right time to use a phone, and it's all the adults that sit around on their phones. 
This is why I don't fear the Future... When the Robots come, The Human race will install so many Toolbars and Pop-up adds on them, it will Render them useless
'Can you uninstall some programs off of this computer? It's running slow!' 

* **Malwarebytes has detected 15 threats**
In elementary school there was a way to play offline minecraft in the computer lab. But that computer expert lady was like," Don't play minecraft, you can talk to other people and that's VERY dangerous." I facepalmed.
I still remember my dad going insane when he caught me jail breaking my iPod on our computer when I was younger, using a common program I downloaded. 

Then he's the kind of person who has to take his computer into the computer repair person at least yearly for god knows what. I've literally never needed to have somebody fix my computer for hundreds of dollars.
Everyone here browsed for something they don't want on a job application, clicked on something they shouldn't have, got a virus, etc. It's easier to laugh when Dad thinks the monitor is the PC and the tower is just a big CD player than to offer some help when he's going to pay Best Buy $90 just to look at it for something you could probably fix in five minutes.

We're on Reddit, guys. Down in the candy and cigarettes with Randall and Dante. 
You seem pretty peeved by this topic, old man.
Geroff my lawn, ya punk.

33 in July. I gotta go, it's Bingo Night.
my dad has 17 antiviruses
Wow based on these comments, my parents are pretty good about being cautious, if anything they send pictures to me when something seems too good to be true or suspicious 
One thing I learned from a tech service worker is that *everyone* watches porn. Everyone is pretty fucking guilty. Old people are no different. They just get viruses and malware from clicking porn ads. 
I wonder what crazy shit we will all do that our own kids will warn us about
My aunt wanted me to speak with her kids about internet dangers. I just brought a laptop i had not used in ages and in less than 20 mins i had a ton of info about her and my uncle. I upset her but i think my cousins learnt something.
My aunt used to warn me and my cousins about being smart and to not fall into fake news and such. 


Last summer she told us to be careful because some news page said that Saturn was going to hit our country, the Philippines. Only the Philippines. 
I lucked out. One day my dad was digging through my computer for "contraband" (porn, "ungodly" music, snuff videos, etc. I grew up in a fundamentalist house). He came across a project I was working on, a Habbo private server. He came across a file named "dataedit2.txt" and opened it. It just read gibberish to him, and he started asking about it. I told him is was Java, and spent the next 10 minutes explaining what I was doing and how the edits affected everything. He tells me "you seem to have a handle on this whole internet thing" and from there on in, I became the tech kid of the family. And they actually listened to me. I was 14 at the time. 
What i hate about how true this is is that my great grandfather (90 something close to 100) knows nore about basic computer and internet logic than my mother.
My great aunt got an email from her «bank» about her accounts. They needed her password and mother’s maiden name to «check for viruses» in their online services. I told her multiple times explicitly not to respond, despite her protestations about how nice they were. Then eventually she proudly announced how she had verified they were the real deal: They had known her full name and phone number. When I pointed out that her bank had experienced a major issue of customers’ names and numbers leaking only six months ago, she was furious and claimed I couldn’t live with how senior people could be as good with computers as me. 
Lol!
Like a older non family member I knew that got suckered in by a “soldier” who was “in love” with her
Turned out he just wanted her to send him money 
My dad is actually pretty up to date in technology and knows how to avoid scams. Especially considering he is in the computer science field. Consequently, my mom is pretty aware of that stuff too so I guess thats good for me haha
When my mom wants to go to a new site, she opens a new tab. She never closes the old ones, so she'll be sitting there with like 50 tabs open. Also, she googles the website when she wants to go to it. 
They warned as about dangers because from their perspective it eas dangerous. Don't act like there was malice in their thoughts...
Facebook is the kind of thing we were worried about right from the start, it happened and almost everyone fell for it.
The generation that told us not to believe everything we see on TV are the ones sharing the "This is a Feng Shui money tree - money will come to those who share it!" posts.
My father has always claimed to be more savvy with technology than me because "his generation invented the computer". 
But when he got a Mac for the first time (in like 2007) he spent all day trying to figure out how to access the internet because he couldn't find Internet explorer. 

I came home from school and clicked on safari, job done. 

He still to this day claims he knows more about tech than me and refuses to ask for my help, will spend all day getting frustrated trying to fix something that wouldn't even take me five minutes.  
Am I the only one with parents that are actually competent with computers?
My mom's really cautious about everything internet she won't even tap on 'update whatsapp' without asking me what it means. On the other hand, my dad's notification bar is FULL of ads because he is more venturous and he will get any mp3 download app or some shit.
Sorry, but most of our parents were baby boomers, so they’re brains are all fucked from the “Me” era and old school vaccines
How old are you?
Now teens are done with the internet and parents are still addicted to it
Kids are done with the internet? We're just getting started, we got babies with iPhones now.
r/titlegore
I actually think the young kids are worse. That weird generation from like early 30's to 50 is prey good with there bs meter.
What's so weird about us?
You spent all day on your tablet and then were are all like, "What's a computer?" ...and now people want to murder you. 
30's to fifties???  We didn't have a tech life as teenagers but we know how to use tech now.    I'm speaking about social media.
We know what rotary phones were and how to live without technology 24/7. That creeps out the younger generation for some reason. They cannot handle being “unplugged”.

I get told all the time by my nephew (10yo) that I’m “weird” when I try to teach him about anything not involving Xbox or asinine vine compilations on YouTube. In between telling me about all the things he just learned existed like I’m the idiot.

Jokes on him, I unplug the internet all the time and read a book while him and his sister cry about being “sooo bored”. Kids are dumb. Go outside!
We have very different senses of "all the time" if I'm going by how often you post on Reddit.
You realize there’s 24hours in a day and plenty of time to do a range of different activities not involving the internet? Besides, it only takes about 5mins of it being unplugged before they start freaking out. But okay.
I was just making a comment on the all the time part but to be honest, I really don't see a problem with frequent use of the internet. You said they like to play games, which I think is cool because I'm also an avid gamer. It's just a hobby like reading or whatever they would do outside is. I imagine their main issue without internet is being forced to do something they have no interest in doing when there's no benefit to doing it. If I was reading a book and it poofed out of existence, I'd be mildly upset too
I got ya. I’m not knocking them for gaming. I’m a hardcore gamer. But I’m also an adult with a job and education. I just think it’s funny that these kids practically live their entire existence online. With no interest whatsoever about learning about anything beyond their immediate interests which are shallow, at best. 

It’s not a healthy mindset when that is literally all you know and your parents refuse to take a vested interest in your development as a well-rounded human being.

I get that kids get excited to share the things they’ve learned about the world. But when these kids are both behind their grade in their education and struggling with basic reading comprehension at this stage, its disconcerting, and probably best to limit their gaming/internet time until they can catch up to their peers. So I try to encourage them to get up and be active and learn about the world in person from time to time. 

Unfortunately, since their parents don’t set boundaries, discipline them, or correct negative behaviors in the slightest; it falls to me to try my best to ensure they don’t end up homeless, in prison, or worse. People may think it’s “not my place”, but “it takes a village” as my sister says when she pawns them off on me, so that’s the family dynamic I’m dealing with here.

I get where you’re coming from, but perhaps you need more context of the situation so my comment makes sense.

/r/forwardsfromgrandma exists for this very reason. 
One time my grandma was on her phone on facebook and clicked to an article, then to another one then another one and then she got a pop up ad that said "You have 2 viruses from adult websites please install the ... Antivirus system" and then she downloaded that and I woke up and asked to use her phone and then she was like "you been watchin porn on my phone and got viruses on it you cant have it. I cant get rid of the virus" I tried to explain to her but she said "those things don't pop up on facebook. Ik what im talkin about, I know more than you about phones." basically in the end I got it and deleted the shit offa there so she wouldnt get a real virus and explained to her once again and she "got it" but after that done the same exact thing a million times
When you repost something for the 100th time, it’s stops being a shower thought and becomes karma whoring. 
I mean, they *are* the reason we have Donald Trump as president.  He said he was a great business man and would be the greatest president ever and they just fucking believed him.  
I don't know if you know this, but the president isn't affected by how much someone's out of touch parents "believe" in them.
Maybe but they can vote for him.....
DAE old people are dumb and young people are smart, amirite?
It's the millenial way of feeling superior over older people.
Seriously apparently everyone’s parents are now complete idiots. I could see maybe grandparents falling for this once or twice. 
This thread makes me glad that my father and uncle are both computer nerds, so they know everything about computers.
The dangers of the Internet cannot be quantified solely in material loss.

There are many psychological and behavioural problems that arise from it. Overstimulation is one of them. And it's a very real problem.
I am one with the cyber ... I turn the computer on and promptly get in trouble ... every. single. time! 
This chilled my shower, darling. 
Thanks
My dad is a web dev, so I fortunately never had this issue. 
This is so true.
Lucky for me, my parents are at least competent with technology, apart from me having to explain why the picture she blew up on PowerPoint looks fuzzy.
The funny part is, they warned me about the fake unrealistic dangers. I warned them about real dangers of the internet
With my parents being in their late 50s and being very tech savvy in general, I’m guessing this is just a generation thing; the older you are the more your parents suck at technology. 
This is the truest thing I’ve read in 2018.
To be fair, so did we.
Parents are always like that. Looking for ways on how they can piss off their children.
With me it's the same thing! The thing is that my mom calls me every time something happens with her phone or pc, I always helped her even tho I would get tired of it.. but now, I moved to another city to live with my girlfriend and she's always calling me because something happened with her computer and wants me to help her, and the other day she called me and this happened: "Something happened with my computer, it doesn't turn on" , "what did you do?" , "I don't know", "does it has battery?" , "yes I'm charging it" , "when you try to turn it on what's the thing that shows on the screen?" , "Operative System not found or something like that" , I told her to go to the store so that they would fix it.. I wasn't going to do that by phone ._. .. My question is.. HOW THE FUK DID SHE DELETED HER OPERATIVE SYSTEM
Boot sector virus
I don't seem to understand the title. 0_o
Well that's because nobody warned them. 
Omg this is so true. I remember my dad keeping us from being online too much (though that may have also been due to dialup), and that dumbass can't go a day without getting something hacked.
my mother: “don’t believe everything you read on the internet!!

also my mother: “did you hear that the US government is in contact with aliens?”
Sort of like the saying: "Democracy is always right but for wrong reasons."
I guess I'm glad living in a third world country and didn't even know about internet until about 12 years ago...
I live in a first world country but my family didn't get internet connection until 12 years ago
... they thought it was going to be a fad
Honestly, we can't guarantee that the same thing won't happen to us with whatever revolutionary technology gets adopted when we get to that age.
My dad used to tell me that updating Java caused viruses and the Blue Screen of Death.  Also dad said that RuneScape caused irrepairable damage to his PC and, clearly, made it run slower.

Edit: Also said that Norton was the "online security of the future."
My first computer was a TRS-80. Parent's mortgage.

BBS - "enter your bank details to get this pron" ... lolno.

Sign up to this social network 'you'll get all your friends back' ... lolsure...quietly [wtf pics of everything dude why??]

Receive emails with random-ass-links ... don't click 'em ... coworker "computer pwn'd" lol dick.

Daddy can I install this? lolsure...don't enter your name. [dad you're so weird].

daddy I can't log into counterstrike..."what did you do"...i was trading stuff and they send me a link to go to and I got hacked. Ok, really? Yeah I did my login. Lol. Sigh. Gimme a few hours on support. Kid, really?

Dad's overprotective.

My election got hacked and nobody noticed.

Dad's the problem.

:(



Later today I will make my weekly visit to my parents, and remove the SearchBox malware from IE, then re-install the anti-virus, run a full scan and run Malwarebytes. They're running WindowsXP and don't want to get a new computer.

They say they never click on ads, but their Facebook feed is mostly anti-immigrant "news" and pages for quilting and knitting web-sites that they've "liked".
I work in IT at a State College. There's a simple reason for this: Nobody is accountable to IT.

If you needed someone from HR there every time you spoke to someone because you suck at communicating with people, you'd get written up and or let go.

If you needed Accounting to do your timesheet for you, or to balance your cash till, you'd never make it far in the job.

But for some reason, we get new hire teachers as young as 40 who call us on our first day and day "Well I'm not good with computers so..." Part of me think this honestly should be a phase that, if uttered, is tantamount to "I'm not good at working with people" and should get you fired. These instructors do literally *all* their classes digitally. There's no other options! Even without a digital course, you have materials you're required to post and share and keep your students in the know of.

But instead we do things like 2 hour training sessions about Phishing complete with cybernetic hacker guys who wear masks to deceive you, with quiz questions to make sure you understood you can't open weird emails, only for *the very next day after everyone was required to complete it* someone opens a series of clearly Phishing emails and while on the phone with me says they're not very good with computers, saw their own name on the email so thought it was ok, and also admitted that someone in the office wrote down all the correct quiz answers through trial-and-error and everyone passed around the notepad with said answers on it so everyone could pass.

When I escalated this to my boss and their boss, they said "Well, what can you do? HR and their department hired them."

We have teachers who lock themselves out of every one of their own systems daily through forgetting passwords, and admit to writing them down but having miswrote it or forgotten to commit it to paper. Techs go to these computer stations and see username and password sticky notes everywhere.

If you left physical doors to secured locations as open as these people leave digital locations, Security would be on their ass and HR would fire them. But since it's computers, oh well!

Anyway, your parents suck at computers at home because at their jobs they're never held accountable and always have someone just fix it for them. We seriously need a tech revolution in this country that says digital literacy trumps reading and writing as it can leave the whole network and company at risk greater than any other vulnerability.
My father in law tried to buy $200 sunglasses for $15 via Facebook ad. It was too good of a deal to pass up!! 

Luckily, their credit card through BOA shut that shit down.
So they were right then...  the Internet was dangerous!
Parent, old enough to be grandparent.  Programmer, been using the Internet since the mid-80s.  We all fell for something.  Social media is a curse.
The worst is when they try to show you something, click a link, it doesn't open immediately so they click it again, then again, then again.... About 30 times. Eventually they all open. And they say "this stupid computer". 
Totally, but luckily,  my dad was really into computers back when they became a big thing in the '90s, even before I was around. Our family has had every single Microsoft office program, and he used to even code for fun.

My mother, on the other hand, doesn't know a thing about computers. She is the type to move the mouse to the bottom right corner of whatever YouTube video we watch.
I remember when I first started playing online games my parents would tell me not to tell anyone my age. How times have changed
that's my grandma reading articles and seeing click bait and ads. I tell her it's nothing ignore those, thinking I dont want to help her.
My sister and mom are pretty much horrible when it comes to tech. They get all cranky too when something is wrong and it takes me more than 5 seconds too fix.
But at least they’ve begun to stop blaming me for everything since they got their own devices that I never use.
Good way to get a virus is to download RAM. Because yes, that's actually a thing you can do on the internet. And no, it doesn't work. Probably ;)
God damnit mom 
I feel so happy that I never had to experience this. My Dad was head hunted by large companies to run everything tech. He was very good at what he did. He would even bring my along sometimes to help (he had little 3 year old me installing ram, this was in 1995 so ram was insanely small at the time) 
My Dad is a computer tech, I’m a mobile tech. 
My Mum just has her iPad and and asks questions before she does anything she doesn’t know the outcome to. 
My friends when I had them and their family on the other hand were hell. Pretty much only visited to fix something idiotic they did
Wow, reading all these comments makes me so happy that both my parents are still relatively young and not asking me about easy to fix computer problems.
my mom thought you could get viruses from watching youtube videos from channels that have viruses on their computers
*Some people fell for those dangers
Can confirm. Had to intervene my mother almost getting scammed into "unlocking her computer from a virus...." that was only a popup. Some dude was tryna get all her information and everything. Promptly told him to go fuck himself and get a real job.
My dad installed a random dodgy browser on his phone because he thought it would be faster than Google Chrome...
*Taps the fucking screen with their middle finger*
*shuts down computer by pressing the case button for 5 secs*
I got sick of dealing with virus's and all tech related problems related to windows, so I installed Linux on my moms computer. Most of the time she just reads the news, pays bills and gets on FB. I installed open office and showed her how to use it. Luckily shes intuitive and figured it out. The only issue I had was when Kubuntu updated and they changed the GUI. She had called and said her desktop disappeared..and I was like "uhhhhh....". I went over there and got her back up and running..but Linux can be odd sometimes. 
And it's NEVER their fault when they get malware or screw something up.
Every single generation tries to raise their kids the best they can, but every single generation is using *outdated data*. The lessons they were taught as children and learned throughout their life may no longer apply. 
This is fake news! I need more evidence Timmy 
The amount of trust a fearful parent will put in something is inversely proportional to the amount of trust that thing deserves. These parents trust these things not inspite of them being obvious scams, but *because* they are obvious scams.
my mother has given out our home address to random people she met through Farmville.
But Minecraft is owned by a multi million dollar company, it's safe. 'dont care it is still the thing that is giving the computer viruses' 
"Look sonny, I just fixed your PC! I was browsing here through this Coupon Printer I installed, then a very nice cartoons guy told me your PC was broken! I clicked him and it brought me to this pag-" ". . ."
Depends on the age of the op
I once installed a cracked Minecraft client on a friends computer, only to be blamed for installing a virus because they got a call saying they had a virus on their windows computer and proceeded to get scammed.
I had a very anti-Facebook Dad and Uncle...now they won’t get off it.
Grandad turned on oven to ‘burn a disk’ after I wrote down a page of instruction so he could make a CD. Not internet related, but still. I laugh every time I remember him yelling down the phone ‘How long do I burn it for? At what heat?!’
My dad fell for a PC cleanup scam despite me very specifically telling him it was a scam. I was about 13 years old. My dad handed over $175 and remote access to the computer and I spent the next half hour watching the guy install free software and then leave. I didn’t see them scrounging for personal data, but who knows? I was young.
And they were right, the internet can be an extremely dangerous place. Just because your parents fell for the dangers of the internet doesn't mean all Baby Boomers are hypocrites.
My mom warns me not to get scammed when I'm on Amazon
This will be us in the future with AI. We're all gonna be raped by cyborgs while our children look on in despair
Old people are definitely not very tech savvy. But what about the 34 year old meatheads that beat the shit out of the phone and then cry cause their touch screen won't work? (I've literally seen this with my own eyes) it's awful. He uses the phone like Elvira pets kitty's. It's just too much.
My mom keeps warning my sister and I about the danger of roblox and other safe websites and told us to be careful on youtube because the videos couldngive you viruses...

Actually can use the internet and actually follows the ideas that she gave us. A little silly, but she isn't a hypocrite.
They spent their lives doing what televisions told them too so really just who was behind the screen changed.
This scares me wondering what scams I'm going to fall for in the future 
pretty much impossible to be a victim of child molestation at their age
So glad my dad is very well versed with PC's. Safes me a lot of trouble having to explain stuff. My mom on the other hand...
This is too relatable
Reading all these comments makes me glad that my parents are actually computer smart. 
These kinds of posts would benefit from tool dissemination...Adblock is a great browser addon for blocking ads/viruses by extension -

Chrome:
https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/adblock/gighmmpiobklfepjocnamgkkbiglidom?hl=en-US

Firefox:
https://addons.mozilla.org/en-US/firefox/addon/adblock-plus/

Internet Explorer:
http://download.cnet.com/Adblock-Plus-for-Internet-Explorer/3000-12512_4-75938563.html

Update -
Also...using the computer as a limited/standard user reduces the attack surface for virus/malware:
https://www.ricksdailytips.com/limited-windows-account/
I like to think I went in and face those dangers and learned how to navigate the internet.
My mum thought she had won 500k on the lottery once, due to a phishing email.

I checked my phone at work and had texts from her all excited, and I immediately knew it was a scam. 

I phoned her and tried to explain but she just wouldn't believe me and was convinced she had won this money. She had struggled for a lot of years so I think she just didn't want to believe that this bit of good luck wasn't real. 

I was so stressed out about it that I had to leave work early to try to sort it out. I didn't drive at the time, and had to run (literally) right across town from my work to her house to try to get there in time before she gave them any information.

Luckily, by the time I got there, my sister had already arrived before me and sorted it out.

Turns out my mum had called the number given in the phishing email, and they told her that in order to claim the money, she had to send copies of her passport and driving license. Luckily, she did not have a passport or a driving license, so this delayed her from giving them any useful information. 

The scammers lost interest but still had my mum believing that if she could provide them with some other kind of photo ID then she would be able to claim the money. That's right, even at this point, my mum still didn't believe that this was a scam.

Luckily at this point my sister (who still lived there) had come home and immediately saw what was going on. 

She was really angry and called the number to give them a piece of her mind and was repeatedly sworn at and insulted by a guy with a foreign accent. 

Cue me running in the door and almost collapsing just as she got off the phone, only to find that it had already been sorted.

We reported it to the police but the police just said there was nothing they could do about it, despite having the guys telephone number etc. 

I felt bad for my mum as she was quite embarrassed that she had nearly been scammed. She couldn't understand how it was fake when she had been sent an 'official' email. 

Turns out by official, she just meant that the email displayed the National Lottery logo. Took me ages to convince her of how easy that would be to fake.

Worst thing is, my mum wasn't even that old at the time, this would have been maybe about 8 or 10 years ago and she would have only been in her early 50s. She had also been using the internet for ages, and knew there were scammers out threre. 

It's no wonder so many properly elderly people in their 70s, 80s etc get conned so easily. 

The police really need to do more about it though. As it stands, these criminals pretty much know that there will be no consequences for them. 

Edited for typos due to stupid phone autocorrect 
I love how young people think they aren't affected by fake news.
When I was in elementary school we shared one Windows XP  family desktop. I really only used it for watching YouTube videos and playing Club Penguin. Somehow the computer would end up with a virus, and my parents didn't know how to stop it, so they'd send it off to a friend out of state to wipe it clean. This friend would call them and say that YouTube is the source of the virus, so I couldn't watch YouTube videos anymore. We'd get it back, it'd get another virus, we'd send it out of state, rinse and repeat. Again the blame was put on YouTube despite me being barred from the site. 
Youtube existed when you were in elementary school? God, I'm old. 
If it makes you feel any younger, it was only about a year old at that time. 
My step mom keeps answering unknown numbers, and of course its the "IRS" looking for her ssn
After reading these comments, I feel blessed that my dad used to run a computer company, and my mom worked with him in it. Neither of them are stupid with computers.

Thank God.
I knew people would doxx you and witch hunt you and find out your info and be rude and stuff, but I thought it would be like a creepy middle aged neckbeard, not a bunch of middle/high school girls
Which is why I got them Chromebooks to use at home. Get them as a Christmas gift and never have to do family computer maintenance.

Now if only there was a way to keep them from singing up for spam sites.
The greatest weakness of any baby boomer is the word, "coupon"
Parent hated to get viruses. Sees an ad about cleaning the virus on the PC, which wasn't there? Download! Had like, thirty cleaners running at any time AND like, thirty viruses.
My mother probably thinks Facebook also works as a news site. She was having a conversation with another woman and they were like "it was given on Facebook that this will happen" instead of "this guy/page posted that this event will happen". She would probably believe anything on Facebook.
Moreover, I see more online bullying from adults than I ever saw in high school. Even the nastiest cases of cyber bullying at my school are mundane to the comments and pettiness of many middle-age adults. Anecdotally.
MIL entered her cc details into a clearly dodgy site with spelling errors that promised if you pay a subscription you can watch movies on Google for free. I know. On closer inspection (10sec of browsing the site) we learned it was registered in an offshore tax haven. Also, upon Googling the site name Google returned no less than 6pages of reviews declaring the site a scam. So easy to check and yet her complete computer illiteracy almost got her scammed big time. And that's just the worst time there have been others. 
Baby boomers + the Internet is generally not a good mix. 
I've been watching this guy named Kitboga who gets all those scam numbers and forces them to spend hours dealing with one of his characters (voice modulators). Scammers are straight up ruthless. Mr. Rogers could call asking for computer help and they'd rob him blind and have the gall to ask for more. India *really* needs to crackdown on illegitimate tech services, focusing on the managers and higher ups who 100% know what they're doing to people.
I'm constantly amazed by the shit on Nextdoor. A comment will shock me in its stupidity, quick online search reveals the person is 78.
Install Ubuntu or some other user friendly Linux distro if all your parents use a computer for is Facebook and Youtube.

Stopped receiving complaints after I did that.
Worst part is there is such a disconnect with old people like you are either a blubbering idiot or you run a home recording studio with all digital gear all connected on a Dante network that you set up completely by yourself. 🤷🏻‍♂️like this shits been around for a while how do you not know how to use it  
"I read on Google....... " 
My parents used to tell me that Facebook, Internet and social media will ruin my future and I will become a phone addict. 

Well.. its been 4 years since then. My father is now a phone addict. He uses Facebook every single possible free time he has. Starting from using it while eating dinner, walking on roads while looking at the phone.. Every. Possible. Time.

My mom also became phone addict too. Although not as serious as my dad.. She also uses Facebook and YouTube.
My parents don't know what the internet is beyond email and Facebook.

I'm old.
Let me start by saying I'm an idiot when it comes to technology.
Yet, my mom & my grandma turn to me as if I have a degree in computer science.
Yet the difference here is that after a while of having an Android phone with horrible ram & only 2gb of storage (yes, you can gasp in horror if you want), I learned how to take care of it enough that it was tolerable. 
They, on the other hand, had Android phones with at least 16gb. On top of this, they are avid users of WhatsApp, and on group messages with family members. You can imagine the amount of crap sneaks into their storage. My mom constantly complains about her phone being slow yet I see her notification bar is full, the recently used app second having multiple tabs, she doesn't close her browser tabs, and has a bunch of files on her phone she doesn't clean. Same with my grandma. Except she actually cleans her notif bar so it doesn't look as much of a warzone as my mom's.
Oh and don't forget the adware.
I shudder.
I now have a 32gb phone, but I still make sure it doesn't have residual files, I regularly use my cleaner app, I delete shit I don't need, etc. No problems.

Parents are just humans, too. Flawed. 

I'm gonna be perfect though. 
I remember the adventure of trying to run Malwarebytes on my dad's laptop for the first time. I could barely click anything with all the shit popping up on his desktop. 45mins later some 8,000 threats were quarantined.
You know these comments were annoying me with how ignorant people are with computers, but then I thought well their the ones who will never have a working PC so it's really like a blessing in disguise. People that shouldn't use computers will inevitably not have one anymore and the world can be a little less stressful. 
The longer I read this thread, the more thankful I am that both my parents have worked/work in IT 😬
Omg that's so true.  Well said!
Fell for every single one of what? Danger? In their defense,  it's difficult to maintain awareness when your an addict looking for your next fix, and the Internet is crazy addictive. If you doubt me, try skipping it today.
In my experience, Boomers are the group most addicted. Peeps born after about 1975\-80 are occasionally addicted. The dividing line seems to be if they grew up with a computer of some kind in the house. If they had childhood computer experience, they seem to be able to take or leave the internet and are generally disgusted with the privacy practices of 'Big Data' if you want to call Facebook, Google, et al... that. If they do use the internet frequently, it's what they do instead of watch TV. Those that didn't are the assholes that are constantly on their phones connected to Facetime calls or Facebook in restaurants or in line at the grocery store.

For kids born after about 2000 or so, internet is simply what they do because so much of the corporate culture shoved down everyone's throats is unpalatable. It's not just what they do instead of watch TV. It's also a replacement for listening to music on the radio, going to see crap movies, etc...
Thank God my dad is tech savvy and my mom listens to his advice, I'd be in hell right now. 
Trying to get ahead of this with my parents, as they're 70+ and only began using the Internet in the last 5 years. Worse, pop has the first stages of Diabetic dementia, so he's at a higher-than-normal risk of falling for a scam and we've had to stop him from getting suckered into some questionable Facebook convos already.

Also, what is it with old people and Facebook? I'm not at all into social media because of being concerned about the privacy implications from early on (my time on the Internet reaches back to 1995 - I used to design websites for NCSA Mosaic and the early releases of Netscape - so I have that old-school reluctance toward oversharing personal info online), but nowadays it seems like you can't be a true senior citizen unless you're logged into FB every waking moment.
AND they are completely addicted.....like teenagers having sex addicted. 
I've never fallen for a scam, but now-old adults who warned me have. Many a time.
No they didn’t.  They had no idea wtf it even was or what you could do with it.
Sadly shaking my head in agreement. I see it every single day at work. I’d like to know the dollar value of the lost hours. It’s not only Boomers, but (anecdotally) in my experience it’s mainly Boomers.  Maybe take a minute before following thru on that “Dear username, your bank account needs immediate attention” email with the poorly disguised link to some random bank name? Please?
My mom, the same person who told me to never use my credit card on sketchy places, once gave 50$ to a random website because an ad popped up telling her that her computer is damaged or something and she needed to buy an update to fix it, she asked me what it was AFTER SHE PAYED FOR IT, and I saw random porn ads and several other ads telling her that her computer was damaged. She then scolded me for not knowing how the internet works
baby boomers are the dumbest gen. Government sheeps
I agree that the roles have kind of reversed but parents usually fall for the financial scams and products/services that over promise bullshit. What they were worried about for their children were other kinds of dangers like sexual predators and traffickers, shit like that.
But, my computer says that I have a virus and to call this number....
“Grow an extra 6 inches in 1 month!”

Click
Click
CLICK
CLICKCLICKCLICK!!!
I've found a value to convert:

- 6.0in is equal to 15.24cm or 0.8 bananas
Good boi 

Good boyo 

Good bot 
I was having my mom download a client side mod for minecraft. You know from the main sites where it takes you to an ad to skip to download the mod. She downloaded the malware from the ad including the browser toolbar.....
Oh yeah, "steam is giving us viruses" no, your random clicking of links and buying the shittiest computer possible is why our computer is so slow.

Not my dad. He's absolutely paranoid. He's even afraid to open links to Reddit. Makes me do it on my own device and tell him what it says. My mom on the other hand? She clicks on everything. 
Hmm...My phone has something going on, YOU MESSED WITH IT, DIDN'T YOU?!
I work in digital advertising, but if you were to hear my parents describe what I do, you would think I’m a computer engineer. 
I keep telling mine: "There is no free lunch on the internet either."
You spent years telling me that people could lie about who they were on the internet. Why would you suddenly believe the IRS is trying to talk to you though a pop-up ad?
I stopped by my parents house one day while my dad was still at work.  My mom informed me their internet was down.  The computer monitor had died...  Ended well because they got a new laptop. 
I wonder how long until they figure out that ads are exactly as likely to know about your personal life as physical billboards, but can be purchased cheaply, anonymously, and can install viruses.
Don't be too hard on parents, they grew up with lead in their everything.
Man reading the comments on here makes me feel lucky my parents are computer literate

I still get annoyed by my fathers incessant use of new windows instead of tabs, but compared to everything else on here I think that gets a pass.
I'm so glad my dad works on computers and I don't have to deal with the crap y'all go through 
Its even funnier with the generations raising kids now. All those 30 somethings who somehow shit on younger kids are now raising their kids solely off youtube
So true.

1996: "Don't believe everything you read on the internet!"

2016: "Freedom-eagle.net says that Crooked Clinton is running a child sex ring out of a pizza parlor!" IT MUST BE TRUE

-------------------------------------------------
"My computer needs to be replaced." [Every 18 months] Because you click all the dumb shit you see grandpa.  Thank God he's not a casino gambler.


Maybe your parents
Me and my friend wanted to play minecraft together when we were like 11. His mom was like this and brought in a "computer expert" and she said that minecraft could get them viruses. She was talking about the ads that say "click here for free minecraft!" She had no clue what she was talking about and at age 11 I honestly think I knew more about computers than her.
My family has always accepted that I am better at computers then them. But my ex's family. Not even Jesus Christ himself riding into battle on the back of a flaming uniform with a sword made of adamantium could save them. Whenever there pc broke the dad would replace parts with the cheepest thing he could get his hands on. Where talking 1.8 GHz 4gb ram here. And because the parts where old as shit my ex always got blamed for it because she did online schooling. And don't get me started on her sister. She had a Chromebook and it looked like she went to the webstore and found a button that said add every extension to chrome that I had to fix. Then the next week she started bugging me to fix it again and she has re installed half of them.
It's really incredible. When I was little my mom was able to easily point out to me the "rich relative in Zimbabwe" email scam, but they are completely illiterate and unable to critically question the general landscape of the internet. 
Kind of unrelated but this reminds me of a time I was working in fast food and this elderly gentleman came in and saw one of our giveaway stands and started bitching about how they exclude so many old people because they don’t have phones or computers. I basically explained that it was part of the terms of the giveaway, and how by that logic they were excluding me because I worked there. He didn’t seem to get it, just kept acting like he was a marginalized member of society who was being taken advantage of.
My dad, a baby boomer, built computers from spare parts. Started back in the DOS days and continued up until his death in 2006. I Would say say I learned from him, but that's untrue. He made us figure things out ourselves. My mom was not tech savvy but did have the good sense to shut up and listen when my dad, my brother, or myself helped her or told her what was actually wrong. She had a laptop that sucked but lasted from 2005 to 2015. She had an iPhone 4 that she kept functioning until her death in 2017. 

What I am saying is, my dead parents can use technology better than yours. 
My father in law is always upset that Google and Microsoft call him and he can't understand the person on the other end...

"GOOGLE AND MICROSOFT WILL NEVER CALL YOU." 

My Fil and SMil and Mil are all really susceptible to weird gimmicky scams too.  They came from a world where your word was good enough and unfortunately we don't live in that world. Please don't click on "Instant joint health renewal cream and free ebook!" Again. Please?
r/WritingPrompts
This is exactly why conspiracy content is getting so much online traffic. Parents are starting to use the internet and getting sucked into these weird website that we learned to avoid back in the early 2000s. 
I’m glad for this.  That way I was able to blame her when my porn subscriptions used up her airtime. ‘‘Twas a different time.  
אני 3 'את דקות' 2 2 2 8!צ
God damn I'm lucky. All throught my childhood my mom learned about computer to avoid that kind of stuff and to make sure we were getting good computers, and my dad pretty much avoided computers but was smart enough to avoid dumb shit when he was using them. It's my God damn in laws that I have to deal with. Every time I visit then I have to do computer clean up, with my 29 year old sister in law bring the worst. 
I’d also like to think a lot of people who were warned never listened as well. 
No matter how many times I tell my parents not to put www. in the front when searching for something on the internet, she will always do it claiming that I don’t know what I’m talking about. Then when she searches up www.closestshopritestorestome on internet explorer, she asks me why is the internet broken.
After a guy from work got busted by paedo hunt groups faking to be 15 years old and convinced him to meet her. 

My mum mentioned that these adults are taught by younger people to talk like a young person to lure the paedos out. 

I was like "yea thats easy though" then said its easy for me to talk like a young person online because i was one and its natural for me but not for a new adult. 

Made me realize just how easy it is for us to spot a cash fish in the wild simply by the way people type messages, use certain words among other things while our parents have no clue. 

They are far more vulnerable online than their children will ever be, we learn from our friends where to go, what to avoid, our parents learned from us but they have no prior tech knowledge or ability to quickly pick it up like we did.
I find it just as bad with people around my age as well (20's). I have a coworker who, despite me telling her that tapping the enter key a million times will not speed the computer up, does so anyways. It breaks the POS and we have to restart it. EVERY. SINGLE. TIME. I explain to her why it does that, and that the program is from 2009 so it's going to run like butt but she just says "Okay!" and gives a half understanding smile. Someonepleasesaveme
Cool. When people don’t listen to me I tell them they no longer get advice and to pay someone else hundreds for the free advice I give them 
Can relate to most comments here 
What's more interesting than them taking part, which was pretty much a given if they lived long enough, is that they were right without knowing anything about it.
My computer is used for reading news, listening to Spotify, checking out Reddit, Facebook - stuff like that. I might catch four or five pieces of malware per year.

My mother uses hers for recipes, Christian websites. Every few weeks I run a scan and remove hundreds of pieces of malware. 

Every time she looks at my screen and sees how many tabs I have open she whines about how I'm slowing my computer down (we watch news videos on my laptop sometimes). It might take five seconds for a video to load versus the five minutes on her laptop.

The obliviousness is excruciating.
Apparently Christian websites are those which are the most plagued with viruses than any other! Might need a fact check on that, though.
"Don't meet people you met online in person, it could be a trap so they can kidnap/rape/murder you" my parents say as they get ready to go meet their online Jimmy Buffett forum friends.
My mum just refuses to trust online shopping. Even from places like Amazon, I regularly give up trying to convince her that it's safe. Not sure why she's so reluctant, but I guess that's parents for ya.

Also doesn't trust online reviews because "it's definitely the company's robots!". Like, yeah, but there's hundreds of reviews here... and then she'll tell me that a product is good because she'll see a few 5 star reviews saying "GOOD!!". Eurgh.
Videos in this thread: [Watch Playlist &#9654;](http://subtletv.com/_r8duaqq?feature=playlist)

VIDEO|COMMENT
-|-
[The Walking Divided  He Will Not Divide Us](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=O_ldHq3NzC0)|[+27](https://www.reddit.com/r/Showerthoughts/comments/8duaqq/_/dxqcoiv?context=10#dxqcoiv) - Edit, here's the full. Playlist HWNDU:
[The Kids' Guide to the Internet](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=A81IwlDeV6c)|[+15](https://www.reddit.com/r/Showerthoughts/comments/8duaqq/_/dxqbhev?context=10#dxqbhev) - Something like this perhaps?
[[Screen saver] - Johnny Castaway  All scenes!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PqXIKeTVcyA)|[+14](https://www.reddit.com/r/Showerthoughts/comments/8duaqq/_/dxqakgh?context=10#dxqakgh) - I used to have one with a guy stranded on a desert island. Every day he would do something else (go fishing, find a treasure chest) and then after like two weeks he escaped the island and the screen saver would reset.  Edit: Found it.
[http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UlJku_CSyNgn](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UlJku_CSyNgn)|[+13](https://www.reddit.com/r/Showerthoughts/comments/8duaqq/_/dxqhzwj?context=10#dxqhzwj) - I saw the internet go from a hobbyist's plaything and a bunch of official utility stuff to people using it for things like chat, shareware, command line text games, aaaalll the way to what it is today. My pc had less processing power and storage than...
[This is what happens when you reply to spam email  James Veitch](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_QdPW8JrYzQ)|[+8](https://www.reddit.com/r/Showerthoughts/comments/8duaqq/_/dxqdbjd?context=10#dxqdbjd) - And British comedians.
(1) [China's trillion dollar plan to dominate global trade](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=EvXROXiIpvQ) (2) [China's Empty Cities](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=V3XfpYxHKCo) (3) [How IBM quietly pushed out 20,000 older workers](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=e681QNbHloE)|[+1](https://www.reddit.com/r/Showerthoughts/comments/8duaqq/_/dxqne49?context=10#dxqne49) - Here is one of their videos about China's growing influence using its construction industry.  To be clear, I am no expert on China, but what they say doesn't align with what I know.  Several of the facts they lay out in the video are used misleadingl...
I'm a bot working hard to help Redditors find related videos to watch. I'll keep this updated as long as I can.
***
[Play All](http://subtletv.com/_r8duaqq?feature=playlist&ftrlnk=1) | [Info](https://np.reddit.com/r/SubtleTV/wiki/mentioned_videos) | Get me on [Chrome](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/mentioned-videos-for-redd/fiimkmdalmgffhibfdjnhljpnigcmohf) / [Firefox](https://addons.mozilla.org/en-US/firefox/addon/mentioned-videos-for-reddit)
Haha, I'm young enough that my parents are having this problem with my grandparents. 
Another reddit axiom: “you will be rewarded with karma if you assume your parents were dumb, and that you are smarter than them”.
That's weird. Wasn't Mark Zuckerberg *just* testifying before Congress for the exact kind of data profiteering "your parents" warned you about? Plus nowadays your parents are likely Millennials and never warned you about shit.
My grandmother always fact checked after she clicked and wonders why her facebook games dont work
Ironic. They could save others from the dangers, but not themselves.
Parents are Darth Plaguis the wise confirmed
Didn't we become the adults who didn't listen? I bet most people were giving FB their info before their parents where.
At the same time, we thought kids would be super tech savvy and instead many of them are completely lost and would have no idea how to reinstall an operating system. They just toss the device and replace it. They don’t know what a URL is. FTP/etc are foreign concepts. They will literally search google for “google” and “facebook” and click on whatever the first result is. They have no idea what email is beyond gmail. 

It’s all perspective. 
we promote a more disposable society with each gen. imo (of course). even hipster/vintage love mvmnt only brought shit back to comically highlight how (ironically) cherish-able these nostalgic throwaway trends (gimmicks?) are...

so of course we *built this town* right? meh im not mad at the kids for the stupid shit **they** do, im mad when we get to see what **they** do with the ingredient list, so to speak, im mad when they cant read the (recipe) book. 

i typed more than i usually do... coffee on a saturday must've  got me! 
lol r/showerthoughts

More like r/repostjunction

In fact, that’s most of Reddit these days.
You must mean your parents.  By writing every single one you've made this statement ridiculously untrue.
He meant every single danger, not every single parent 
Oh that makes it better. /s
Didn’t say it did, just clarifying 
Then your parents are dumb
Maybe y'all just come from stupid parents.  I'd wonder about the DNA you posses.  
You might be younger than us. There once was a period of time called the 90s when all this was still new and scary to a lot of people, and old people weren't about to learn.
Actually I am a lot older than you. I was an adult in this so called time of the "90s".  It was only scary for people afraid to try new things.  Trust me when I say that your parents are stupid.
So, this post is about kids calling their parents stupid but when someone the same age as their parents calls them stupid they get upset.  Yah, I'm pretty sure it's the DNA that's been passed on.  
I've got good news! When you become an adult no one will warn you about things because no one will care about you.
Jesus christ you people are full of yourselves.

And not a single dissenting voice to be found.
What are you even talking about? Some people here have parents that are software engineers or something and know a thing or two, and most people here are sharing their parents lack of understanding of the internet. 
Parents are dumb.
Oh look Reddit hating on the internet as if Reddit is part of the internet 
Not the internet, the ignorance and hypocrisy of our parents not heeding their own advice. 
Every generation wants to throw the last one under the bus. Therefore, be ready when it’s you under the bus.
I hope someone throws me under a bus.
To be fair, every generation also blames everything on the upcoming generation too
It's what gave us this trump America. Your grandma doesn't know about clickbait... we learned, we recognize that fake news resembles penis pill advertising... but your cousin Zeke never had broadband until he got a cheap android LTE unlimited deal from bumfuck mobile. 
This one again
Except that the facts are the opposite of what you say.  Mellenials are more likely than seniors to fall for internet scams.


Citation needed.
I've read the articles that say this and they all point to an FTC study which I've also read and there are several problems with this statement. For one, the FTC article is about fraud, not scams. If I someone pick pocketed my wallet  and started buying shit with my credit card then that's fraud and that'd be counted in these statistics. If someone used the easily obtainable information about me on the internet to open a bank account in my name then that's identity theft and that'd be counted under fraud. In both of these cases could have happened wether or not I was active in the Internet. It's also worth noting that senior citizens lose on average more money to fraud than millennials. As much as I hate Donald Trump's whole "Fake News" thing, newspapers do stretch the truth on order to get you to click on them and this is a classic example of it
My parents are fine, thanks. Never fallen for a scam, never lost their computers to malware, didn't fall for Russian propaganda in the 2016 election.... Most of yours were just that stupid all along.
Lol i always say my parents are useless with tech (coz they are), but as far as i’m aware they havent had any virus attacks or anything 
(Although they did vote Brexit so might have fallen for the propaganda stuff)
What a load of shit. Your parents were using the internet when you were in your dads ball sack. 
And if you look at the history of malware and worms, I'm sure it's pure coincidence that this same time was when viruses spread like wildfire.
[deleted]
You know when your parents click every virus link and fall for all scams they receive in the email. 
[deleted]
I'm not OP 
[deleted]
This entire thread is confusing. 
Thanks! Instructions clear, dick not stuck in toastet
Me too thank 
Y'all dense 
it took me a couple rereads too, man. you aren't alone.
I get the feeling that you’re implying they’re hypocritical, but really they warned us of a danger and allowed us to be mentally prepared and aware of such things before ultimately falling prey to said danger. It’s not really a “whoa man” concept. It’s admirable on the parents’ part.
Some shower thoughts should be left in the shower...
this is funny because millennials who have only ever known internet and computers are more gullible and more susceptible to identity theft and other 'dangers' than adults...my theory on that is they have also always known and been used to giving out there info to access content...in other words it may be so second nature for them they don't see the danger
Every Millennial currently alive IS AN ADULT. 
Bff

OMG old people are like totes redic!
https://getcryptotab.com/817672
Your parents invented the Internet 
My father is a good man.
 His flaw is that he'll buy expensive computers, phones and cameras  (with all the bells and whistles) but then have me figure out how to use it. He'll also get angry if I don't take pictures for him at events, either on his phone or on his damn photographer camera. 😒
Millennials are more likely to fall for scams though

https://www.forbes.com/sites/vanessamcgrady/2018/03/07/jobscam/
"Millennials are most likely to fall for job scams" you were really close
My parents are too cautious online, haven't downloaded anything sketchy since they got a new laptop, but thats problem, laptop hard drives are slooooowwww. They always try to get me to delete something off their computer to speed it up. I can't fix a 5400rpm hard drive 
So clone to an ssd?
They don't think that the hard drive is the issue so they wont buy a new one 
I'm your parent and I liked this Hahahaha! I said liked, but it's really upvote  hahahaha! I'm so random.
This was at 6000 upvotes. I downvoted just to see it become 5999.
This was at 1. I downvoted just to see it become 0.
This was at -11, I upvoted just to see it go at -10 
This was at -9. Downvoted just to see it become -10. It's just so satisfying downvoting for no reason other than to see a number change.
Alright Satan calm down
And now we have Trump.
Speak for yourself. And your trumpet family 
Excellent observation
 I'm y
No, we didn't.
This!! 
Our parents built the internet dumbfuck. 
If anyone is interested in mining BTC 1. go to this link and click add to chrome, you'll be able to mine through google chrome, but mining with only your device is waste of time and everybody know it. So this extension helps multiple people mine: https://getcryptotab.com/817672
After you start mining get your link and send it to other people and you'll get 15 % more BTC from company.
Good luck!!

:D
‘Every single one dangers’?
Those are the worst ones. Why would games slow down your computer/ be dangerous? I mean, sure, Roblox is a little worse 'cause of the ODers and Pedos, but still, like, seriously?
Ahaha “hey Dad can I give you this $20 if I can use your PayPal account on my Xbox live to use $20?” 

“NO! THEYRE GONNA STEAL MY MONEY.” 

“Dad, firstly, Microsoft is a reliable and not-shady company. And secondly, you’ve got a PayPal account so it’s not like they can even see your information.” 

It’s the worst when parents are stubborn out of ignorance and refuse to learn. 
I'm so confused as to how parents can be so suspicious of things that are completely harmless online, but yet they give out the exact information they're so crazy about protecting every time they're prompted.
I manage a wine and paint bar, few weeks ago there was a group of mothers talking about how they went let their kids play roblox  because of the pedophiles who use it to groom children.

I wanted to argue with them that any game with a text chat could happen but I let my mouth shut.
Wine and paint bar? 
We do instructional paintings while people drink booz
Pinot’s?
Yup
We have those here in Tulsa, at least one or two. Seems to be pretty popular
Sounds like Painting with a Twist or similar.
Exactly
More like a Whine and Paint bar am I right?
I loved being called a paranoid asshole when asking people what permissions those quizzes asked for.
Not even the permissions. Scared of ID theft and gives a stranger all the details they need because she might get 50p off a bottle of washing up liquid SMFH 
How much info do they really ask for on those and is it actually enough to steal an identity? I'd think you'd need more sensitive information, but I have no fucking idea how to steal someone's id so could sure as shit be wrong. 
It’s surprisingly little. In the US if you have their social security number, name, and date of birth you could do a pretty significant amount of damage before anyone notices, especially if you have their address too. Even without the SSN you could get away with a fair amount.
>She won't have any Paypal

She's better off. Paypal is cancer. Getting locked out of 10k and having it take 6 months to resolve is no pleasant matter. 
PayPal is a joke. Never use them again. There is no point
Never had a negative experience with PayPal should I be worried?
No need to be worried unless you store an amount that's significant to you  
  
As long as you don't have much money on it or use a credit card, you're good
Ok,  thanks for the clarification. 
Exactly. I remember a few months ago I wanted to watch a movie with my mom & I couldn't find it on demand, so I went to Google play movies on her account. I had to spend a few minutes explaining to her that she was fine using her credit card to rent the movie there. It was no different than paying for Netflix. Yet, I sometimes see her signing up for shit w/ her phone number. And yes, her phone does go off almost everyday with random people trying to sell her shit.
Tried to rent a movie online with my mom for like $1.99 and she said no when we got to the credit card screen because she didn’t want Google to steal her credit card info. You know, because that’s what Google does. Not sure how she thought we were going to pay 
Oh boy.
My compromise with my mom was "I'll just delete the info afterwards, alright?"
By inserting exactly 1 dollar and 99 cents into the TV obviously. 
My parents used to think roblox was a virus at one time. Was frustrating. I still played and was allowed to play it tho. I played it way back in the day. Can't believe it's still popular. Almost seems more popular.
Because it’s on Xbox now and was a free game with Gold a few months back. My 4 year old is completely obsessed and I thought Minecraft was annoying...
That's must help, but it seems like it's popularity has been rising for a while now. I saw a phone app a while back, so I bet that is helping it along as well. Free on Xbox doesn't hurt either. On pc it's always been free.
Oh yeah I forgot it’s on the kids’ iPad too. There are some weirdos on there but I’m much more worried about my kids trying to buying hundreds of dollars worth of RoBux than some chat they can’t read or questionable avatars. 
The news media running fear-mongering stories of internet hacks of personal data is a big reason for the mistrust. Sensationalist stories have a tendency to misrepresent reality. 
My brother convinced my parents that RuneScape was giving the family computer viruses and not limewire.

I felt so smug when the repairman explained to my parents that RuneScape was safe and Limewire (all of my brother's downloads on there specifically) was where our problems were coming from.
My head hurts
Love this, didn't have to deal with it much personally but it rings true for a lot of my friends growing up. My family knew I was pretty savvy online cause I was the computer repairman of the house. I explained the companies behind the games they would pay for. I really respect them for trusting me enough to know I wasn't giving their Visa away to any shady shit. 
Jm6
Paypal is bonkers stupid. I refuse to use it. 
My mom once asked me about some random varation of the "you've won!" ad / survey garbage. She got an email and was very excited and asked me cautiously if I thought it was real. There was something so wholesome and innocent about it and it broke my heart to have to tell her.
Not having PayPal ain't no bad thing.
My mom once a day "I keep seeing something saying that my phone is slow and if I click it will fix it, what is that? Should I fix it? 

Me "NOOOOOOOOO, I've told you a million times DO NOT CLICK THE THING. It's a virus and will mess up your phone." 

Mom "ok" 

Next day "I keep seeing something...."


Yup. I always get "I don't click on those ads" yet the email I set up for them is full of subscriptions. Even things as easy as waking up the screen by wiggling the mouse, but they click and move it erratically and end up moving things on the desktop. And everytime its "I don't do that" like I don't physically see them doing it.
I didn’t even know you could get viruses on phones 
I see so many people with ads on their phones. I stay silent but I want to say, "You know that shouldn't be there, right?"
Hey! I have an iPhone and my dad an android. I didn’t know that he could get viruses on his phone. I noticed he had an ad on his lock screen and thought it was weird but didn’t know it was a virus. How would I go about helping him remove it?
My sister did this with her phone before upgrading. She had ads EVERYWHERE. “Its just this stupid phone!!!!!” “No, its all the bullshit you click on.” “No its the phone!” 
Almost as hard as having them stop using internet explorer. 
My dad was always the computer person in the family until one day it was me. He has had ads on his lockscreen and all over his phone and doesn't understand where they come from.

I ask him what he has downloaded. "Just some apps." Ok what kind of apps. "I dont know angry birds, themes, and wallpapers" dad you have a galaxy you do not need to download themes and wallpapers from the play store there's a theme store for that "that's what I used" if you can uninstall it from your home screen, it is not from there. "I'll just restore my phone there's something wrong with it"

I cant count how many times this has happened. All because he wants that nice Christmas theme in the middle of June.
When my mom got a new laptop,thefirst thing I did was install Chrome, and uBlock, and then remove every shred of internet explorer.

She never got a virus on that laptop.
I consider myself tech savvy, but I did get a lock screen ad not too long ago. I finally figured out it was from a "flash-light" app I had downloaded. Felt like an idiot.
That’s how you know they’ll never learn how to avoid the problem. They act like it’s not even there. 
Well, to be fair, the ad on the lock screen could just be peel smart remote, which is adware that *used to* come on every Samsung phone
My mother legit goes through 3 laptops a year because the grandkids download viruses. Nothing to do with the 25 add-ons she installs or the 7 different types of anti-virus software she gets.
That's why I just installed Ubuntu on my parent's computer. 
They didn't click the "get virus" button.  They just clicked one of the dozens of flashing "download" buttons instead of the tiny text one they were actually meant to click. 
Exactly why I got my family iPhone’s. Can’t get those types of adware from the app store. 
This was my exact experience with Steam. I played CounterStrike on their computer and then left for college. Months later their computer broke and it was my fault. They fixed it and then a couple years later it broke again. When the computer guy fixed it, he hadn’t removed the malicious software (steam) like he was supposed to, so it was his fault and my fault again for breaking it. They got a new computer. I came home for Christmas and didn’t touch it. It broke and it was that damn steams fault again, that had been saved in the wiring and made it onto their new computer.

I’m a bad son.
About 10 years ago i helped my mother in law with her computer, and i added different users for her husband and son so that everyone could have their stuff separated. 

She was convinced that having different users was slowing the computer. 

She knew literally nothing about computers, while i had studied computer science and was getting paid as a developer. I mean, how disrespectful is that? I'm still pissed off about it.

EDIT: i also was working for free, of course
Hah!
Man I feel ya. I had Minecraft on the family laptop. After playing on and off for months, the battery starts draining really fast, and my dad was positive that it was Minecraft doing it so he made me delete it. A week later the laptop couldn't leave the charger without dying. He realized it might be the battery and bought a new one. The laptop was good as new. Man I was so pissed.
This, i got farcry 4 sometime ago, and now my dad says "that new game of yours is slowing our pc down!" 

Meanwhile he has roughly 127 gigs in pictures and downloads pictures from fishy sites.
My parents straight up bought a junker computer for my brother and I to install games on because they didn't want it on their computer. We played on a potato. A year or so down the road, the junker ran better than the home computer because they would click so much crap.
I mean if her laptop's that old a Windows update would probably slow it down
Get mom hooked on Fortnite, that'll show her.
I’m not even kidding you that’s exactly what my mom was saying. It’s been deleted for a while and she still insists it was Minecraft
That famous slowing the computer down thing, shut up grandma I know what I'm doing. 
Same here. My parents bought a laptop 8 years ago and it's starting to fail. They have a new laptop, but I think they're still using it just to be guilt trippy so they can keep complaining that it's my downloading Minecraft, Graal online, and a couple other games as a kid that slowed it down. Even though I already uninstalled them. And I even have to run AVG, Combofix, and delete programs from control panel regularly from viruses they get.
I remember my dad would always blame the Sega or playstation every time the tv would have an issue
My stepdad is the same way with my playstation Vr messes up his tv
Man my parents used to say runescape was only there to spy on us
I remember when I was maybe 10 I used to play on my parents computer all the time. I’d play minecraft and occasionally install a few mods and texture packs but I was always safe with it. 

I’d constantly get shit from my mother about how bad I fucked up the computer untill I decided to buy my own. My computer is damn near 10 years old now and runs better than theirs did the second day. Never had to go get it cleaned either. 
my parents blamed me for "breaking" our desktop back in 09 because I played toontown. DEFINITELY wasn't the 4 different browsers with half the monitor taken up with add ons and software and Helpful Toolbars :)!! 
Yea my mom freaked out when i asked for a steam gift card because the biggest game platform and most trusted company for buying games was "a scam to steal my money"
Holy shit we all have the same moms.
Nothing to do with the fact the computer is 6 years old and probably filled with bloatware.
My 10 y/o Core 2 Quad pc probably runs better. 
Steam just completely destroyed my computer apparently
Your meaby to young to reddit? /S
yeah, meaby 
And then he blames the virus for the porn
I once helped my ex’s disabled father with his computer. Holy fuck, the amount of Grandma porn almost made me gag. Like, that had to have been all he did all day. 

And his keyboard... fucking eh... I’m about to obsessively wash my hands just thinking about it
Oh god - change his browser settings to delete history after one day or something.
This is what pisses me off. I was the "computer guy" in the family but it was always my fault that the computer was running slow. It wasn't because they were using internet explorer with half the window covered in toolbars. 
Mom: “Stop playing that HALO game it’s messing up the computer!”

*is actually playing WoW*

Mom: *throws out Halo 2 discs*


The computer will run slow when there's too many icons on the desktop. 

- dad

Ok dad. 
The video games are taking up all the space, thats why the computer is slow. You need to remove those games so the computer is faster

/ugh.
Steam downloaded a virus to the laptop! 

*Cousin just downloaded fake mircosoft word from the most dodgy website in the world.*
do toolbars still exist? i remember them from when i got my first computer
Finally someone I can relate to. My parents were aware that they aren't so tech savy even though they used computers regularily without problems. My sisters tho... my god. "All your games are slowing this computer down!" Because they really "knew better"...
What ground my gears how critical they were of me when I played video games. Sure, it's a frivolous waste of time. But so is watching TV, reading a book, going for a drive, walking around a mall, or pretty much anything else. 
Holy shit, this was my childhood. 

Every time I sat down to play a game, I would get blamed for "viruses".  
Do people still install toolbars?
If they're older than someone born in 1970, sometimes
Our first computer died to a power surge when we were out of town one weekend.

The guy who sold us it thinks that lightning might have hit the line phone line, and came through because the modem and motherboard got fried.

Mom thought (And I'm sure STILL thinks) it was my video games that did it. Not a power surge.
I remember back when I still lived with my parents and played Everquest a lot. My Mom thought the game was causing her email account to purposely delete random emails. I patiently explained that, no, that’s not the cause and maybe she was deleting her own emails (turns out she was). A full Saturday wasted arguing and screaming followed by a month of her not speaking to me. 

I had also installed a Voodoo brand graphics card causing her to instantly believe I worshiped Satan (simply because the card had the word Voodoo on it) and proceeded to sign me up for the local bible study group. 

Good times. 
I went to a friend's once with my copy of The Movies. His dad had a huge freak out and accused me of installing a virus on his computer. Wanted me to pay for a new one. I was about 12.
Oh god why is this so accurate. 
This reminds me of that one time I was installing MDK off its original disc in the nineties but but by that point I knew the wizard steps by heart and just pressed next outside of the installation directory.

My aunt caught fire when she saw it and accused me of mindlessly skipping past important steps without reading. 
Yep my childhood in the 90s. Aunt's computer runs super slow because we installed doom which ran in DOS on it. Yet our older hand me down desktop with all the games worked great.

Nothing to do with AOL, every decorative desktop item, installing/forwarding every attachment, and multiple chat applications on a Win95 machine with 8MB of RAM. Nope, definitely Doom.
Are chrome extensions today’s toolbars?
No, IE toolbars are still a current problem. 
You had me at IE.
Not really. Extensions generally don't take up too much CPU power and AFAIK it's a lot harder to hide viruses in them. 
Thanks! I genuinely didn’t know. Clearly I don’t computer good
Unrelated, but why do I need to Google AFAIK every time I see it. :(
Chrome extensions are actually useful.
No
May have accidentally did that when I was 5 and didn't know any better. 
The 28th one gets rid of the others though.
Was there some sort of parental conspiracy about PC games and computer viruses going on in the 90’s? I’m pretty sure railroad tycoon did not ship with a virus but my parents sure were convinced.
My dad was in some sort of quest to collect them all. I explained to him to watch out for checkboxes for toolbars when installing new stuff and still got a new toolbar every week.

Did toolbars just go away or chrome never had the option for a toolbar?
I forgot about those extra unnecessary fucking toolbars until right now.  You bastard!
My dad used to do this, but now he’s more tech savvy than me. Not sure what happened.
The hell are these toolbars even for? I've only ever heard of them, since I don't encounter computer-illiterate people to this extent in my life.
Mom is that you?
Remind me of that guy who made a video of him purposefully downloading risky content to kill an XP.

*Opens Google* Cool.... Toolbars... *search*
My favorite was: "Your computer games are hogging all the bandwidth!" *streams 1080p movies every night*

They still don't believe me when I tell them games take little bandwidth to play online. Meanwhile movies take the most you possibly can.
My mom would complain about how my brother and I were wasting our days and minds with video games, then she would watch tv for hours and hours. Judge Judy and Caso Serrado, Criminal Minds and Law & Order. And whatever dangers (both legal and physical) she 'learned' from those shows she would warn us about.

Yeah, video games surely waste our minds....she does like DDR though becauae it's exercise.
What was worse was my semi-computer-guy brother used to say my playing Runescape would break our computer and get us hacked. 

My parents listened and they wouldn’t let me PC game on anything for a long time. 
Ah, good old internet explorer 6 with 40 toolbars covering the screen 
too real, man, too real. 
For me it was always "You're always downloading stuff!!" But I wasn't? Sure, blame the 12 year old who just wants to play Neopets
At some point at about 7 years old I had a realization that I was more tech-savy than my parents when I understood that half my screen should not be obscured by toolbars.
Yeah, it was definitely *my* copy of [Masters of Orion 2](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Master_of_Orion_II:_Battle_at_Antares) 
and not *mom's* 15 toolbars and  "McOffry" anti-virus.

Edited to appease that blasted bot
You probably meant 

***DEFINITELY***  

-not *'defiantly'* 


 --------------------------------------- 

^^^Beep *^^boop. ^^^I ^^^am ^^a* ^^bot ^^whose ^^^mission ^^is ^^to ^^^correct ^^your ^^^spelling. ^^This ^^^action ^^was ^^^performed ^^automatically. ^^Contact ^^^me ^^^if ^^I ^^^made ^^^A ^^mistake ^^or ^^^just ^^downvote   ^^^^^^please ^^^^^don't
Lol almost all pirated games are virus free else they wouldn't be seeded by thousands of people. 
But a legal drug dealer so whos laughing now 
My mum is addicted to fucking candy crush saga. Like 8 hrs a day. But she's a grown are woman who can wreck her life as she pleases...
Got any more of those ip packages? *scratches arm*
To be fair the internet can be pretty addictive. Any media can, especially when you have unlimited access to it. People don't like to talk about it because there shouldn't be anything wrong with taking it easy every now and again, but very few people have the self discipline to balance real life with the unlimited games, movies, music, social media, etc. that the internet offers. Almost all of us spend a bit more time on it than we ought to, and for some folks it can develop into a serious detriment.
I am almost 60 and I learned to program on 16k of RAM. I guess I wasn't early addictor.

Those skills are now the reason I make more money than the other Stoners from my high school.
My father complains I spend too much time on the computer... I am a CS student...
To be fair a huge part of my job involves using a computer, in addition to the many online courses I’ve taken/am taking for certifications I need FOR my job..

And I still spend wayyyy too much time on the computer.
I’m actually a drug dealer and my parents are pretty chill with it. At least it doesn’t involve an iPad
I'm pretty sure most people jobs revolves around the internet. If the internet stopped working tomorrow, global commerce would come to a screetching halt.
I still have the ability to order from my factory via fax. Only use it once or twice a year, but servers go down every once and a while. We can call in orders if completely necessary. More paperwork would get lost and backlogged for a while, but I doubt any halts would happen.
You might he able to send the order, but do you know if the factory would still be able to operate?
Yes. Cutting, welding, and painting of metal. All done offline in a southern town. Even if you developed automation to run a factory why would someone put that automation process online. Wouldn't a closed network be safer?
Okay, I said global commerce. Not literally every single business including   small town small businesses.
Small town of 50 K turns out more product than all its competitors and sells worldwide. 
I think you're vastly underestimating how much the computer systems of global shipping companies rely on the internet. Unless you're planning on driving your product overseas in a boat or a plane yourself, youre going to have an issue.
I think you vastly ignore how adaptive we are in a pinch.  Companies still have landlines and people who did the job without email in the past. You couldn't GPS track your product but your product would still sail. It will just take longer to get in and out of port.
I think you're assuming other people do things like your small business and are speaking for a lot of industries that you can't actually speak for.

Day to day operation aren't the only thing to consider. The stock market is vulnerable as well and affects commerce just as much as shipping complications. Maybe even more so.
When I was a kid and spent all my free time on the computer, my grandmother kept telling me "Get off that stupid thing, it's not going to feed you!"

As soon as I got my first job as a programmer, I called her just to let her know I was making more money as a junior than she had as an experienced nurse. 
My grandparents used to think the internet was synonymous with porn (well it almost is). My dad works with computers... My gran died convinced he was a porn actor. 
Can you upgrade my internet./s
 \- "And what do you do /u/caprizoom"    
 \- "I sell drugs on silkroad"
But do you know what they call a Twitter addiction? Mr. President. 
*Little boxes on the desktop*

*Little boxes made of silicon*

*Little boxes on the desktop*

*and they all look just the same*
Bahah. I literally make the internet work, so I'm enabling you?
Hey soon enough it might be true 
More like a pharmacists 
My mother is convinced I am a drug dealer because she knows I get weed for a couple of my friends, she told me that she will bail me out of a jail once only and then I am on my own.  
Pst, hey you, wanna buy some web?
>that the internet is “addictive”

Try going without the internet for a week. I dare you. You will be surprised that you'll get literal withdrawal symptoms. 
It absolutely is. But that's because its a new way of life people are getting used too. It'll integrate better over time once cell phones are obsolete. The whole looking at screens for many hours a day is really bad for ya. Mostly just for social reasons, but also changes peoples thought patterns. Makes bad stuff easier to accces, like gore porn shit. That ain't positive for humanity yo.
I mean it kinda is. It's engineered for people to like it to show you ads
My Dad is always going on and on about internet "addiction". I don't deny that it's definitely a thing. But I resent how often and willy-nilly he throws the phrase around.
Still up for debate whether it's actually a necessary addiction or not though. Had everyone shunned the internet, the world would probably still be revolving just fine.
I recently put an ad blocker on my mom's computer because she clicked a 'DOWNLOAD' link that hijacked her chromebook browser
My mom was wary of the internet because she didn’t want me to look at porn and fucked up shit.

She was right to be concerned.
“God dammit, moms watching porn again”
In Soviet Russia, kid control parent!
Holy shit.  I'm late to the party here, but if someone actually makes this I would install it on my Mom's devices just to stop her calling about simple stuff like this. 100% serious, might not even bother mentioning I did it.
tbh, parental controls are for the parents.
Doesn’t even have to be online for some of these Boomer idiots. Full grown adults fall for IRS scams on the phone all the time. Like it doesn’t raise any red flags with the US government is asking you to pay your taxes in Target gift cards??
I keep toying with the idea of using the v-chip on my parent’s tv to just get dad to stop fucking talking to cable news. 
The most awkward conversation you'll ever have with your dad is telling him how to safely browse porn.  

I guess it's fair, he taught me how to use a spoon and has cleaned up my literal shit from my own pants hundreds of times. 
we need real parental controls to keep parents from accessing for than 10 minutes of fucking Fox "news" a day

seriously

i feel sorry for all ya'll that have parents addicted to that garbage. 
We need Parental Control.
\* Double click that link.
“Play a record backwards, you’ll hear secret messages from The Devil, and murder your whole family.” Parents be falling for fake news since before the internet
I showed my dad plenty of times which "watch now" button he has to click on a popular streaming site to actually watch the movie on our smart tv. And I mean lots of times, everytime he wants to watch something. 

A couple days ago I get a call that goes like this: "the website is telling me to enter my credit card info?" "Must've clicked an ad, I told you not to click that, I told you to click on the video" "I did exactly as you told me (spoiler alert: he didn't)" "I'm telling you that's a malicious site, don't enter any info, go back to the other page and click on the right one" "yeah but it only needs the info, they say they don't charge anything" "I told you that's not the right site, please do what I'm telling you since you're asking for help"

And then I hear my mom say "oh, so now you have to cancel those info". Fortunately he'd just put them and not sent them, but damn, how can you fall for that. 
I blame 60 minutes for much of the nonsense my parents bought into. 

Some of the dumbest segments I recall (mid-late 90's):

"Weight lifting during teen years will stunt height growth in exchange for muscle growth."

"Artificial sweeteners will make you stupid."

"Napster is Le Dark Web."

"Dr. Dudebro found the source of teen depression.... televisions in your child's bedroom."

"Stop eating Chinese food, because MSG will dissolve your organs."

....now that I think about it, 60 Minutes in the 90's was just clickbait TV.
Now to answer all the popups. Ooh a talking moose wants my credit card number, that's only fair.

Homer J. Simpson 
Why does this remind me a lot of the people screaming "They do bad stuff with our data", "our data" screamed in general?

Peopel don't realize they are the manipulated sheep even if one spreads it out in front of em.
I think you’re onto something. In the early days of Internet there were lots of scary stories about it on the nightly news. Also, there were some high-profile computer hacking cases. Computer crime was portrayed as some unstoppable sorcery, instead of people mostly conning passwords out of people or stealing shit from people who didn’t lock their doors properly.  Maybe, like the anti-drug propaganda of the era, it failed because people’s early experiences did not match with the level of terror that the news let them to expect,  so they wrote off even the parts of the advice that were good.
You need to use reverse psychology on them. They'll always hesitate when *you* tell them to click on something.
Ok, I clicked the link. What do I do now? 
It's actually due to some bias parents have towards children as they see them always as kids even as adults and don't listen to their opinion even when it's obvious they know their shit. There's a more scientific explanation of course. Anyways, convincing my mom Google Street view was literally just done with a car going around taking pictures and not via satellite (WTF mom) was stupidly difficult.
But that link is a news article /s
Nailed it
You should have hyperlinked the "don't click that link" to a "why would you do that?" image.
I am very glad my dad is a nerdy electrical engineering major. He got my brothers hooked on age of empires 2 as a kid. Only thing we had to correct him on was trebuchet not being pronounced tree bucket
I prefer tree bucket, thats the thing...my dad got me on doom when i was a kid...went out and got a sound card and installed it cause the pc didnt have one so we could then have doom with sound, i remember how exciting that was for me.
Spam emails about diet pills? Ooh better click that link. 
Older people just take the news as the truth. They don’t care to make their own decision.
Well, if she makes it back alive, she should be able to get a replacement kidney cloned in about 15 years
She's so dead. If she's not I don't know? Sex slave, maybe they steal her organs maybe they make her into some sort of slave.

Just don't expect to see her again.
Post an update on her behalf if some shit happens!
yeah of course! if my mum disappears or dies, my first priority is to update the internet :)
sorry but this made me chuckle. Hope your mom is ok!
i hope so too. i just had a heart-to heart discussion with her about this and she said she's been very careful, did a lot of research and has all the addresses etc and will keep us updated. i hope it goes okay.. she also confirmed they have been talking for about a month, which is way too little in my opinion, but she's an adult, I can't tell her what to do
Sadly I know your struggle very well first hand, my mom divorced my dad 5 years ago and she discovered tinder about six months ago. She went out with a guy and slept at his place *literally* the first day i installed the damn app for her. She called me next morning saying she had a broken rib because she fell off the bed... I had to skip work and take her to the er, turns out she got incredibly drunk and did fell off the bed but no broken ribs. I'm honestly still mad about it to this day. Hopefully she will listen to your advice!
ugh! moms. my mom and dad split up about 3 weeks ago and shes been talking to said guy for about a month. i really wish i knew how to keep her from going!
Yeah if everything goes well shut the fuk up but if anything interesting happens let us know
welcome to the internet :)
Mental.
I mean, lots of people in my area do that, but then again, europe has open borders and one of those is less then 10 miles away. 
yeah no im in europe too, she is going from estonia to italy, which is coincidentally her favourite country. but shes going alone and to someone she has known for a month. i hope she's gonna be okay
!RemindMe 2 Months
How do you match with people on tinder who live in another country...
i do not know, as i have never used tinder. i thought of it too, but i guessed there would be a way
You uhh... going to stop her?... I heard too many real life horror stories that start off like this.
My cousin fell for that shit 3 times in the ~2 years I had Facebook. each time I was like "You're a dumbass".

His only response was basuically "WAL U NVR NO IT CUD B REEL". ...No... No you dumbass.
She got the zucc
I just got this in my inbox from my MIL. 

These are the majority of voters in presidential elections, people. Think about that and please don't stay at home next time!
You could show her how easy it is to copy paste a picture of the zucc. 
Whoosh
My mom had a bunch of her younger friends trying to get her on Tinder and OK Cupid after her divorce. One day she ranted to me for like 5 minutes about all the sketchy losers that use the internet for dating before I was finally just like, I've been using those sites for years. You know my last two boyfriends that you loved so much that I dated for a combined 7 years? Yeah, I met them online. She just couldn't comprehend that it's completely normal now. It's so much more efficient than, say, trying to meet someone in a bar or nightclub. You don't have to buy anything or be drunk or leave your house even. And there are sketchy people everywhere. You can't get roofied through Tinder. 
You met your gf on Tinder? Careful dude!
So damned right it hurts.

My step dad was telling me the other day how he was trying to claim his free $1000 gift card, but they just kept asking him more and more questions.
I got one for you, my dad fell for a scam on the interwebz. He wanted a new phone (Iphone 6) and he found this "totally" legit website that offered it for 10 euro's less than the rest. What a steal! (Pun intended)

He ordered it. Then he showed it to me. I told him to cancel the payment immediatly and stop the money transfer. He said, nah, it'll be alright. Look, they even have a little logo with "Secure" on it. You cant put that logo on there, that would he illegal.

He never got his phone, or the money back.

Now I am in charge of any and all online purchases.
When my mam found out I met my boyfriend on tinder she started assuming everything about him is fake and that he must be a paedophile out to get me. We’ve been together 3 years and I don’t think paedos really want 24 year olds. 
Those also tend to be the sort of folks who won't change their opinion on something even if you present them with hard evidence, if my anecdotal experiences have any validity.
My mum is terrible for any scam going. Yet won't use official Internet banking or even telephone banking. The mind boggles. 
That's funny. I met your girl friend on tinder too!
What Scottish team do they follow? Asking for a friend...
Tell people there's an invisible man in the sky who created the universe, and the vast majority will believe you. Tell them the paint is wet, and they have to touch it to be sure.

― George Carlin
I've met a bunch of people off the Internet. We're now friends because of it
My dad did this. He fell for those voice alert popups from "Microsoft" that say he needs to call the number cause his computer is infected. He does it and gives the scammer  access and at the end the scammer gives my dad a price for "fixing it." My dad says it's too much and hangs up. I find out about all this a couple hours later cause he's pissed off that he can't get on his computer anymore and I told him it's a scam. It's not Microsoft. I showed him articles detailing everything which matched exactly what he went through. I told him it's a scam and don't touch your computer they have access to it now and that we can just fix it later and **don't call back or give him anything else**... Well, what does he do? He decides to call the number again asking who they work for he's going to file a complaint for poor service, and then argued with the scammer until he's blue in the face about fixing it NOW, he WON'T pay the price, and wanting to speak to his manager... and I'm just like "what the fuck is wrong with you it's a scammer he's not going to reason with you. I told you not to call back and what do you do? You didn't fucking listen." And I wasn't pissed that he fell for it I was angry that he dismissed everything I told him because he's a stubborn old man who always thinks he knows best.
Computer is infected.

Me: “Did you install this crapware on your computer?”

Dad: “It asked if I wanted to protect my computer, and I did.”

Me: ...
I met my husband on espinthebottle.com 16 years ago. My parents still think we met via mutual friends and I have no intention of telling them otherwise. 
Hits perfectly home. What is more, just weeks ago, my mom, instead of sending it via personal message - and ignoring my advice to use emails - posted the picture of my brother's credit card backside as her WhatsApp status; making both numbers visible in one singular picture.


Your parents and my parents are very different. My parents would never be able to use a tablet and they would absolutely scoff at the idea of breaking the law to watch television. I think they're at the point now where they *won't* install new search bars for no reason but they *will* install HP Printer drivers. 
My mom just emailed me something with my social security info on it.
Yep. I know a friend's parents who recently gave their SSNs away to some 3rd party website because they thought it might lower their mortgage rates. 
I met my boyfriend through Tinder. One year strong and we don't always tell people exactly how we met

Person: "isn't Tinder the app people use for hooking up for one night stands?"

Us: "Well... Yeah, but we didn't use it for that!"
There are tons of bad people on the internet- trust me, im most of them...
I married a tinder match.
Celtic or rangers is the only and most important question 
You never know, she could be a 50 year old man
Why wouldn't you just teach your parents how to safely stream Scottish soccer games rather than let them put putz around on those streaming sites that can be extremely shady. 
This comment hits far too close to home. I’ve explained today for the 100th time what a VIPLeague is and how to get the hibs Celtic game on it
She probably thinks all the viruses on her computer came from all those games you downloaded
r/soccerstreams
My dad and I share the same name. He’s tech illiterate. When I still had Facebook, I’d get messages all the time that I got hacked because I was posting those clickbait “I CANT BELIEVE SHES WEARING THAT!” posts. 

Nope. Him, every time. Multiple times. No matter how much I told him they’re scams, he was constantly getting hit with clickbait spam. 
She might roofie you, take your liver and you wake up on a tub of ice in Mexico
My mum refuses to use online shopping because “you don’t know if it’s going to be what you ordered. They could do anything to that”
Hah, my Dad is the same way. He thinks I'm an idiot for using Amazon.
Met my wife on tinder. 

It's our deep dark secret from the parents. 
Are you sure she’s a girl?
Hey, it’s me, your gf. 
Hey! I met my gf on tinder as well, been going strong for about a year and a half now. Meanwhile her mother has every online shopping app known to the Apple app store and thinks the entirety of Mexico is a completely safe tourist destination. 
You never know with girlfriends.
She is right about Grindr though 
I see we have the same parents.  
How long have you and your gf been together?
Nearly a year 
Congratulations 
Thanks bud
This is my FIL, right here.
you can find a gf on Tinder just like you can find a roommate on Craigslist. 

Not ideal and probably need to wade through a swamp of womp rats. But they're out there.
My parents did exactly that
That's why I don't tell anyone I met my boyfriend on a dating app
Haha...i heard my bfs mom was taken aback when she found out I was found on tinder
I met my husband as a pen pal back before the internet. We wrote letters through snail mail because long distance phone calls were too expensive. 
Better Tinder than OKC. Some reeeaaal weirdos on OKC.
To be fair, I've been on some risky sites in order to watch hockey. Haha
Lol my grandma won’t even keep her bank info on a word doc on her computer for fear of hackers. Then someone called her claiming to be from the bank and she happily handed over all her information. Luckily we found out and canceled everything before it was too late. 
Tinder? Oh shit better get tested for STDs
Way to humblebrag about the girlfriend :p

Yeah, even my father, who sold PCs as they were just taking off in Australia, has no idea about the modern internet. 
Except that [millennials are the most frequent victims of online scams](https://www.cbsnews.com/news/millennials-more-likely-than-seniors-to-fall-for-online-scams-research-shows/).

Most likely will get downvoted, but the empirical data shows they're also the least likely to be able to differentiate real from fake news.
Well yeah, population size. There's a lot more millenials using the internet than people over 60.
Can't turn a hoe into a housewife buddy. There's no chance you are the best she has had, and she will be thinking of that one hung dude and how he handled her just right while your flopping behind her with your little knob. Good luck, you're going to need it.
I call BS. No grandpa remembers his password. 
atleast he learn from his mistake (kinda). 
As scummy as banks can be you gotta give them credit for usually preventing fraud really early on
Incredibly common scam. Banks wont return funds unless they are available in the scamming account. Most victims permanently lose their money. WARN ALL OF YOUR ELDERLY LOVED ONES ABOUT THIS. IF IT'S THE ONE THING YOU CAN HELP THEM WITH.
I'm like 80% sure that this isn't true, and banks will return most of your money from any fraudulent charges. 
With debit/credit card fraud, you will always get your funds returned.
With "bank scams", "talk talk" or "microsoft" scams as they're most commonly refereed to, where the victim is convinced to send money from an unknown caller - you are more likely to lose your money than have it re-reimbursed by your bank. I had served as a fraud analyst for a long time, last dealing directly with victims in 2017, it is entirely true what i say and comes from experience and data. A lot of scammers are convinced that the bank will return the funds and this is how they can morally justify what they do.
Are you actually bitching about your 80 year grandfather being taking advantage of???? 

He's 80. Did he ever do what this post is about? Act uppity about the dangers of the internet? 

He's not even a Baby Boomer. He's older than them. 

People his age are targeted, something you should know. 
I can’t wait until I’m 80 and absolved of all personal responsibility. 
A kun conform dis.

Source: Am Nigerian Prince Odeh Bahallah III
[And British comedians](https://youtu.be/_QdPW8JrYzQ).
Look at me, I am your child now. 
A lot of older men do the same. 
I used to get that kind of response until I asked them if they would get into a shady van that said free candy on it and they seem to have understood.
They think each and everything is speaking directly, specifically to them. 
"Its called less cake and sit-ups MOM"
> My mom: "Well, it said there are five secrets to having a flat stomach! I want to have a flat stomach!

In order of importance:

1. Drink only water, and have water before any snack or meal. 
2. Eat better. 
3. Sleep more. 
4. Pick up heavy things and put them down again. 
5. Cardio. 
>google is considered fact checking.

I mean that isn't exactly wrong
does anyone actually do that shit with the fingers on the middle lane thing? i play a lot of video games so my fingers are already on the wasd keys. (not even kidding every time) fuckin once a teacher told me it's "not proper form" ??? once took that same bitch a solid 30 seconds to find the god damn f key. i don't need your stupid form. i'm typing fast enough and better that you. 
Not at all. Home row typing was invented because when the QWERTY keyboard released, it was an emerging job market for early-middle aged adults who hadn't grown up typing and needed some reference points. 

However, when you're tacking away on a keyboard since you've turned 8, it's a lot easier for us to form our own typing methods. Personally, I us 2 fingers on my left hand and 3 fingers on my write. Last time I check I typed about 113wpm. Much faster than what you would get with home row typing
>Much faster than what you would get with home row typing

much faster than *you* get typing in a way you haven't practiced. home row typing, once practiced, is definitely faster than pretty much every other method.

the point of home row typing is that ~30% of your keystrokes won't require any movement of your fingers across the keyboard. your typing style (and mine, which is nearly entirely left handed) probably requires movement for every keystroke.

switch to a Dvorak keyboard and start home row typing and you'll only have to move for ~60% of keystrokes. now that's speed

To each is his own. But the only people I personally know that swear by home row typing are the people who learned to type in their 30s+.

 Its easier for less elastic brains to grasp the uniformity of home row typing. I think it's easier for younger, more elastic brains to take note of key placement subconsciously and then to form your own typing style. 

NOTE: This is my opinion and in no way researched lol
I'm 21 and type this way. I've gotten a lot of comments on how fast I type as well.
I decided to break my usual typing habit I got since the first time touching a computer and actually learned the home row method last year, much more comfortable to type around.
No one likes a quitter!
I wish people will like how I keep leeching my parents after I graduate.
Haha leeching... no reason you can't live with your family and help everyone benefit over being on your own with high debt.  Independence is a great thing, but you can still be independent while in a community.
I go shift, a, w, f, spacebar with my left hand. I like the little bub on the f. Spacebar,j,I,o,semicolon with my right. It's not proper, but it works fine.
I know many who use home row and are amazing with wpm and accuracy.  If im in game mode and type quick between plays, i lose all hope of perfect spelling.  If im writing a long message or a paper. Then i use the most fucked up typing method, but it works so well since it's how i have typed since grade 5.
Like people actually fact check anymore.. anything you see on Facebook is true, right?
What the fuck is fact checking?
It's a type of cerial.   Google it .. *sigh*
Hello there!
General Kenobi
Watch "Star War: the third gathers", it's absolutely amazing. It's a translation of all the dialogue from English to Chinese, and then back to English. 

Edit: here's a link https://youtu.be/XziLNeFm1ok

Edit edit: learned to count and changed fourth to third 
Oh god, translators...
You don’t need to say edit twice, the comment was 44 minutes old. Just put a dash
Something something General Kenobi
I wonder if someday a new technology will be that incomprehensible for the elder us or the fact that we were young when computers entered people homes gave us kind of a jumpstart
Not understanding it is the frustrating part.
That's why there should be a cut off age. Once you hit 70 the government shoots you in the head. No exceptions for anyone. It would really solve a lot of the world's problems.
My mother is in this position right now and it is so frustrating. My family and I can't convince her to stop sending money to her imaginary boyfriend. Fuck scammers.
It still completely escapes me how people can fall for this, especially as we hear about it so often.
Exactly my girlfriend's mom. She is an educated and well-respected woman in her field but boy, she was scammed bad. It basically destroyed her marriage. My girlfriend's parents didn't divorce and still live under one roof but there is basically no communication. The dad was destroyed because of this. He doesn't trust anyone anymore. He doesn't even want to meet me and is saying to my girlfriend to break up with me because I'm with her just for her money. 

Scams don't destroy just the victims but also everyone around. 
i work at a banks credit/debit card section, and my colleagues deal with scams and fraud monitoring directly. The amount of people that fall for the "1€ iphone 8" scam and so on is crazy. I guess these scammers really do get something out of it. But equally terrifying is the amount of young people who have fallen for this skin care product scam, where they ask you to pay some sum for a legit product, but in the small print they say they will charge you 75€ a month. Customers call in and ask us to give them the money back, and usually its been going for months or years. Cant legally do anything since they signed up for it. 
People always laugh at me for reading the small print on everything but this type of thing is exactly why I do it.

A pretty tech savvy friend of mine who definitely could not be described as old badgered me for ages to sign up to some website which let you test and keep products for free.

I read the small print and within 1 minute discovered that if you signed up you were agreeing to all sorts of things in the small print where you would be charged money, have your details given away and all sorts of stuff. 

Cant remember the exact small print on that site but it only took like 2 seconds and 1 click to see the blatant scam. 

Yet when I told this guy why I wouldn't sign up because of this, and advised him to look he just didn't want to hear it and said I was missing out on free stuff. He really thought he was getting one over on this scam site by being possibly sent some cheap item for free.

To this day he has never received any test products, but it just goes to show you how scammers often take advantage of greed, laziness and arrogance. 
Fun fact the part of the brain involved in decision making is one of the first to degrade with age, it's why older people are so easily scammed. 
A friend of mine dated somebody online for ever and always bought them things. He planned to meet her, did, and never mentioned her again.
What baffles me is how these people get the money in the first place
Nah happens to men just as easily
Not fair at all, you yutes, you.

First of all, the only person I know who ever got scammed online was a guy friend. He fell for that shit hook, line and sinker to the tune of thousands of dollars.

It's never good to generalize about genders or generations. People my age helped make the internet. 

Now, me? Older redditor here of grown kids. I was playing Star Wars games (all text based) on a huge console at a university when I was 15 -- in the early 70s. The only thing I ever asked the kids to do was avoid sketchy game-cheat and porno sites, but the kids would always end up downloading cancer on our computers because, "What do you know about computers or the internet, Mom? Huh?"

"Enough to know which sites to avoid, and how to get the GD PC running again."

I eschew facebook et al, yet I have taken so much crap about it. Then, the same young people all up in their facebook start parroting shit they read on facebook like monkeys. I just roll my eyes.

There are lots of young people falling for crap on the internet, and plenty of us ancients who are savvy. 

The only advice I have to give you "superior" young people is this: Join the people like me in November and VOTE.

Edit: I love the downvotes for giving another perspective. 

Can't have any of that! Happy Saturday everyone, and may your wee narrow minds open up a crack and let in the brilliant light this lovely weekend. :-D

Can’t ruin that narrative that it’s just dumb old ladies getting catfished.
Yeah, the internet never existed before the yutes came along. Thank goodness, or heaven knows what I would have done without them!

It's only the old ladies who can't figure the whole thing out and stay away from scams. Sure. ;-)
The downvotes were probably from the inferred condescension, not another perspective. 
Reminds me of my grandmother Edna.
Oh my God, same problem. Except this guy is in prison. 
Still better than Benny Hinn and the like.
Happened to my mom. She gave away $30,000. I feel so bad, guilty, and annoyed. The worst part is she was in **no** position to lose that much money. She's not rich, and is doing a bit better than just scraping by. I've just resorted to not even thinking about it. 
This happened to a family friend and she was genuinely crushed when she realised it wasn’t real and he’d scammed her out of £5000.
honestly exactly this. still have no idea how my co-workers infect their pcs with crazy shit while having every measure possible active, while claiming they only use it for emails. ¯\\\_(ツ)_/¯ 
Who uses a screensaver anymore? Besides, most online threats these days are phishing and scams rather than viruses.
I work at a PC repair and refurbishing place. We'll get PCs filled with malware half a day after the customer gets it. I have no idea where they get this shit. 
The best way to infect your computer is to search for an antivirus on Bing or any program that will "speed up" your computer.
> Boss sees you watching porn at work   
      
“It’s a VM, I’m just trying test my hardening... and it’s working!”
Weirdly that sounds kind of fun, like throwing caution to the wind and clicking on "single Muslims in you area".
Install an outdated version of Java runtime. Go on Facebook and install every crapware game you can find. Boom. You're now part of 80 botnets.  

I think the porn sites and free X sites in general aren't a very high rate of spreading malware. I think they mainly target the ad impressions. Social media is a main avenue of spreading it.
Errr. My dad can out smart you in 15 minutes if you're looking for malware. 
I monitor the "info" adress in a 500+ employees business. We get about a dozen different viruses per day via mail, without counting phishing. Worms, trojans, cryptos, you name it. I keep them neat and tidy in a folder.
go to thepiratebay, download something that has lots of seeds but no skull, open and install it(even if it's supposed to be a movie)
*"Sweet! Avengers: Infinity War is on here. And it's only 23mb!"*

~downloads avengrsinfinitywarsmovei.exe~
 **avengrsinfinitywarsmovei.avi.exe*
Bought a new monitor recently, a guy connected it to their computer for a check, the computer had a screen saver on. I decided to troll a little bit and said: “wow, this display have a nice default screen saver, I won’t change it back home”. Should have seen his face. 
How do you know you are not infected? Most viral attacks are deliberately silent. You could have any number of custom keyloggers, and never know a thing. 
I would take note of every running process, save every loaded executable, library and kernel file before test and look for differences after possible infection (programmatically ofc). Wouldn't that catch most of it?
Yes it would. Most viruses and keyloggers are deployed by script kiddies with no idea how to hide it. Actual quality polymorphic or silent malware is incredibly rare and you aren't going to catch it without specialized tools anyway.
Should be noted modern malware recognize VMs and dont infect them for several reasons. 
"You have a virus pay us 100$" 
"You won a cruise" 
What? Free porn? Where's that? 
Most free porn is virus free these days. They run it like spotify: ads with free, premium has no ads
Watchin series that also run on tv will give you so manny credit card traps, thats the new kind of virus 
Lol, windows vista and up are almost completely virus proof, I don't get how most people even get viruses nowadays even without an antivirus. 
I'm surprised they've not all moved to hidden bitminers. 
Could also just leave all ports open and public facing with default credentials like a Honeypot. Then you'd get hits every 20 minutes at least.
You were going about this the wrong way, free porn sites are decently maintained, the only time I fucked up my PC with malware was when I was checking out the webside of a company I did an inturnship with. Besides the fact that the webside looke as old as it was(had last been updated 6 years prior) and the data behind it was so crooked I couldn't print out a logo I found on there properly(and I tried it with three different printer/computer setups), I also got a host of viruses that fucked my pc real good.

TL;DR if you want viruses, go for some old, loughably maintained stuff.
... this was beautiful.

Although I'm 27 and very technically adapt, my father taught me everything I know. Still I think this is great.
Then they got eaten by a giant fuckin' shark, and took the whole country with em.
Poetic, but accurate for all that. 
How profound and thought provoking
This sounds like the opening line to some sci-fi movie 
Believe it or not, it’s actually *not* obligatory to exclaim that you got gilded.
I think you meant flounder otherwise that was nice.
No. Founder means to begin to sink. 
huh. TIL
Founder is accurate. "fill with water and sink." http://www.dictionary.com/browse/founder
This is awesome.
flounder?
Well since you already edited now you can add in that l
Sums it up nicely 
They found Sheila-a La Beoueuaf's stupid flag pole using jet trails and stars in the sky of a live feed.
ahh i remember that. someone has to destroy that stone
Last year, I saw a post on Reddit where we could see a guy standing outside his house with some street plates visible. I can't remember what it was about. But using the street names, I could easily find his adress. I told the guy through private message that it could be harmful. My account got banned for this.
Yeah, I think it is since social media has become mainstream a lot of people, who don't understand how the internet works and the culture of the internet, came along and assumed that how to do things on the internet is the same as the rules of real life. So we have a bunch of people who post stupid things that could easily allow someone to find their personal details, and are then shocked that someone took their personal details. (see also: facebook selling peoples data)
A guy I know is basically just really really nosy. A bit of a stalker some might say. 

Once when I was at his house he was watching some dudes YouTube channel. All that was visible in the videos were some shots of the guys hands and the inside of the guys kitchen.

I swear when I was next at his house, in the matter of a few days, the guy I know had found out the guy in the video's hometown, street address even the supermarket he shopped at.

All this just from some little starting bits of info he got about the guy online, from things he had seen or heard in the guys videos, and googling the guys username etc 

The guy in the videos was from a different country too so it's not like he was local or any local knowledge played a part in figuring it out.

Genuinely pretty worrying. 
9gag meme stone lives on
If only there was a Spanish annon who could go and smash it 
Probably don't even need the number plate. Just ask /r/Geoguessr.
Isn’t there now a plan to bring salad dressing to the site to melt the rock?
Yeah, but I've not seen anyone actually do it. Would be interested to see that happen though. 
Never underestimate the power of weapons-grade autism. God, HWNDU was the most entertaining thing to come out of 4chan over the last few years. That was just gold.
Weaponized Autism is the new nuclear wepons, it is only a matter of time until this is used in military situations. 
They’re also hilariously wrong sometimes. Once I was told after some of them got a hold of some of my profile pics that I was one N. Degtev out of Syvtyvkar, based on the types of trees visible and «the cloud formations.» I played along while they doxxes the poor guy in the belief it was me. I suppose they were only off by about 2000 miles. 
lol
Weaponised autism
I was hoping you were gonna pull some kinda twist, like the prince showed up and said that for your lack of trust, he's disowning all of you and not giving you any money.
In college I had a Nigerian roommate who was really wealthy. I’m waiting for the day 10 years from now when I get an email from him and my kids tell me it’s a scam. The looks on their faces 
Maybe in 1994 it wasn't a well known scam. Maybe as late as 2000ish. But by 2004 the Nigerian prince scam was well known to the point of being a joke about gullibility. ('Hey, I got a bridge in Brooklyn to sell you!' 'Got some oceanfront property in Arizona if you're interested!' 'I know this Nigerian prince with some money to give away.' And so on...) Every adult in my school, neighbourhood, and local libraries for my entire high school career (I graduated in 2005) was well aware of the 419 Scam. And they weren't all tech savvy adults. A lot of them were still struggling with the concept of the remote control. But they knew that every Nigerian prince was a scam.
Wasn't the guy finally caught a few months back? The Nigerian prince is actually a middle-aged American
Pretty sure there is more than one Nigerian prince scammer, lol.
Dude, I haven't seen a chain message in like 10 years.. Are they still a thing?
The cutoff is older then 40.  We are the Gen that learned about the internet around college age.  It's people over about 55 you're talking about.
Don't you mean over the age of 60? I feel like people in their 40s now are relatively capable on computers
Dude some of my friends send me every few weeks about jesus or god because us filipinos are very christian and all that.
In every multigenerational WhatsApp group the most active poster is someone above 50 who would send 10 images and 5 chain messages a day despite no one acknowledging any one message. 
Christ..  That aunt I see once every 10 years whom I gave my email address to, stupidly, at a family reunion..

After 2 weeks and like 2-3 garbage emails a day, she forwarded one of those friggin ones with a photo of a family and "little Jimmy is dying of herzoplatzmaceptimania and is collecting (whatever) before he dies, send to;...."  in an email with what had to be 25+ addresses visible in CC: field..

So I took 10 seconds to google and then Reply All'd and as politely as I could, pointed out that this email was over 10 years old, little Jimmy was fine and that a huge Cc: list was a mistake..

Neevvver got another email..
I dont even know what a chain message is lmao
> people I know over the age of 40

Yo what the fuck
My Dad still doesn't believe the internet is safe to buy stuff off and considers me a fucking moron because I use Amazon all the time.

Why? Because "THEY COULD SEND YOU ANYTHING THEY WANTED AND YOU WOULDN'T BE ABLE TO DO A DAMN THING ABOUT IT! You could order a shelf and get a screwdriver!!!!".

Yeah, see, Dad, you have no idea what you're talking about, BECAUSE THAT'S CALLED FRAUD.
The funny thing is we are going down the exact same path with crypto currency and Bitcoin. No one believes until they do
This is good for bitcoin
Completely healthy and expected
Its not even comparable lol. What can I buy ith bitcoin? Not a whole heck of a lot.
>What can I buy ith bitcoin?

US dollars.  You're right though, they'll probably worthless soon.
Burritos
Drugs, maybe?
Or socks. It’s a currency.
Nah Monero is better for that
A hitman. 
It's exactly the same thing you just don't realize it yet
He shouldn't use paypal, they are a trash company that regularly seizes user's money and then demands THEM to prove the money is legit and their's or else they keep it for themselves.
Source?
Search for 'Paypal freeze/frozen accounts' there are tons of stories [but here is a quick article I saw](https://lifehacker.com/5821634/why-you-should-ditch-paypal-and-use-these-other-services-to-send-people-money). One of the representitive stated reasons for freezing an account and all the money in it is having a low credit score and receiving a significant deposit or purchase into your account, most commonly freezing all that money for a 6 month review at best. There are even multiple anti-paypal dedicated sites like 'paypalsucks.com
This is why I'm glad I live in Portugal. Whenever I want to pay for something online I can go to the bank's website, generate a one time use credit card, with a spending limit, do the purchase and not worry about external companies. And it is all completely free.

This has existed in Portugal for more than 10 years, I have no idea why they never tried to expand to the rest of Europe or the US.
That is a really great idea. I hope they start that here in the UK. 
There are plenty of accounts from users typically the ones that don't under how a risk model works, posting their horror experiences. PayPal is fine, never had any problems with it. 
Same. I keep over 1k USD in there almost all the time for my side business and they never fuck with me and they are very secure. This is just hearsay.
Regardless of how the company manages the business, and that I know they're shit *which is why I never put money in my PayPal account* but they actually are a legitimate payment method.
Well, Amazon is not really that common to use here in Norway, it’s pretty far down the list of popular sales sites, and most people still prefer physical stores. So yeah, older people often shy away from it, particularly as they tend to distrust sites with .com in their url. 
Yeah my mother is also constantly falling for stuff. Gmail is pretty good about filtering out known scams, but then she will go into her junk mailbox and ask me if maybe it is true that someone died and left her 100k... 
I'm just thankful my grandma actually forwards the phishing emails to me first before falling for them. Wasn't always the case, she's come a long way
My mom fell for this once. :(
OMG, yours knows how to forward an e-mail? You didn't have to teach her to copy paste the contents and sent them to you?
My mom is actually pretty sharp. She lectures anyone who calls from the “Canada Revenue Agency” asking for her information.  Go mom! 
Install Chrome. as far as I know, it doesn't support toolbars.
the same could be said for a gf you met irl, and went on several dates with :)
Jesus, that's so savage ;D
Same with mine. He still knows more than I do about computers. 
Comments like this make me optimistic. I’m 30 and extremely tech savvy but I have this strange fear that I’m going to hit 50 and be like “all that there new dangled technology!” 

Like, I don’t see that happening logically, but it’s a fear nonetheless. Kind of like when seaweed touches your foot in the ocean. 
> computer wizard. 

Oh, so that's who's been installing my software. 
Mine is a network security engineer. He's the only reason we have WiFi and a decent internet connection (we live in the countryside). My mum's no tech wizz but she at least seems to be able to use common sense when browsing the internet.
Computing back then was done by wizards so I'm not supprised 
Same. I am getting there, but still.
My mother is a retired Library Director who's up on technology.  I'm so grateful. 
Congratz
Bots? Ai? Alexa? I.o.t. there's a lot more if you think about it.
Not using critical thinking skills. Too much misinformation on the internet.
Stupidity
Show them the documentary, Idiocracy.
«Son, do not believe your sexbot when it says it does not see others.» >My wife cheats on me with my son’s sexbot. 
Something like this perhaps? https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=A81IwlDeV6c
Run a homemade video about this during Fox & Friends. Bonus points because you now have the assurance the president will see it and speak (inaccurately) about it, on twitter if nothing else.
r/shubreddit
Dammit Sean Connery HOW MANY FUCKING TIMES DO I HAVE TO TELL YOU DON'T CLICK ON THAT....ugh pass me the fucking instalation disc...   
This is really common here. I'm not sure if it's just my town that's full of complete idiots or if it's a Canada-wide thing, but our local police have to remind people not to fall for this ALL THE TIME.  
Scammers will phone people, say they owe money to Canada Revenue Agency  (Canada's taxation authority) and they need to pay it with iTunes gift cards or they'll be arrested.
People ignore the fact that the CRA doesn't phone people, the CRA won't arrest you, and why the fuck would the Canadian government want iTunes gift cards?!
I seriously don't understand how anybody would think a legitimate business or government would take iTunes cards as payment. Unless of course you're actually trying to buy shit on iTunes
Down with the bourgeoisie the upper class the 1% and the monarchy.
Found the wizard
Yer a wizard, installation.
Oh, people like me.
Actually, my elderly neighbor came to me just a couple of weeks ago asking if I could get her computer to work. It's a Gateway. I told her I'm amazed it's worked for the last 5+ years, and it's time for a new computer. She pulled out a very nice laptop that she's never used because it "needs AOL installed on it."  Of course she uses AOL for email and doesn't want to change. She was thrilled when I bookmarked the AOL email site and told her that was all she needed.
Ugh...  My dad fell for the "Microsoft call" a few months ago (but fortunately he had his suspicions and asked me about it so we were able to stop the payment/change info in time) but it was a pretty big bummer to see someone so smart fall for such an obvious scam... he is a technological idiot though so some things just can't be helped.
Can we hit Korean sweatshop workers?
There was some flash game ages and ages ago that had a pop-up ad that was triggered from you clicking the instructions. Thing is, it was always the same pop-up ad. I revisited it about 5-6 years later just to laugh at the datedness of "your free PSP" or whatever it was. Wish I remembered what it was so I could revisit for old times sake... 
Can we hit sweatshop workers?
No Korean on this one, why lol
Because it's racist if you repeat it 4 times
Mate I'm sorry my internet fucking killed itself at that moment
Just like a Korean sweatshop worker?
Because Neo replied
It's not pay-per-click it's pay-per-view,  all that's important is that you see it, not that you use it.
A lot of ads are placed in a way where you accidentally click on it.

Ever notice on mobile how pages don't have any ads, but just as you try to click on a link an ad shows up at the top and pushes everything down by one?
Yes, it's enraging. 
I know the pain - I'm supposed to be downstairs more because it's fun to talk to each other. Know what everyone does? Sit on their phones all the time, playing games
Hey, same. My dad's a software engineer so I really don't have to worry about him
My dad in a programmer in his 60s who worked with ibm, Microsoft and apple at one point I think, and he still falls for this shit and it blows my mind. 
My dad used to work in IT at a Nippersink school around 2 years ago. When I got my first computer he installed Ubuntu and basically told me, "good luck" and walked away. Whenever I needed help it was a case of, "I'll get you going but other than that, Google it." I learned a whole lot more than my brother who got everything fixed for him.
Yeah, I got interested in programming and everything because I installed Ubuntu on my laptop (I now dualboot Windows 10 and Arch Linux) 
For technology nothing teaches you more than google.
I've installed MP3 Rocket. A discount Limewire on to the back then family computer.
He's going for the long con. When you eventually die, he *will* take all your stuff, mark my words.
Survival Bias. 
Jane? 
Dick? Jane? Is that you?
The worst are people who believe every "documentary" they see on youtube just because someone slapped together some stock footage and recorded a voice over, I've known people of various ages, ideology and intelligence do this 
My Mom is kinda the opposite. She believes that ABSOLUTELY NOTHING you read on the internet is true, because "people can say whatever they want!"... However, if it's on the TV? Then it must be true. You can't say false things on TV!

...Yes. She believes that ancient aliens bull shit.
Well I mean she’s not wrong. Sometimes you have to know what you’re signing and give away before you click accept. 
Ha those thing technically are not even binding in court.. Or am i thinking if something else that's all law talk crap but doesn't actually matter... Correct me if I'm wrong.
Edit: guess they are somewhat binding. Depends.
Edit 2. Typos

Terms and conditions are just like any ither contract. For internet stuff, it really matter how the terms define internet points, because that determines if they have real world value, like reddit gold or the value of digital MTG cards.
They are technically legally binding contracts, as per the Supreme Court case Nguyen v. Barnes & Noble. The Court draws a distinction between manifesting assent to be bound through (1) "clickwrap" agreements, or (2) "shrink-wrap" agreements. Clickwrap end user license agreements (the more formal term for those pesky terms of service, referred to as EULAs) are treated as legally binding, because you have to physically click a button that demonstrates you consent to the terms in the agreement. Even if you haven't actually read those terms (in law, this is called "duty to read" and you don't have one for a contract like this to be binding). Shrink-wrap agreements on the other hand are not typically binding, because you haven't done anything beyond just browsing the website to manifest consent to the terms (see Sgorous v. Transunion, where the terms of service did not bind the petitioner because the website merely said "By continuing to checkout, you agree to the Terms of Service", and the Court found clicking a button you were going to click anyway on a website you were presumably going to remain on to finish your purchase did not constitute a manifestation of consent). Shrink-wrap agreements can be binding if the design of the website makes it absolutely clear that to go any further, you must agree to the EULA, and the easiest way to do this is by having you click a lil box...which is why shrink-wrap as applied to the internet is mostly dead, since most sites just revert to the legally-binding clickwrap version. 

Just because the Supreme Court thinks this is so, however, doesn't keep state legislatures and federal agencies from creating restrictions on their use and content. In the cases I can think of, the issue is usually over whether the person is bound to a mandatory arbitration agreement that is one of the terms in the EULA they clicked "agree" to but never read (raising Due Process concerns because of lack of access to a trial in a court of law). The Federal Arbitration Act dictates what constitutes a legally kosher arbitration must look like, and is pretty lax about certain things in ways that state courts might be more protective of. For example, the Supreme Court actually struck down a California state law cracking down on mandatory arbitration clauses  as inherently against public policy/"unconscionable" [legal term], because it conflicted with the FAA's allowance for such terms in contracts...but Congress could presumably amend the FAA to say that mandatory arbitration is unconscionable and there would be no conflict if state laws wanted to then mimic CA in the future. Also due to certain judicial review principles, if a federal agency wanted to put out a rule/regulation concerning the enforcement of EULAs that conflicted with the Court's own views, the Court would likely have to defer to that agency's reg so long as Congress had granted them authority to address that issue and their reg was not unreasonable (even if the Court thinks there's a better reg they should have produced, the Court defers to the agency's direct expertise usually). But as my Administrative Law professor would say, "Watch this space!" Gorsuch is not a fan of this principle of courts deferring to agency interpretations of their power to regulate (see his testimony at his confirmation hearings on the "Chevron Doctrine"), and Thomas has also found the practice unconstitutional, so this might shift if the makeup of the bench shifts.  

Source: Am a law student and a TA for Contract Law next fall. Take my description with a huge grain of salt, as I don't actually practice this kind of law (yet!). 
They’re contracts of adhesion (meaning no negotiation is possible). This type of contract is allowable, but only if it falls within the broader guidelines of the UCC (in the US) and principles of common law (everywhere else in the English-speaking world). Local laws will also apply. 

That means it can’t be illegal, have abusive or unconscionable clauses (eg ‘by clicking yes, you agree to give us full access to 100% of everything you do online’), or penalty clauses (‘if you violate any of these terms, you agree that we now own your computer’), among other examples. 

Civil law, such as is used by the rest of the world, has similar provisions, but uses a slightly different mechanism. Namely, it has a positive duty to act in good faith (common law only has a negative duty to not act in bad faith), so anything that would violate that would automatically negate the whole thing in most circumstances. 
They are, you cannot escape apple if you accepted on the terms and conditions to be part of their new human centipede program, unless you're a minor.
They aren't binding in Europe. I don't know about America though.
They use them to possibly protect themselves in court, as a demonstration that they informed you about something, but ultimately it's the judge to decide
You are correct.  Due to them not being able to prove that the average user has actually read them, they are not legally binding.  
My nana prints them out and keeps them in a folder in a filing cabinet. 

She's really good with her iPad and doesn't fall for scams and such, but we still like her nana quirk. 
Good for her, she can join us in the group of people who are confused about why everyone is pissed at Facebook even though this is like the 5th time weve been through this shit. And the answer every time is.

Read your TOS.
*”Account will be logged off due to 10 minutes of inactivity...”*

&nbsp;


*”Press ‘OK’ to stay logged on...*


&nbsp;

*^^^bypressingokyouagreetoourTOS”*
Somehow, she's equally pissed about "muh privacy."
That's also a good thing. Far too many people are willing to sacrifice their privacy on the internet.
And you should. 
I mean, if you don't download the shadiest bottomest link on your search, you should be fine on TPB.
Classic
"But it might work for us!"
- Tobias Funke
>gulable
G u l a g 
Did I spell it wrong? I have no idea. 
The weird thing is that if you try and Google "gullible" it doesn't show any results.
Nice.
It’s gulliable 
It’s spelled gullible. You’re welcome
 Lol. Down voted for admitting to not knowing something. 
It's not in the dictionary, so spell it however the fuck you wish, I guess.
And all the times you were masturbating to porn.

I think we know why you have "wrist problems"

🤓
Wait, they would use chrome? But it doesn’t have the internet logo on it?
If I remember correctly we installed it ha
But, the internet IS the that e icon isn’t it? e for internet?
My biggest pet peeve is when they won't let you do a fresh installation because "then they'd lose everything" and when you tell them to just back up their documents/important files first they "have no idea where that stuff is".  

There's no excuse this day and age for being intimidated by having to reinstall the handful of programs you use and to not *know* where your important documents are/not have them on a cloud service or external drive of some sort already.  

Also... - Asking *you* what program they use to do a certain task or what their own password is and not understanding the difference between logging to email through a client/application or through the site with a browser (and then looking at you like you're an alien *and* an asshole for using words like *"client"* and *"browser"*.
Insightful.
Oh god don’t get me started on them leaving their phones on, my dad literally just leaves it on the side, switched on WHILE CHARGING 
I was also offered mod-ship at a section of the Digital Point forums (when they were huge, before the owner returned and turned it to shit) but revoked when the admin inquired my age and I was 15.
So you make websites for a living now?
Nope. I do freelance as a web developer sometimes and get involved in web projects, including some of my own. But because I did business in college (a "proven money making degree"), I pivoted into digital marketing.

So I still do work with websites, but I can't compare myself with a current day developer who has been doing it for 10 years.
I hope it ended in a way she understood more than before
Yep, same here. My dad was way ahead of the curve it seems. 
I’m experiencing this hell. 

My MIL is an immigrant from Latin America. She watches Fox News all day long and lectures my children on “The Evil Rapist Mexicans” when she sees them.

They have filled her with so much hatred that my wife, kids, and I can no longer have the same kind of relationship with her.
How does one hate their members of their own ethnicity for being of that ethnicity?
Latin Americans can be from other places than Mexico, like any of the countries in South America. And like how Americans and Canadians are almost interchangeable to someone outside of North America we still tend to have biases and stereotypes about each other it's the same way with South American countries. I remember when I lived in Puerto Rico ( yes, I know it's not a South American country) I remember them making fun of Mexicans for talking too slow and said they were dumb. 
Fox News did this to my grandmother as well. I no longer have the same relationship with her as I used to.
r/thathappened 
In europe they dont have foxnews but old people still dont understand computers.
Just like irl sex workers
My mum is on level 1500+ and my dad 2200+ :/

The worst part is my dad is a tech guy, and he "doesn't easily fall for internet scams"
tell me about.  she used to have some sort of coupon printing program on her computer until I took it off because it was locking everything up even when not opened.

fuck knows what it was doing 
How does one OD on roblox?
When i was little and the family computer got a virus i would get blamed and sometimes even got in actual trouble for it. (like punishments) usually thr logic was video games and the websites i would go on. Now guess who hasnt had a goddamm virus/malware on their computer  for 20 years but has to go over and fix his parents computers on a regular basis....... To be fair i yell at them now. 
Computer kept freezing up/being slow. Dad blamed it on my Diablo game. "A game named Diablo has to be malicious!". Dad had tons of porn saved to the computer. I wonder which of us is to blame for the computer being slow.
The what?!
Yo whats the deal with roblox? My little siblings play that... 
There's nothing wrong

Just make sure they get outside every once in awhile
Hah, that makes sense
There are SOME Pedos and people who Online Date, but your siblings should be fine. If you want more info, check some of greenlegocats000's videos!
Thought you meant ODera as in overdosers, I was like wow kids in Roblox are really going hard now huh ? Then I remembered online dating lol
~kids these days~ lmao
Can you explain the dangers of Roblox? My kids are on it all the time and i know its kind if violent but i didnt realize there were predators 
I'm on my phone rn, when I get to my PC I'll write a text explaining it. But essentially, as long as your kids don't go to Discord or other chats outside of Roblox, OD or give personal info, they're totally fine
Well as far as i know theyre not doing any type of chatting. And i plan on keeping it like that. 
In my 10 years of playing I can say that 90% of the time, these pedos are just other children. It only takes that 10% though. I guess people would rather be safe than sorry. 
Ye, that's right. But you never know when that "13y old girl" is actually a 56y old male psycho.
The fuck's an ODer? Other than the drug-related definition anyway.
In fairness, I have seen people get a bundle of spyware from downloading roblox, so that one isn't necessarily impossible.
have played roblox for 11 years, was OD’er ):
There were some pretty bad ads on roblox back in the day, but you could get past that by *not clicking on them*
Ugh. My dad isnt ignorant in terms of scams or knowledge of companies. He just refuses to learn new skills. In his defense he knows how to turn on the video streaming on the xbox 1. So i guess he doesnt give a fuck because he has all the tech he needs. But still.
Same with my dad, I was still under his plan because he was grandfathered into a truly unlimited data plan with Verizon. He wanted me to pay for the internet portion of the bill but wouldn't accept money through Paypal. I had to mail in a check each month to him. 
“PayPal, a fully encrypted site that doesn’t allow companies to even view my payment info, is gonna steal my money! Now excuse me while I send a check with my account and routing number on it thru the mail for someone to process in person with little to no oversight in an office located God only knows where”
>firstly, Microsoft is a reliable and not-shady company

( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)

Have you used Windows 10?
Yeah, you deserve 500 upvotes for this. Microsoft have proven to use Windows 10 as legitimised spyware but is still loved by millions, just like Facebook is still loved after recent scandal! 
Classic :}
So when they’re older than you?
Make your own Paypal account.
Yeah I was 13 at the time. Obviously this is not an issue now that I’m an adult. 
It's 'cause they're ~grown-ups~ /s
Turns out that information wasn't so dangerous to publish online, otherwise there'd be a lot more articles and outrage/deterrents about internet-usage in general. 

Still gotta be careful about those email scams and potential future blackmailers tho. But a private FaceBook page shouldn't be so risky, seems like that's where most parents spend their time online at.
At least your mom reads what's written on the screen. Mine is like:

"There was a message on my phone and I don't know what to do?" - "Okay? And what did it say?" - "I don't know, I didn't read it." - "And how am I supposed to help you without knowing what I'm helping you with?" - *shrug* "I thought you were the expert."

Also good:

"There's a message on my screen, that says if I want to XYZ (like if she wants to set number as default number for this contact). What do I click?" - "Well, do you want to do XYZ?" - "Yes." - "Then you obviously have to click yes." - "Are you sure?" - "._."
That's when you intentionally navigate to some sketch site with this kind of popup and show her how you handle the situation on your phone.
Its like they believe 100% of whats written down because its a computer.
My father in law does this ALL TEH FUCKING TIME. I've seriously told him "Any time something tells you it's going to fix a problem with your computer, call me first" He promises he will. He never does. Then I'll be at his house and he'll ask me to help him with something. I open his computer and it has more infections than Paris Hilton's snatch. 
More infections than the CDC...

(as an alternative to shaming someone, especially a woman, for having sex)
You shouldn’t be getting hate for this, it’s gross how people casually use female anatomy for shock value
Wah Wah Wah
Look, it’s not a huge deal I just think people can be more considerate and make jokes without using women as the butt of them
all the time.
Wah Wah Wah
Jesus Christ...boo fucking hoo. No need for white-lighting here jackass. Really getting annoyed by people like you. This is not the time or place to get political. Someone made a joke, didn't know we weren't allowed to do that anymore.
I always thought the term was “white-knighting?” 
I think they're mixing up gas-lighting and white-knighting 
It is.
Dude white lightning is liquor. You meant white knighting.
It's not political. I really hope you take the time to watch this. [Laci Green](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ukJoVHfEBGs&sns=em) does a really awesome job explaining why this is harmful and why you should care.

Protect the women in your life. 
It says there may be a virus though. Shouldn't I get rid of the virus? 
im 100% sure she asked after clicking lmao
maybe it's Alzheimer...
Just the one though
Someheimer
Maybe it's Maybelline
My mum repeatedly taps the mousepad on her laptop to wake it up and open up the Windows 10 lockscreen. I've told her she can just press space but she dismisses it saying she's busy. Mad.
GOD I hate the "I don't do that!"  Like I literally see you do it every single day with my own eyeballs!! I'm just trying to help!!
Quadruple clicking a link five times and wondering why chrome just opened a bunch of instances.

> *THIS THING HAS MIND OF ITS OWN!*
I feel instant regret clicking this thread. It’s too early in the morning for an aneurism. 
my grandma didn't understand the concept of a double click and when i finally managed to explain it often enough she clicked way too slowly so i told her to double click a little faster and what does she do...

she clicks just as slow but smashes the mouse button now.
I and most other people that grew up with tech have learned to completely ignore ads. Old people seem to be the ones that are falling for it. Every...time...
You can get viruses on anything if someone writes for it.
I had some adware manage to install itself on the root partition of my phone (it survived clean installs of android). Don't search random porn sites on your phones, people.
I've gotten those virus pop ups from major websites like CNN or my local news. I feel like one must have gotten into the major ad service they're using for their mobile sites.
On Android the App Store is pretty much entirely unregulated, so anyone can make anything and put it on there, like a virus. Apple is slightly better in this regard because all apps have to be approved but it’s still possible to get viruses snuck in.
The play store has got better recently with the introduction of "Google play protect"
That’s interesting how does it work?
It protecc
 
It doesn't slacc
 
but most importantly
 
It no longer attacc
Take a look:

https://www.android.com/play-protect/
That’s better then, obviously can be turned off but hopefully it’s enough to stop a tech illeterate parent from ruining their new phone 
Scans any installed apps for viruses at regular intervals. 
It’s Google’s antivirus
I don’t recall there ever being a virus downloaded from the App Store onto iPhone. The sandbox apps are restricted to is designed to prevent this from being possible.

I know there has been a few cases of malware making it through.

Any references on the virus claim for iPhones?
~~This is really not true at all. Do you honestly believe that Google would let people upload viruses to their marketplace and willingly distribute it? Do you not think there would be an immense PR and legal backlash?~~

~~Do some research: [Play Protect](https://www.android.com/play-protect/
)~~
Actually it is 💯 true. There is a specific option to view only trusted/verified apps in the store and an option to see non verified ads.

Before you have a knee jerk reaction and make bold statements on how things cannot possibly be true, perhaps you first ask yourself if you have actual experience and expertise in the area, before making said statements. 
FEELINGS > facts 
I do have experience in the area. Please show me that option on the regular Play Store.
I'll let you do your own research and search for Non Play Protect apps. 

You're a genius and above admitting that you were wrong about a subject that you were not very knowledgeable about. That must be very difficult for the ego. 

Listen dude or dudette. It's not a big deal not knowing everything. You'll gain a lot more respect in life by only talking when knowledgeable and when not, admitting that you lack the knowledge and were incorrect. 
I haven't edited any comment, my comment contained the link for Play Protect from the beginning. 
I asked you to show me the option to view non regulated apps. I haven't claimed to be an expert, I haven't claimed to be a genius or anything of the sort. **You** are the person throwing around nonsensical accusations. Grow the fuck up.

Edit: Notice my comment at the bottom says "edited". The comment you claimed I edited [does not](https://i.imgur.com/Tf7wdYn.png).
If the Play Protect was in the original post, I apologise. I thought that was edited back in. (See how difficult that is). 

Unfortunately you still proliferated spreading incorrect information and don't seem interested in correcting it. Now anytime someone reads the comment, they'll be led to believe that the Play Store is far more protected than it is, because the great Google wouldn't allow it not to be. 

What is true is that Google has worked dilligently to improve the Play Store. What is true is that it's also much riskier than the Apple app marketplace. That's okay and is by design. People that purchase Android often do so because of the flexibility and customability of the system. It's a selling point. 

https://support.google.com/googleplay/answer/2812853

The entire FAQ will help you but I'll direct your attention to what you are most interested in, since you don't believe it exists. 

Turn Google Play Protect on or off

Google Play Protect is on by default, but you can turn it off. For security, we recommend that you always keep Google Play Protect on.


You provided what I asked for, it wasn't difficult was it. Thank you.

I'm sure you must be having a bad day so I hope it brightens up for you, enjoy the weekend.
Sometimes you have to install them. 
I found one of them
Sometimes shady third party apps will add those
Sometimes they can be intentional. I have an app that pays me a few cents a day to have a lockscreen ad. I almost forget I have it then I realize I have 10 bucks for free.
Go to settings>apps>app permissions and find the lock screen permission, then find out what app is using it and turn it off.
Did they really say ‘saved in the wiring’? That’s amazing 
I'm getting angry just by reading that
Lmao sounds like there's no cure for ignorance 
Saved in the wiring? Do they wear tin foil hats too?
Adults’ over confidence is really funny (sad) sometimes
/r/mildlyinfuriating
Your parents watch ALOT of porn
Porn sites are safe now. Its news sites that have all the viruses.
Ironic
Isn't it?
He could save others from viruses, but not himself
Dear lord, I'm sorry about your technologically illiterate family. Also the fact that they are happy to blame you for something they can't comprehend. :/
My dad was convinced that Neopets killed his GPU. I still torture him over that statement.
At that point, I would be calling them idiots anytime they brought up anything computer related.
Used to go over to my grandparents in middle School too play Halo cause they had internet. Grandpa accused my Xbox of giving his vcr a virus. 

Tried to explain that AV cables can't transmit viruses, and VCRs don't get viruses, but he wouldn't hear any of it. Thus ended my days of teabagging noobs. 
Ignorance is bliss 
That sounds awful. I am happy I have a very tech-literate father.
hahahhahaha
I got blamed for my mom's computer problems all the time when I was a kid, so I saved up for my own PC and that was the gaming machine, her computer still didn't work and mine worked great, turns out, Netscape Navigator, Need for Speed, Half-Life and Fallout weren't causing the problem, it was all the 3rd party toolbars, holiday themed cursors, and Internet Explorer being shit as usual, after 20 years of being the shittiest browser in existence you'd think Microsoft would have tried to make a version of IE that doesn't suck. I know Google is collecting my information, but fuck it Chrome actually works well, and it's the only browser that works reliably with AGCO's dealer portal so I kind of need it for work.

I once considered working in IT before I learned the pay sucks and the end users are morons, so I decided to work on farm equipment because at least the pay is better.
Boomers blame millenials for everything 
It’s tragic because there was plenty of time for you to remove it before it spread to the wiring.
How about you get your own computer, uninstall steam on theirs, which would mean if the computer breaks again it can't be your fault.

Edit (didn't read last part sorry)
But steam can stay in the wires
that would be logical, but people who are tech illiterate aren't logical.

It's like when my dad tells me how to do basic home networking despite me being a programmer for over a decade now...
He just said they got a new computer, he never touched it and they  blamed steam in the wires

Do you even read bro? 
no i'm illiterate
This is why you always refuse to touch anyone's computer who you have to see semi-regularly and is computer illiterate.  After you've touched the computer, any problem that arises has 1 cause: you.  And you're expected to fix it.

Edit: a word
damn, you literally have a career in computing and you were offering her help for free? Hope you don't help her too much with her computer now 
Couldn't it be the case that the users were slowing it down? Not the fact that they were there, but don't processes keep running on all users and RAM is held by those processes using it? I have never used multi user but isn't it the case where you actually have to shut down to get all user accounts to terminate and free their resources?
it is.  if they weren't logging out, it would def be slower.
Thanks for confirming
Yeah, i checked: they were logging out.
Lol still got people doubting your work. I'm sure this isn't bringing up old memories
Of course, I also have coworkers who didn’t understand that “locking the screen” ≠ “logging out”, then don’t understand why the computers run soooo slowly because literally thirty people are logged in simultaneously.

But they honestly believed that they were logging out.
If you have several sessions opened then yes, otherwise i'm pretty sure not. Granted, i'm not an expert in Windows internals, but you can compare the memory, disk and cpu usage and i don't think you'll find any difference at all.
> If you have several sessions opened then yes

I never had any luck explaining the difference to people. I think I usually disabled multiple sessions.
It was along time ago, but i seem to remember windows xp had the option to forbid having multiple sessions open, is that it?
My mom is the same way. Something wrong with Facebook that I don't know what's causing it? It's "I thought you went to college to study *computers*!" in a sarcastic tone. 
Every time I helped my mom boot up the browser, she’d tell me in amazement, “you should work in computers!” To this day, I regret that my hubris led me away from a lucrative career as a tech support agent at a call center like she always wanted for me.
It did if you had XP
It's funny until you're trying to help her and she says: maybe you should delete that damned minecraft 
Yeah, and at the time I didn't know how to import worlds/ saves or anything.
Spent many hours on that survival world, RIP😔

And no I can't get the files back, the laptop has been through many resets since 
My mom bought that 10 years ago 
Naughty viruses are the best viruses!
I actually had a virus on our old MAC once that would incerart a porn banner ad in the google homepage. That thing was there for months before anyone else noticed. Way before I interested in computers like I am today. 
That's what gloves are for my dude
*I'm* about to obsessively wash my hands!
EXACTLY. You know enough to be called upon to help, they don’t listen to your advice, complain that you didn’t fix the issue when they prevented you from doing so, and blame you for causing the original issue when you didn’t touch the damn thing! I’m in the same boat.
I’m glad that i wasn’t the only one!!! This annoyed the shit outta me
My mom once got on my case about slowing the computer down because she thought it was all the porn I was watching and then proceeded to google “antivirus” and click the big green download button totaling my laptop with an ugly virus. Had to nuke the thing to get it running again and since then I haven’t let her use my laptop.
I am still the 'computer guy' getting tasked with fixing shit that I have never even used before 
I'm the computer guy in my family and have dealt with this shit for years.

And as a PC guy, (not in a fanboy way, it's just what I'm used to), I have to say that the iPad is the greatest thing to ever happen to my mother.

Constant calls for help, (coupled with blame for being the cause of said troubles due to installing Magic Carpet on an entirely different PC back in 1995), for about twenty years have turned to silence since she got that thing.

I even have a look at it from time to time.

Maximum tabs open. At all times. She never closes a tab, ever.

And that mother fucker just trucks along.
get them an iPad
What’s a computer?
Triggered
this is like the most common story for anyone that grew up in the late 90s/00s, with parents

probably a thousand people gonna see your comment and know *exactly* what the fuck you talking about
Are you me?  We had Windows millennium edition.  Do you know how many times I had to take the fall for Microsoft's shitty code?
Same. I knew how to shut everything down to optimize performance when I was like 12 back in the early 2000s and I would always get blamed for the slow computer even though all I did was shut down useless programs and game. 
Aw, you too? Very frustrating that was. 

Made phone calls to the internet service provider's tchnical support so often that I knew 95% of the process and really only needed them to remind me what to type in at certain parts. I never told them this, of course, and just patiently let them "walk" me through the process. Figured they were probably getting paid hourly or something. Ah, middle school days.
So I'm not the only one who shares this struggle. This made me feel better about it lmao. 
Know this very well. My dad refuses to update software since every change to the UI is to hard for him to adapt (he is choleric with ridiculously low patience), but when the computer runs slower and slower and becomes less secure with each day, it's somehow my fault.
Its toolbars all the way down!
Haha same! My parents and grandparents  always came to me for help because I'm really good with technology, but when something wasn't working they blamed me for it, every time! 
Most of the problems i fixed for people cpuld have been avoided by using proper porn sites. I swear they must have went to yahoo and searched for 'porn'
> t wasn't because they were using internet explorer with half the window covered in toolbars. 

My mom exactly. She gushed about how much faster her 8-year old XP machine ran after I removed a bunch of toolbars and crap, but a few months later it was running like shit again because I didn't fix it right. 

Thankfully, the 2012-vingage Macbook Pro I got for her is still running solid to this day.
My parents are the exact same. I cleaned up their laptop and set them up with firefox + ublock origin. It seems to be working so far.
Mid-1990s

Be me

Sophomore in High School

Take computer programming class

First time allowed such a thing

Family only has one computer

It's old as fuck but it works

Learn simple number generator

Learn simple graphic output

Both in QBasic

Try making my own dice rolling program on family computer

[MFW](http://i0.kym-cdn.com/entries/icons/facebook/000/021/464/14608107_1180665285312703_1558693314_n.jpg) my parents deleted my little 32KB program because it was "causing the computer to run slow and make random error messages appear"
It seems that your comment contains 1 or more links that are hard to tap for mobile users. 
I will extend those so they're easier for our sausage fingers to click!


[Here is link number 1](http://i0.kym-cdn.com/entries/icons/facebook/000/021/464/14608107_1180665285312703_1558693314_n.jpg) - Previous text "MFW"



----
^Please ^PM ^/u/eganwall ^with ^issues ^or ^feedback! ^| ^[Delete](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=FatFingerHelperBot&subject=delete&message=delete%20dxqdrqn)

Tell them this. You have been running ur own pc without a single issue, while theirs kept getting fucking infected with everything. Just ask them. 

Guess what’s the problem?

Then process to fix the damn thing miserably
Just don't help them anymore. If they don't appreciate your time and effort, they don't deserve it.
"Wait, what happened to the antivirus I set up on this?"

"Oh, my friend wanted to download some music and it wouldn't let her, so we turned it off."
I AM the computer guy currently and oh god it’s so bad.
This is why I don't fix tech issues for family unless it's my grandma.
I relate to this. As a kid my mom used to uninstall minecraft constantly because she was convinced it was “ruining her computer speed”, but would try download EVERYTHING on the internet. Her toolbar WAS half her screen lmfao. 
This. I have 4 other siblings and I was the only one who knew how to use the computer without killing it. Back in 2012 (I was 10 at the time) I got Minecraft on the computer and there were no problems for the 2 years I played it. One day my brother decides he wants to download a game too... from a torrent website. The computer gets completely fucked and I’m the only one who gets yelled at because I was the only one who knew why it was fucked up despite me telling them that I wasn’t the one who downloaded the virus.

It kinda worked out in the end cuz I ended up buying my own PC later that year and I use the “I’ll-just-break-it-like-last-time” excuse whenever my family gets pissy with me over why something isn’t working right.
This is why I just settled on Chromebooks for my family.  Still risky but there is only so much damage they can do.
This was my friend. I saved up money as a kid to buy my own laptop, but he was stuck on the family computer. His dad would freak out on him for "breaking the computer" by installing games from discs. Yet their computer was filled with a million programs downloaded by his parents. 
They learned to respect my advice when I refused to fix it and they paid an insane fee to geek squad. Lessions have to be learned.
The ~~best~~ worst one I read was a guy whose mom called him while at his friends house, forced her to give him his neopets password over the phone (because it was clearly neopets that was slowing everything down), and proceeded to delete his neopets one by one while the kid was bawling his eyes out pleading for her to stop.
Oh...this hurts...
"Stop playing that [shitty mmo], it's giving you devil viruses!

*blocks [shitty mmo].ru in IE filters*

even though the game has an actual client and isnt running in a browser like for example runescape

and that i could still access that site by using literally any browser that isn't IE
And thus a serial killer is born.
And nothing of value was lost ;)
My favorite is my mom insisting that since the 'memory' (she meant hard drive) is 'full' (she had managed to get a 500 GB hard drive into the red on a win7 laptop as she takes a ton of photos) that's why her computer was running slowly.

No, mom, it doesn't work like that; or at least, not when you still have 50GB free. Your hard drive is dying. 

The look on her face was priceless; this was a woman who used to back up all her 8.3-named documents onto 3.5" floppies. 
Actually dad isn't too wrong here.

Typically, more icons on the desktop slowed down the log in process. It might have been more significant on older systems or shitty spec PCs. I never did the benchmarking, but you still see it today if the PC is getting bloated that some icons take time to load.

Obviously after it has done loading it will have no impact on system performance.
That's actually a thing. - i don't remember exactly why, but i do recall someone talking about that.  
iirc that's only on startup when  it's creating the links for all the icons. If it's virus free it should be fine 45+ sec after.
Could be, if i wasn't lazy as hell I'd google it
It used to be a thing with XP and earlier if you had loads of network shortcuts on your desktop. It would try and resolve them all slowing your login
Same with storing folders on your desktop. It attempts to update thumbnails all the time.
Shortcuts aren't to bad but when they store every document ever on the desktop then it loads very very slowly on log in.
Microsoft managed to create a text editor that takes 30 seconds to load, so I wouldn't put it past them
Are you talking about notepad? Cause that definitely takes less than 5 seconds to open. 
nah visual studio, you just want to open a 5 kb .cpp file and for some reason Microsoft loads a freaking sql server
Visual studio is much more than a text editor.
damn, tough crowd tonight
Visual Studio is an IDE
That's was my dad too! Plus: "don't go on too many different pages on the internet, it takes up memory!" He thought I was downloading the content to the memory drive. Oh, Dad. 
Temp files get wiped after awhile, so dad was still wrong. Also, pretty sure OC meant just visiting sites, not having tabs open.
Sure, just adding to the conversation...
Umm...  he's right.
Holy shit my dad actually said this to me. 
Actually it's true.
That actually was an issue in older versions of windows. People would put the executables on the desktop (not shortcuts), and it would slow things down. I think that was resolved at some point (or computing speeds have just advanced enough to make it unnoticeable).

He's not stupid, just not up to date on the tech.
It definitely happens on Mac's for what it's worth
Dad was right ;)
Yes. People even manage to install them onto our public computers at the library,  which are so locked down to prevent patrons from doing stupid and/or malicious things with them that you'd think it should be impossible,  but apparently not. 
I work IT dealing with people of all ages and I can confirm they definitely still exist, but typically only on a computer owned by someone born in 1969 or earlier — it’s like they aren’t happy with their browser’s appearance unless their default search engine looks like it’s from a cartoon. 
So he's the new version of Doctors?
Dispensary Stakeholders?
This is my mom with clash of clans. Every day for nearly 5 years!! (Granted, not for 8 hours, but still) It amazes me that she doesn’t get bored 
Wish that were my mom. But no. My moms addicted to panda pop. 
The father of my ex gf invested more than 2000$ into virtual "diamond" currency of some shitty clash of clans clone. Dude got up at 3am on a work day to defend his castle 'n stuff. Wouldn't be surprised if he already sold his car to buy diamonds.
Holy... Goes to show how these games can ruin you just as bad as whatever the parents warn us about.
Are you my sister?
Jesus. My mother is addicted to all of those games.    

I don't even know what half of them are, but I can barely have a decent conversation with her anymore as a result.  
She's also the mum you're gonna let ruin their life 
Don't try and guilt trip them. No one can tell a grown-ass adult to what to do if they're simply stuck in their ways and refuse to change. For all you know this person has exhausted every option they've had to try and get their mom to cut down on her mobile gaming. 
True, my apologies, OP.
> grown ass-adult

***

^(Bleep-bloop, I'm a bot. This comment was inspired by )^[xkcd#37](https://xkcd.com/37)
Good bot 
Go away
You go away, that's a great fucking bot. 
*great-ass bot
Great ass-bot*
Man if only you could just tell people what they shouldn't do and have them listen.
None of the usual IPv4 shit, but I've got some IPv6 right here...
Send me a packet bro, you know my MAC address.
Yeah, I do. *chuckles*
I feel that way about porn. It's a conversation we are just barely starting to have. A few notable people have talked about their porn addiction; Chris Rock, Terry Crews... We are  an entire generation that grew up with unlimited access to porn unlike any generation before us and many aren't considering the psychological effects it may have a young boys and girls. 
Porn is a new frontier. Yes, there is some gross and extreme porn that shouldn’t be allowed to exist. However, the ‘mainstream’ porn is helping us break away from the religious indoctrination of having one spouse for your entire life. 
I don't see how people get addicted to porn. You only need it maybe 7 minutes a day. Who watches it when they aren't masturbating?
Maybe 20 min on those rare occasions where I have the house to myself.
Some people masturbate a lot more than once per day... 
He clearly said he masturbates 7 times a day..
When tagging and maintaining my galleries, I guess.
cringe
>To be fair the internet can be pretty addictive.

It's a problem for me because on Reddit or other forums or 4chan, there's always something. Nothing truly interesting but always enough content that I'm never bored.

It's very hard for me to control the urge to just go browsing.

Can't even watch series or play games.
I agree, but the "more than you ought to" applies to everything. If you took away the internet, our laziness would just have us doing something else unproductive more than we ought to.

Where it turns into an addiction is where restricting it may accomplish something.
Well, not necessarily, our obsessiveness can be put towards worthwhile and productive things. A modern example, programming. In the age of my parents, fixing up cars. These are both hobbies that many would say make us better people. We are undeniably obsessive creatures, but the trick is to develop obsessions carefully. To pick things that are useful or enlightening. 

Our brains really want those sorts of things too, but a lot of media plays on psychological vulnerabilities: instant feedback, quantitative encouragement, and the social problems our brains are better designed for. Realistically, it doesn't matter how many upvotes I get on reddit, how many enemies I slay in skyrim, or even how convincing of an argument I write on forums. These aren't the things that shape the real world. Even if my brain wants to believe convincing you of something will have some long reaching effect, my time would definitely be better spent writing proper research papers or contacting government representatives. 

Again it's fine to take it easy now and then, but we shouldn't fool ourselves either. 
It does matter how convincing of an argument you write on forms. It's what you should do if you want to get out of it. If you want to make convincing arguments about forms, be a lawyer.

You probably meant forums, from forum, meaning place. Those are the online bulletin board systems. 
Corrected, thank you. I'll add that to my list of mix-up words.
You're welcome. Just something I noticed.
I disagree. It's not a matter of laziness, it's a matter of perverse social incentives and access to data that we never had to encounter in an ancestral environment. That argument is no better than saying that death rates wouldn't go down if we all stopped driving, because humans are fundamentally stupid bastards that will find a way to get hurt. On one hand - yes, yes we are. On the other - the truly lazy point of view is one that embraces cynicism as an excuse for apathy. The internet has real effects, some good, some bad, but it's not enough to wave your hand and say *oh the humanity, it never changes* instead of trying to address the realities of life.
I used to have a book problem.

I’m talking reading ~250,000 pages of books in a year.

Anything can be bad for you.
Thank you!
Username checks out, and I'm guilty as charged. 
There is a difference between addiction and dependency, don’t forget. :) I get the sentiment though.
The internet isn't a media. It's is a medium for  you to get to other media. The internet itself is not a form of media.
I mean that's a bit pedantic as a counter argument, but I suppose yes. 
Yea it is. I'm just a senior network engineer who has been in Telco for a long time. I guess you get a bit pedantic when that is something that I've done all this time.
16k! Luxury! We had 1k in a rolled up newspaper in a septic tank. Also known as a ZX81.
I have seen those.

I once found a Timex Sinclair that had 4k.
















16k...
Brings back memories of learning BASIC on my TRS-80. Saving programs on cassette tape.


Same hardware. I wish I still had it. I was pretty proud of the tetris clone I wrote.

Maybe I'll got find one on eBay
Does yours still work?  Mine does!  We pulled it out the other day.  Those bloody tape drives though ..  you even had to have the volume right (even though you couldn’t hear it). Or it wouldn’t load. 
I recently did the same after running a malwarebytes scan and finding 120 actual threats. Uninstalling mcafee also helped though.
You can hijack a Chromebook browser? I always thought they were fundamentally different from the windows version. I guess not though, extensions still work. Not sure why that never clicked.
Chromebook? Are you certain of this.
Every computer should have an ad blocker on it.  
My dad keeps REMOVING the adblockers, because that's what's making the computer slow, not the 30 tabs my mom left open. 
My SO has fucking over 200 tabs open then bitches about the computer I built running slow... It's how many tabs you have open plus my torrents are downloading. "Well that doesn't mean anything!" Sure, you are the expert here babe.
I mean I do too, so I can't talk shit. But I know that's why my laptop sounds like a rocket launch
Gotta get that shit over and done with early as a kid 
It's too late mom... I've seen everything
Or after I put chrome on their pc for them, still use ie, so i delete ie...”the internets broken” “huh? No it isnt” “the internet button is missing from my computer” 

I literally had to swap the chrome icon out for the ie one in the end cause “but thats the internet button” “no its a browser and this one is faster” 
"left click or right click?"
10 times, because it didn't immediately do something the first time they clicked.
My mother insists on double clicking and if she sees me click something she'll turn to me and say "it doesn't work unless you double click it." I've tried to explain to her it is and there's a loading icon at the top that proves it but her internet is slow and she doesn't want to pay more to update it.
"mom, there is a difference between desktop applications and links and buttons in a web browser, you dont have to double click"

Mom: "whats a desktop"
Double * Click *
Does it bother anyone else when old people double click hyperlinks? It is absolutely maddening!
Realest comment 👆
But with like a second in between so it registers as two single clicks 
Oh god. So true
"This link isn't doing anything." *continues to click until you make them stop*
I double clicked that upvote 
False, anyone over 40 never knows how to double click, they just do 2 single clicks like 10 seconds apart and wonder why it’s not working
Also: razorblades/poison in Halloween candy.
Not just parents but dumb people, dumb people who have bred.
There was a time when parents and older people thought kids reading books was the equivalent of gaming today. Kids staying indoors with their heads in the books instead of out playing with friends or learning skills.
Best I've heard of is that old one about glueing a nylon stocking onto your black and white tv to get color...
"Play a record forwards, it's even worse, you'll hear Nickelback"
Records cost too much to play backwards, even if it means I get to worship the devil. 
Sure but if you play it forwards you hear Nickleback.
I seem to have adopted some sort of Socratic method of teaching my father to use the internet. He’s very aware of how many times I say “why did you click that?” and yet he still won’t follow the instructions he’s been given
Why would she pay for a replacement kidney when 1 kidney can do the same amount of work as two? 
It's true the 1 kidney will grow some to help keep up with the new workload. However, it can lead to high(er) blood pressure and of course, extra strain on that kidney.
im seriously so worried. i'm about to go and have a talk with her about this and it feels like im being the parent and shes the irresponsible teenager. ugh wish me luck.
Reminds me of a thing a few years ago a bunch of people at my school were sharing some absolute load of rubbish on Instagram saying that if you follow this totally official and real Instagram account which definitely belongs to Amazon, and then give them a shoutout, the first 10,000 people to do that would get a free £10 giftcard. I got a lot of "WAL U NVR NO IT CUD B REEL" from people after explaining how obviously fake it was.
“You can’t get roofied through Tinder”

Halle-fucking-god damn-lujah. I don’t get why they don’t get it.
>You can't get roofied through Tinder. 

No you fucking can't, which is a big plus. And when they start getting creepy on you, you can just block them. No emergency taxi needed. 
I met my girlfriend over a friend I met through playing steam games together. I knew the friend for about ~4 years. Then after dating the girl for about ~2 years, people were still like "you met her on the internet? You don't even know if she is who she says she is". I had seen her over Skype calls over a hundred times by this point.

Some people kept that up mildly even after I had literally taken a plane and spent a week with her in person.

Her parents were even worse though. They nearly tried to make her cut all contact with me about 2 weeks into talking with me.
Not with that additude you can't.
I wouldn't be so quick to insult your mom hating online dating. After seeing my mom's experiences on multiple sites over almost a decade (widowed, age 60) it's not the valuable pool of dates that it is for 18-35 year olds. It really doesn't work well for older demographics because the older you get, the singles left behind are largely damaged goods with multiple divorces, or losers that have been single the whole time for good reason. On top of that, the bots and scammers specifically target older people because 1) they're more likely to have money saved up and 2) they tend to be less savvy when it comes to social engineering. Pickings are slim, almost all the good ones are married. My mom mainly uses it to troll scammers these days, so at least she's found some sort of fun on it.

It's a much better landscape for younger crowds, though.
You can’t get roofied on Tinder, but you can get knocked of your feet by my stunning good looks. Then I drag you off to my van. 
Hold my Rohypnol
That's pretty hilarious. My mom didn't like it at first and told my sister it could be unsafe. Now that my sister met her husband on POF my mom tells  me I should do online dating to find an amazing man too. When I told her that I have been, she said I should let my sister choose because she chose a great guy. To my mom's credit the guys I have gone out with weren't the best. 
I dunno, i find being drunk is an important ingredient to a successful date.
You had two serious boyfriends and your mother never knew how you met them?
Eh, I didn't tell my mom about the online dating thing for a WHILE - I met everyone through "friends" or "at a party". The judgement is a lot less today than it used to be.
That's cool! I could never get away with not telling 100% how I met my partner, she'd murder me lol
I mean as far she knew....she knew everything. My friend was named Tinder and the party was Reddit, but ya know, close enough!
"At college" was good enough for her. 
I met my wife online. To this day I can't be 100% sure she's not a very convincing chatbot.
I second this, you never know with the internet.
Right? Is OP not *certain* she isn't a bear? Has he even rolled for perception?
That's awkward if she was your girlfriend BEFORE you met her on Tinder.
Well, i met my wife of 6 years on POF... Worked out so far
Boyfriend and I met on okc almost 3 years ago now. Hasn't murdered me yet!
>yet!
Year 4 is when things get dicey
....prove it.
I met my husband on OKC can confirm I haven't murdered him yet 
I would keep an eye on her, though. Never forget where she came from. 
Oh I see.. PersianOnlineFuck.com, right?
Is she a fish?
Shit I met the love of my life through the Facebook Pretty Lights Family group for fans of the musician Pretty Lights. The internet is badass for connecting you with people you'd never have had a chance to meet in another day and age
Seven years next month. Craigslist.
More like "Careful: Dude!"
[deleted]
That's ridiculous. There is nothing wrong with a heterosexual man preferring a biological woman for sex. That preference is every bit as valid as being or wanting gay or trans partners! People, men, women, trans, whatever - all kinds have been known to misrepresent themselves on dating sites.
If a man prefers or accepts anything at all besides a woman for sex then he is not heterosexual. 
Oh, I might have been unclear, my third sentence doesn't refer to hetero men, just the abstract idea of anyone wanting to be with their preferred type.
Are you judging people based on their in-built sexual preferences? 
Yes.
How cisphobic of you! 
>  I'm judging OP as a prick for calling trans women "men".

You really need to zoom out a little bit mate. That's quite obviously not the intention of the comment.
Ohh I get it now. You're right, it's not about what I thought it was. Sorry, having a slow kind of day. 
All goods.
prolly more 'transaversion' or something.. dislike of surprise dick. phobias are real afflictions that affect real people.  let's not diminish their disorder by tossing around flavored speech. 

[e; *sooome* ppl, wont name names, still dont understand that someone calling a transwoman a man doesn't justify the appropriation of a medical term to make one's point. 2 wrongs do not a right make. you're prolly the type that made a big stink about ppl sayng "my ocd this, my ocd that", like, "hey, real ppl have this debilitating illness and you're marginalizing it by misappropriating that term." well same with phobias lol. homophobia.. transphobia.. it's rhetoric. there may be a few out there with those phobias, but they're not the ones you're calling those names stahp it.]

[aaand context is gone]
Too bad aversion is already covered by the word. 
'phobia':an extreme or irrational fear of or *aversion* to something

And in what universe is homophobia a medical condition?

"Yeah, Bob murdered another gay person today. It's been really tough for him ever since he was diagnosed with homophobia..."
phobias are anxiety disorders. and yeah there's overlap of the words, but one's in use by modern medicine and one's not. a phobia is far more than an aversion, fyi. just tacking on any ol' prefix to -phobia to convince your audience is immoral and unnecessary (and diminishes public awareness of what people with actual phobias go thru every day.)
Except that's not how those words are used at all. The suffix '-phobia' is used in plenty of non-medical contexts where it doesn't mean fear/anxiety.
Like in the word homophobia. Or hydrophobic. 

Shit, you should be up in arms about hydrophobic compounds. Not only are people reappropriating medical terms but they're applying them to inanimate objects. Or maybe these language rules are all in your head.
my friend that died had agoraphobia.. never went outside. hiighly irrational and hiiighly debilitating. before i knew him I never realized that THAT'S what a phobia was... something that utterly ruins your whole life. and here you are defending the hyperbolic use of the name of his condition.. something that actively diminishes public awareness of it. shame on all you brigading downvoters.. i challenge any one of you to respond to me rationally


still w8ing for even ONE example of some prefix other than homo and trans that any social movement added to -phobia in common language. lmk
  "hydrophobic" gimme 3 examples of other times it's used.. other than in technical, non-medical scientific terminology.. 3 times it's commonly used in everyday speech.. -phobia is only ever used rhetorically in those instances anyway, but i cant rly think of any besides maybe aversion to spiders being mislabeled arachniphobia

What the hell is rhetorical word usage? It sounds like you just want to label it illegitimate without being clear as to why. 

This claim that the word phobia is solely a medical term is total bullshit. Nor is the term limited to fear/anxiety.
Here's 3 examples, since you asked:

1. Hydrophobe, which I already mentioned is a  chemistry term. 
2. Hydrophobia (in people) is the historical name for rabies, not because it creates an irrational fear of water, but because it makes swallowing incredibly difficult. 
3. Photophobia is a physical intolerance to light, rather than an irrational fear of it.

So, of the three examples, one is a medical term not having to do with fear/anxiety, one predates modern medicine, and one is from a completely different academic field. To reiterate, usage of the suffix '-phobia' is not limited to the field of medicine, and it is not limited to irrational fear/anxiety. 
rhetoric is persuasive speech. u got 3 big categories pathos (pursuasion by pulling the heart strings), ethos (persuasion by credibility), and logos (logical gymnasitcs without substance). so like.. saying 'homophobia' is vaast hyperbole.. exaggeration..  flavored speech.. intellectually-dishonest, logical misdirection and, basically, name calling... wanting ppl to associate bad things with your debate opponent.. shady shit.. pathos+logos.. and it actively diminishes public understanding of a serious condition. it's nothing but a rhetorical device. it certainly isn't an accurate description. you can't tippy tap around that

all 3 of the phobias u listed are technical scientific terminology.. that doesnt count and u know it. give me ONE example of common-tounge usage where ANY other social movement made heavy (or even light) usage of *something*-phobia in the last 3 decades. you can't, can u
[deleted]
Calm down TB
Seriously man. I met a girl on tinder once. We went out a few times against my better judgment... Now I'm married. 
 
Tinder. Maybe just once. 
Hard mode automatically initiated
Im rejected on grindr too. FML. 
Better hit your gf and drop the gym.
Met my fiancee on Tinder, WCGW?
Lots of people meet his gf on tinder
I met his girlfriend on tinder last night. 
I met Mrs. Samurai on Yahoo Personals.  I know that dates me.
The parents illegally stream Scottish football. I’m sure it’s fine. 
Yon never know with the internet!
OMG. With all these stories about parents doing all these things I may have just put some things together in my head. My mom's credit card number has been stolen like 3 times and she always blames it on the gas station... I think I need to make a phone call.
That’s what your boyfriend wants you to believe, you naughty little loli. Any day now it is van for you. 
Now that is what I call a weird response to a parent comment.
LOL, how did this end up here? I commented it on a different comment altogether, way down towards the bottom of the posts. Must be the app bugging out again. 
My dad is the complete opposite. He will just Google what he wants and buy the one on the first Google link. He is always getting overcharged because he doesn't want to search around.
Wow, all that for a €10 “savings”...
> Look, they even have a little logo with "Secure" on it.

my stepfather is 70, i have had to explain to him multiple times about how people can lie on the internet, can fake virtually anything on the internet, etc. he just can't get over the fact that it isn't under some laws or something that don't allow people to lie.

and yes, i am also in charge of all their internet purchases, everything. thank god.
They prefer twenty four year olds 
He is probably playing the long con. I’d be careful because you never know with the Internet. 
I met my wife at a reddit meet, so there's that. 
My mom was convinced my husband who I met online was going to murder me the minute we met. Turns out he was more into the long game of trying to fuck with me to the point that I would want to do it myself.
TIL tinder is more than 3 years old
It came out in 2012. 
You're saying I could have started tinder in high school??
When you were 18 yeah
The glory days tbh. Was living in SF when it launched and had no stigma. 

No one gave a fuck, everyone fucked.
My sister and her husband met on Tinder, parents think it was plenty of fish or something
Omg, is your mum Gwen from Gavin and Stacey?
As long as it's in denominations of 12
>if my anecdotal experiences have any validity

What if they didn't and you were presented with hard evidence of it? 
People who didn't need evidence to make up their mind in the first place likely won't be swayed by it.
Sooo, Trump voters then?
Does she still write checks? And then tell the cashier she doesn't trust computers, as the cashier scans the check into the computer? ಠ_ಠ
Actually a pretty good idea as I see it: if someone is responding to scams and installing random browser extensions, the next best thing they can do is not use the same browser for anything high-value.

Edit: also, and probably more importantly in this case, you can't get your bank login info phished if you never set up an online account in the first place.
I'm older and my friend will buy shit from any random ad that shows him something he likes, and just recently gave in to online banking. I'm the opposite and refuse to trust any ad, even if it's from a reputable company. If I get an ad for something I might want, I'll go directly to the site and search it. If it's a company I've never heard of, I'll google the company first, if I'm that interested.
Why-y-y-y I oughta...! 🤜🏻🤜🏻
The other one
That's because they have no way of proving to themselves whether God is real or not, whereas you can immediately get proof of wet paint. 
It's a joke, spock 
Jokes are supposed to be funny.
The joke... is in your hands.

Edit: oh wait I just got that
—George Carlin
          —Michael Scott
Right, it’s seriously a game changer for some people. Like, I’m currently in Indiana visiting two friends I met through a computer game with my boyfriend of nearly 10 years that I met on the same game. I would have literally never met any of them without the internet.
A lot of my good friends are people I met online. They're also people who "get" me, I guess because we're a fairly small group of people around the globe (being an in the closet ex Muslim) I find that ex Jehova's witnesses are people I understand easier too
How many times do we have to teach you this lesson old man
I love the young people.
meanwhile when I was younger my mom was completely sure it was my video games and steam causing the computer to be slow, not the hundred things she allowed to be installed. 
Met my boyfriend of 3 years on tinder, we tell people we met while he was walking his dog on my college campus. 
Wwooow I forgot about that website. Ah, memories. 
Yeah, it was sad when they started making people pay to be on it awhile back. I’m so old, I remember when it was free. 
He probably wrote it down somewhere and read it off
He may have had them all in a notebook next to the pc
My grandpa always denies the existence of his password, let alone remembering it.
“I didn’t put a password on anything what are you talking about?!” 

Every, sinGLE TIME
"password?" 
Do you want my credit card info? I’ll pm you. 
You und I boom shaka laka!
I just forgot de wae.
Dead meme and wrong country.. *slow clap*
I don't care - T'Challa
He's not a Ugandan prince, you lout.
No, that's not ok. That is NEVER ok.
we need to talk about the ducks
Damn xD
Of course not. She wants a flat stomach, remember?
"That's not the same and you know it!" Is the response I'd expect from my mother. But then again, she complained to me that her ads were gone after I installed an ad blocker for her. ..
Someone should hide from kidnappers that moms are easier to catch with flat stomachs then with candy - just to make sure. 
That's probably the best analogy ever
>each and everything

Are you an Indian tech scammer?
Yeah, we learned to do that maybe 10 years ago. Really it's just about finding other sources that confirm the story.
But whenever I google about vaccines and autism I get all these pauwalled articles from stuck up “experts” and “journals” trying to steal my money! Karensnaturallyfe.mommyblog.biz is totally legit tho!
maybe.

It is all about adapting, when you get older and do not join new fads / technology, you won't learn with the rest and be left behind.

This might be the only point in history where it is so big of a difference, they went from reading paper newpapers and working 12 hours a day to having your whole life in a box that they never really understood and never bothered to learn.

As long as you are up to date and watch for new technology you will never be in the same trap.

I'm pretty sure bill gates doesn't click on all the ads that shows up and give all his information freely etc. 

-

we are in/done with the transition from cash money and physical documents to all access on the tips of your fingers from everywhere in the whole world.  most of our parents / grandparents are still living in the physical world where the PC is just a new TV. 
Doubt it, as someone else said already, it's more about them refusing to adapt than their age. Even when you look into various political viewpoints, theirs are typically related to anything that involves NOT changing/adapting.

Now music, yeah we'll probably be wayyyyy out of touch lol
That's also something I wonder? Will we be so goddamn braindead about tech too when we grow up? Doesn't seem likely.
I think since tech has been changing so much throughout our lifetime, we probably have a much easier time keeping up with the changes, whereas most of our parents were introduced to it fairly late in their lives. 
That makes sense. I mean, millennials were BORN into technology.
And gen z is growing up on it too.
Yep, even more than the millennials. The NEXT generation is gonna grow upon VR, or even crazier stuff...
Idk my parents in in their late 50’s to early 60’s and have needed to use computers for their jobs for decades.  My mom is better at Excel than I am!  But I doubt she could torrent an album or movie.  At least they know not to give our info away to scams.
I know Dr. Phil can be pretty useless, but he has several episodes dedicated to "catfishers". Maybe try playing those episodes for your mom and say "anything about these sound familiar??" They all have the same formula. I'm sorry that's going on, this is such a sad situation.
This is just... Clearly your mom had sex once so how can she be this desperate? I don't get how this happens. Do you think she knows deep down?
Do you have access to her email? It might be a bit dishonest but can you block the “boyfriends”  email? I’m sure he’ll return with another but it might slow him down? 
Yea. Now get off the computer so I can donate to my sleazily dressed gamer girlfriend on twitch. 
Maybe she's just lonely and needs someone to talk to. 
When you're eager to believe you're easy to deceive.
You'd be surprised.  Sometimes the con goes for years.  Yeah, it's one thing if you meet someone online and they ask for cash.  It's another of you meet someone online, skype for three years, get sent a ring, are engaged, and they ask for money for airfare to come see you.
Pretty sure the issue is that the “we” that you’re referring to doesn’t overlap with the set of internet illiterate people that this often happens to.
Very desperate people. 
I'm glad you've never felt that lonely before. While I've never had it happen to me, I can definitely understand how it happens. 
Why would anyone lie on the Internet? 
This and the IRS phone scam. Every tax season I hear about it on the news, I cannot believe people are still falling for it enough that we have to keep telling people that it’s not real. 
Guess it is the same reason why people fall for cults and sects.
I‘m sorry this is happening to your girlfriend and to you. Did you have a good relationship with her dad before this happened?
I started dating after all of this. I have never met him, he has never met me. He doesn't know anything about me. He just lost all of his faith and has trust issues. I don't blame him but still fucked up. 
They get chain letters from friends with the subject line FWDFWDFWDFWDFWDFWDFWDRERREEREREYOU GOTTA WATCH THIS XDXDXD.  
They contains either a video you need to download to watch or a .pdf file.  
  
This is how my dad infects his computer. Its not because I just fixed the printer or downloaded VLC. But hey man. His friend Conrad sent those emails and Conrad is a smart guy!
The month after cyber security awareness month three people in the hospital fell for phishing emails.  The fucking splash screens on all the computers were still warning about safe email use.  Compromised the whole network and made IT go into def con :p
As a kid I remember getting a virus once by downloading (or was it copying?) something off google images and pasting it into a school project.
Wow, what happened to screen savers. I still have desktop background but no screen savers
I use "the matrix" screensaver. Just because it looks cool and in case that I fall asleep in front of my computer, looking for morpheus
Yes! Makes me feel badass with my three monitors
I still use one at work because I work on "sensitive information" and have to have my screen off or locked any time I am not at my desk. So I have my screensaver set to a low idle time incase I forgot to screen lock. 
My father still insists he needs one and every time I lecture him about the dangers of downloading random screensaver "programs" he scoffs and a week later I'm wiping and reloading his system.

Edit: Some shady "programs" people install and allow access as part of procedure can facilitate phishing ploys and other scams. Nothing is safe, everything wants your bank and/or dick pics.
Don't forget ads
Isn't there an issue with websites using people's computers to mine btc?
and Facebook is putting that Nigerian Prince out of business.
No behavioral changes are made. They load up their browser when they get it back, see that their toolbars are are gone (or whatever) and immediately redownload it.  It’s the same in the medical field. Clear out their coronary in the cath lab, place a stent and get them feeling better. They get home and continue smoking, eating poorly and remain sedentary.  
So. Many. Toolbars. 
There's this one I've been seeing a lot that's a toolbar for your desktop. It's kinda funny
This is why I use Chrome. As far as I know,they don't support toolbars.
Is it a possibility to ask them?

Like "hey if you don't mind would it be okay to tell us more or less what you browse? It would help us to detect malicious site and warn our customers about them!".

Then sell the data to some insurance company to help them prevent people using their insurance and saving money or something.
We have a lot of non-english speaking or English as a second language clients, so it's not always easy to do. However, whenever a client is receptive, I like to try and inform with some basic internet safety. In fact, I have a paper handout I've made. 
Nice!
downloadmoreram.com is great for increasing performance!
Exactly! It sounds like some kind of weird catharsis after so many years of being cautious...
Adept

Edit: I also agree
Hey I never said I was a wordgician!
That’s not how you do it! You start the story with a misleading shitty believable story before you turn into a shitty morph about a shark!
Hey hey hey now!.....that’s far too accurate. 
Yeah, that was damn impressive.
like 4 times
They managed to find a cabin in the middle of no-where Sweden based on the type of wood they used to build the cabin, shits incredible
They used car horns to triangulate it
4chan's ability to be.... special can truly be scary
Also when they coordinated an air strike on a terrorist training base 
That was incredible. 
Tom Scott's exact position to something like 40cm was determined in the middle of fuck all
_Now only if they applied that intelligence to their politcal beliefs._
No they didn't. They tried that and it didn't work.
It worked about 3 or 4 times until he moved it into a small room in a museum with only a camera pointed at it for a livestream nobody was watching, which kinda defeats the point anyway.
No, it didn't. They found it by looking on twitter for people saying they saw him, then they randomly drove around those areas honking their car horns until people heard them on the stream. 
They had already narrowed the search area down by then. Look up the internet historian video
Yes. My grandmother sends them weekly
Idk but I get them all the time from older people. Although usually it's more like a PSA for some bullshit, like: 

"Be careful! Don't drink green tea in the morning as scientific studies have shown that it'll give you explosive diarrhea! Send this message to as many people to tell them!"
Man I remember those times back in 2006\-7 on Youtube... Even I fell for one that sounded too dangerous for me to ignore
People are sending them to me through Facebook messages now. Should have known when I accepted those friend requests from older family members it would come to this. 
They are and some of them are filled with some VERY strong political rhetoric. I had to finally tell an older woman (60+) that I volunteered with that if she really thought “the others” (non-Southern, non-practicing Christians, or families that immigrated last century) were so bad then she better stop talking to me because I was all of those things. (“But you don’t look like it and you know so much about the Bible!” Uh, that’s called “college educated”...never been to church.)
My girlfriend’s mom is mental. She chain messages and distributes anything that gets to her email.
They moved onto Facebook. 
Unfortunately yes, I generally don't have the heart to tell people why I won't be sharing it either. 
Oh they exist, my dads email is full of them. Then again he's 67 and still uses the AOL web browser so it's not surprising.
That browser hasn't been supported for *years*, has it?
Probably not, although I can swear I've seen an update button popup a couple of times though that could be because he didn't update it when it was supported.
/r/forwardsfromgrandma
Most of the type of content from chain messages has shifted to Facebook posts I think. I do still occasionally get them from my dad though, who refused to use Facebook.
They're on Instagram stories now
Believe it, they still are a thing..
I get them everyday from people in different ages..
Personally, I only see ironic chain messages.
Yes.  My cousin is conservative and lives in the US, and ever since 2015 I’ve been bombarded by chain emails in broken English e.g. about how great man of heroism Trump redirects Trump Airlines to Iraq to save big-large soldiertroop of wounded left behinds by  Obama-schmo. 
You're probably right and it is mainly much older people who think they're being cute/patriotic/funny by sending them but I do still get them from people that really should know better. 
Also Amazon have the most relaxed refund policy ever. I know someone who works in customer returns and it's outrageous what they will accept back for a refund. 
hahahahah moms and grandmas are good for that. Or she will get an email with my name or a relatives name in heading but its somehow spelled wrong and she's like "What do you mean Netflix locked you out and you need my bank card?" Like MOM please, its not me
I mean, isn’t it true even offline when somebody offers you free money, it’s a trap?

Like just imagine the same offer in real world ad or a mailbox?
how many people walk up to you in the real world claiming to be a nigerian prince in need of $1000?
at least your mum knows how to do email. She is on a counselling course at collage, and every time she needs to email her homework to her teacher, i have to show her how to attach the .docx to the email.
Quite true

Source: friend from work was run over by his wive, In their garage, in bright daylight, right after announcing his divorce.
Only sane thing to do is stay in bed
So a question to you two - I'm a seasoned gentlemen who came up on computers and my kids think I'm a wizard too.  Back in the day,  you had to study and understand them to get them to do things. It was a bit more involved than plugging in an ethernet  cable and searching for a program that did what you wanted.  You had to deal with baud  rates and parity bits, etc .  Hell, often times you'd read a computer magazine and actually  type in the printed BASIC  code  if they covered a program you wanted to use.  It was more efficient  than the (nonexistent) world wide web.

Now, my kids can run the hell out of services and such.  But they haven't nearly had as much schooling on actual programming as I did.  (I'm still mind blown the high school offers a class on PowerPoint).  And I don't think that have the behind the scenes understanding that I have.   

Is this the same with your dad's who still know computers?
I'm not super good with computers. I know the basics, but nothing more. I'm super interested in the future of technology, though. It seems like being in the programming field is a must for anybody who wants tons of success. In 20-30 years, I believe nearly everything will be run by technology. 

As long as you don't get nostalgic about how "it used to be" then I'm pretty sure that won't happen. Technology won't just start speaking a brand new language out of nowhere, it's still going to be running on the same ones and zeroes it is today. 
As someone who's 50, it's more like this:  it's not that you won't understand the technology, it's that it's just not a key part of your existence.  When I was young, new technology would come out and I would ooooh  and aaaah  it.  But at some point, it becomes more like "oh, here's the launch of a new thing, like I haven't seen THIS a hundred times."  

It's not that you CAN'T learn it, you just don't want to.  I get a new iPhone  and I don't think "cool," I think "motherfucker, I could run the last interface well, now I'm going to have to relearn everything."

I just got a new car.  It's got this smartphone interface that I know I'm underutilizing.  I know my kids are cringing  that I'm underutilizing  it.  But I'm just not interested in some cyborg like symbiotic love fest with my cars electronics.  It plays my music, let's me talk on the phone, and navigates.  My kids think I can't learn it because I haven't activated the "driver profile" hoo-hah.  I can learn it, I don't CHOOSE to.  My car doesn't need it because if they want to borrow it, they aren't going to futz  with it.  They can get their own car.  ;-)

So fear not, your ability won't change, your desire damn  sure will.
Thanks, /u/neck_crow 's dad!
Uber self driving cars.

Too soon?
I read that as criminal thinking skills. Still makes sense.
That screams credibility to a baby boomer.
I can't believe I just watched that whole thing.
Makes me feel homicidal. 
Holy fuck, that’s actually a thing. 
r/ofcoursethatsathing
/r/ofcourshethatshathing
Oh my god
Dear lord...
«Our lads overseas need music down there in the sandbox, eh?»
r/unexpectedhogwarts
The Lizard Wizard
King gizzard
Uh oh, now whenever her computer runs into a problem it's going to be your fault for "installing that bookmark thing" 
Oof I still use a gateway
I remember playing [an old SpongeBob game](http://www.wiredarcade.com/game/522/SpongeBob-SquarePants.html) that always had an ad for "Coole Ringtones" at the end of the intro.

What a time to be alive.
I was disappointed that this 15-year-old link no longer worked. I don't know what I expected. Do you think he still gets paid for it?
Since the domain name isn't registered and the fact that smartphones are popular, no.
That's not exactly right. They pay for views, but that is just to facilitate the 0.01% that do click the link. 
This is the most annoying thing. You are just watching TV, that does not equal family time, if we are going to sit and stare at a screen I’d rather be doing what I want on with that screen than watching crappy cable TV.
And how is me playing historical strategy games or talking to my friends ‘rotting my brain’ more than you sat on your own and watching that shitty TV program you like about fucking ghosts?
Tell me more about this show about fucking ghosts ;)
Tech-dads are cool. My dad used to be a programmer (now he's mostly management) but that means that I usually don't have to worry about him and scams. He's actually good with email and Facebook.
There's a popular youtuber I like that does this every other video.

They'll have one video that's deeply informative, full of facts and shows both sides. Then they'll have another video that uses misleading facts, fearmongering and ignoring the other side's points altogether, and ending the video abruptly so that you feel smart when you figure out the point they were leading you on towards.
Link? Sounds interesting.
[Here is one of their videos about China's growing influence using its construction industry.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=EvXROXiIpvQ)

To be clear, I am no expert on China, but what they say doesn't align with what I know.

Several of the facts they lay out in the video are used misleadingly, they interweave opinion with fact, and they try to blame China's construction industry on Trump.

While China is using its construction industry for some political connections, it has to do this, because its construction industry is too large to be allowed to fail. The video ignores the underlying causes of why the chinese construction industry exists (Chinese people generally invest money in buildings, not stocks, which has lead to empty cities of houses no one will ever live in, additionally [ghost cities](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=V3XfpYxHKCo)), the demand for construction in China supposedly is not keeping up with the construction industries' demand, which has lead to the half-baked solution of building infrastructure outside of china to keep up with that demand.

I've seen some places (I believe China Uncensored) describe the building projects outside of the country as a stall tactic to figure out what to do with their construction industry that won't tank them.

Additionally the video contradicts itself, in pointing out how this was planned and spoken about as far back as 2012, but then somehow blaming it on Trump's bad foreign policy by the end of the video.

Vox does produce great material (see their video on [IBM's age discrimination](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=e681QNbHloE)), but every second or third video they make, it's like they try to push a hard anti-trump bias for no good reason. I don't like trump, but I don't want propaganda in my fact videos.
Well, she's not wrong - usually you don't print things on TV, but broadcast them 
Shit, I meant to type Say.
Not that you'd know, of course, because piracy is illegal and bad, right? 
Yeah, yeah, dude. But like, for real, I don't use TPB, what I commented is just what I heard ~aroun' town~
Yeah, yeah, dude. But like, for real, I don't use TPB, what I commented is just what I heard ~aroun' town~
Yeah, yeah, dude. But like, for real, I don't use TPB, what I commented is just what I heard ~aroun' town~
Yeah, yeah, dude. But like, for real, I don't use TPB, what I commented is just what I heard ~aroun' town~
Cou-Coupon... Printing? Ok, I think your mum was starting to get a little bit too deep
My aunt had one for a coupon site that installed some damn toolbar thing.
At least teach her to install suspect programs into a virtual machine, if she's just gotta install them.
It was probably mining bitcoin
Don' ask me, don' ask me.
I think the reason why you're asking the question is because you think OD means overdose here

Actually, in this context OD means 'online date'
Idk but it's been a problem since 2011. Atleast I think it's 2011, hopefully not before.
You got in actual trouble for it? :o Dude, that's just... Sad.
it was more for arguing back that there was no way i caused it.
Oh, that makes a little more sense
You kids are more tech than us.

Then why the fuck didn't you trust me 5 years ago!!!

Oddly i never had this issue at home but i did once i got older, then again my dad couldn't get something to work but it was never his fault it was something someone did or its broke e.
At least it's not those DAMN S A T A N I C games
Unless it made your storage significantly filled, having video files won't slow it down. What considerably slows down performance and is a plague between inexperienced users is adware and installing unneccessary software running in the background
My mom blamed counterstrike for freezing up our computer when I was a kid, but it was my dad porn I'm 100% sure.
You have dad porn?
Damn. I’d just get my own account for whatever they are currently offering for autopay alone. Lol
Yeah, but then I would have been paying $50 more than what I currently was and only get 2 gigs of data per month instead of unlimited.
Oh my goodness. I am an employee at Best Buy in the Mobile section. That being said the general elderly public thinks for what ever reason we basically double as geek squad.. Most of the time, being that we aren’t on commission, we will help with their problems. And it is absolutely insane some of the things I’ve seen.... Just to give you one example. This lady some how took a screenshot of her home screen, continued to make it her home screen and then created a new home window. And came in wanting us to repair her phone because when she tapped on the apps they wouldn’t work.... Stating that it’s our fault we sold her a junk phone... 
>"There's a message on my screen, that says if I want to XYZ (like if she wants to set number as default number for this contact). What do I click?" - "Well, do you want to do XYZ?" - "Yes." - "Then you obviously have to click yes." - "Are you sure?" - "._."



This is understandable considering the ads with "YOU HAVE VIRUSES ON YOUR PHONE. CLICK HERE TO SOLVE THEM". If she clicked all of them because she wants to solve them, it would be a mess. You must explain the difference.
Ugh that's classic. My dad constantly makes me go to his office to help him with stuff and EVERY SINGLE TIME the solution is in the prompt that he gets.

Worse one was one time he got a prompt saying something like the page had trouble loading please try again and a button saying "Try Again". He called me because he didn't know what to do. He is a chemical engineer so I know he isn't dumb but god is he completely useless when it comes to technology.
>> "There was a message on my phone and I don't know what to do?" - "Okay? And what did it say?" - "I don't know, I didn't read it." - "And how am I supposed to help you without knowing what I'm helping you with?" - shrug "I thought you were the expert."

Best thing I've found for this is to re frame the idea into something they understand. My moms a nurse and use to do this all the time, one day I went to her place and simply told her that "I hurt" for about 15 min, while she tried to diagnose what was wrong.

She got pretty pissed at me for a few min, but once I explained what I was doing and why, she had an allegory to understand why I was so frustrated when she wouldn't give me the error message.

Granted now she writes down EVERY SINGLE ERROR on her computer, but at least its a step in the right direction.
This is what I deal with as well almost daily-weekly. It's an accomplishment in my eyes when I go a week without any questions like these.
Oh my god, I work retail, and the same people have to have me walk them through using their cards. 

“What do I press if I don’t want cashback?” 
“No” 

“Do you accept? What do I press?” 
“Yes?”

“English or Spanish?” 

Bitch just choose what language do you speak. We’ve been over this 3 times this week. 
It would be really hard to stop myself from suggesting a language other than what she is speaking then watch it all come crashing down. 

This type of attitude is why I was a waitress for exactly half a day. 
I hate it when they are like "It asked me if I want to do [X], should I/do I need that?" The answer is almost always "Well, do you want to do [X]?"
My MIL did that to me. She had an error popping up in Outlook and kept clicking OK on it before either of us could read it. The error message had instructions on fixing the error and she could have done it herself if she actually read it.
Dude same. I taught my grandma, and fortunately after the 3rd time I was just like "if you get a prompt, write down what it says in this notebook and the next time i come over I will help you fix it. She actually is pretty good at it now! Rarely calls me for help anymore, and when she does, its usually something tough
"I thought you were the expert"


*VERY TRIGGERRED*
If the doctor doesn't know what's wrong with you how is he gonna treat you.
I find crtl is a good safe option. 
Expert ability to feign business. Sounds like she works in an office. 
I use the up arrow 😊
I swear that lock screen has a mind of it's own, still not sure how you bring up the password screen properly tbh Enter doesn't always work
Space, Ctrl, any numpad key or Up arrow works. The other arrows just make it bounce which is fucking stupid. I actually press the first number of my pin to make it go up, then press it again to enter it so I don't have to move my hand.
I have learned to understand why they do this. The issue is that by explaining the cause of the issue, you show them their issues are their own fault. They naturally want to deny this because they didn't mean to do it, so by admitting it was a mistake is to admit that they are ignorant, and know less than their children, which must hurt. So they just say they didn't, because they believe they didn't, because they don't know any better.
Yeah which I totally understand, and honestly doesn't bother me for small issues, but.. my mom managed to wipe her drive because she thought it was a nice helpful option to get rid of viruses and then got mad that all her stuff was gone, while denying she made any mistakes, EVEN THOUGH she walked me through the steps she took to prove to me that it was the computers fault, and I saw exactly what happened. Even after explaining that that's what that button does, and that she shouldn't mess with it in the future, she stood her ground and said she knows what it's SUPPOSED to do (clean viruses apparently) and that the computer made a mistake when she pushed it.

Even I have my limits, and that was them haha.

My dad on the other hand, is fantastic about things like this. When he calls me with computer problems, he describes exactly what's happening, exactly what he did leading up to the issue, and does EXACTLY what I tell him to the letter. He may not really understand any of it, but he's basically the perfect IT customer haha.
We all have to do this... We live in a world of high specialization. I don't know about cars, I don't know about electrical work or plumbing. I don't know about gardening or baking, or most shit with computers. There is no shame in not being an expert. I fuck stuff up all the time. If I'm asking someone for help, I need help. If someone is an asshole about it, or acts all high and mighty because I happen to fall into their realm of knowledge on a particular occasion, I might not respond well, but I don't get why older people are so averse to receiving help in their weak areas. We all have them.
Well I wasn't rude about it, and I don't have any problem with people not knowing things. I don't know lots of things. My issue is with being faced with the undeniable fact that your actions led to a mistake and being incapable of recognizing that, which leads to that mistake continuing to happen in the future because you're too stubborn to learn from what you did. My mom does this a lot, in many areas of life, and it has led to a ton of issues for her and the people and her.
Ugh my mom does this. She double clicks everything and if it doesn’t load something immediately she’ll just keep clicking it over and over. 
Oh my god, the constant clicking. Click once, or click twice. Some things you click once, some things you click twice. Try clicking it once first. Wait. Nothing happened? Try clicking it twice. Under no circumstances are you to click anything on your desktop five times. 

What do you mean you only clicked it twice? I heard you! I'm right here! You clicked it five times! Do you not have fine motor control over your hands?! Count to two! ONE. TWO. CLICK ONE. TWO. HOW DO YOU FEED YOURSELF!?
I got a virus on my dong

Damn hackers 
So Windows phone has some advantages then
Yeah, but only because NOBODY writes anything for windows phones.
Same reason Macs don't get viruses.
Please tell this to my father, who swears by Apple's superiority, because "iPhones can't get viruses". "There has never been a virus for iPhones because the code was written so that they can't get them."
wow what a clever solution I can't believe nobody else in the history of software engineering has ever decided to just write virus proor software its unbelievable I tell you
Pshsh tell that to my Siemen's nuclear centrifuge; I can't get it to quite work, but the screen is giving me feedback so... 
A new ~~weapon~~ virus to surpass Metal Gear
Well rootkits are a thing, and they'll mess you up if you let them.
Well, you see, the internet is a series of tubes.
That’s why fiber optics are so much better than old copper wires. The storage space.
Happy cake day!
Huh. Thanks
Just like when my dad accused me of being "highed up" one day back when I was in high school.  Actually... I wasn't.  That day, at least.
Happy cake day!
I know! I can't believe he would be selfish enough to curse all computers to ever enter that house by installing Steam.
Seriously, how can people be this crazy?

My mom hates video games but at least she recognizes that her laptop isn't getting slowed down by the copy of Darkest Dungeon I have on there for when I'm housesitting.
The strength of my mothers opinions on something are directly related to how ignorant she is about it. The only “computer game” she could name is Nintendo (right) but she’s 100% sure that games are a fad that corrupt the minds of kids, have not artistic value and are a complete waste of time compared to watching mindless TV. * *
Only mildly? You must have a lot of patience!
Exactly. Live and learn.
She's not my MIL anymore, so thankfully no :-)
Damn don’t say this. My partner just jumped into it and he is the one who currently is my system admin for my small business hahahaha. Hope he doesn’t start charging me. Maybe I can broker a deal 😂😂
Me and my husband have a running joke about me sleeping with the handyman to get free fixes. 
Make a shortcut on the desktop, name it Minecraft, delete it with her watching, profit!
Do the following: download Minecraft from like 3 different launchers and fill her desktop with MC shortcuts and the like :-P
Welcome to tech support. Only job I've had where people ask me questions about something they know nothing about, then immediately tell me I'm wrong.
The joys of customer service!
r/talesfromtechsupport
I fixed that by doing changes to everything so it would be way faster to fix for me and slightly more inconvenient for them to use. Then proceeding to swear that if the inconvenient part wasn't there the next time I wouldn't fix it.

I stuck to it and there is now only one person in my family with the right to ask for technical assistance.... who also happens to be the only other one with an still non-infuriating operative sistem to look at.
Usually you can just restart the computer and if that don't work, download the windows update.  problem solved. 
My favorite part is asking them if they need it with a response of yes. When I ask why they need it "..." 
Funny how that’s exactly how being a primary care doc is like nowadays 
I stopped fixing shit when I got my own laptop and they stopped blaming me. It’s easy as that.

That’s a valuable life lesson too. Don’t get involved when you do t have to be and where they’d blame you for not being able to fix an existing problem or even for a new unrelated problem they could create after you’re done. I’ve learned this one the hard way as well.
I bought two computers. One for me, one for my parents. I built them both identical. 

Mine is running smooth as can be after 3 years. Theirs takes ages to do anything. 

Exact same specs, they still think it’s video games from my nephew that ruined their computer. 
I have to get outta this thread. It's hitting to close to home and making me frustrated 
It annoys me so much 
When people do that I call them stupid and tell them to it themselves since they know so much more than me.
I bought my own pc early in life. I then backed up and wiped the family pc. Told them i give them a month before they complain its slow. It ended up being a little more then a month but i told them tuff nuggets you did this you fix it.
I can't tell if you are taking about computers or our country.
Which is why you change the admin password and the password to the admin acount so they can't do that crap.
It's early on-the-job-training for most client support industries.
A very common response when customers are informed something is going to cost them. They go into some form of denial. But it was working fine,they say. But this never happened before , they say. But that's not what happened last time, they say. It's like they lose all reasoning power. 
Oh no ;-; I was absolutely in love with neopets. I collected over 40 of the "Starry" variants in total. Miss those days...
My stepmother was once so set on the idea that neopets was a virus that she told us she deleted neopets and we couldn't play it anymore. Not that she deleted our accounts, she claimed she deleted the entire site. 
She was pissed when we still were able to access it. 
She probably closed the browser page.
Link?
My google-fu failed me, I have only my memories.
That would be a long phone call, you can only put one pet in the pound a day and that's as close to deleting as you get unless you self freeze your full account.... I mean.. 

That's awful and I hate parents who blame everything on what the kids are doing online instead of their dumb toolbars or whatever. Totally don't play neopets or anything.
Well now we know Why people annihilate their families. 
I have a hard drive marked as red "low disk space" and like 200gb free. I think windows just warn on the last 10% for thing like Defrag that need space to move stuff arround. 
It does, 10% is the warning level. Which is why I don't like using % as the defining factor. It's valid in one way but with today's hard disk sizes a bit more thought needs to be applied (which most users either can't or don't). 

There's plenty of valid reasons to keep some free space on the disk. Defrag doesn't need 10%, however (and modern OS'es don't really need to Defrag, and they absolutely don't on SSD). Speed of the system isn't one of them. 
Depends. Loading times are definitely shorter if your data is in one big block and not a few hundred. On a HDD that is.
Mom was right. Keeping at least 25% free space leaves room for the os to move things around in the background.
No, she isn't. At least not at the level she's thinking. 

I work in enterprise IT. I agree that leaving some space free is needed. But not 25%; usually not even 25 GB. Swap space is accounted for in the free space figure and temp file space doesn't need to be huge unless you know you're processing large files (she isn't). 

Can a full disk mean a slow system? Yes, if there's less than a gig free. But on a laptop where mom is using email, Facebook, and office apps, plus the occasional photo edit, with 50 GB of free space, no, it doesn't. 
If you say so mr expert. ;)
Why are you belittling him? 

Don’t be a dick. 
If you think he's wrong, then please come up with a counterpoint instead of leaving a passive-aggressive comment.
I'm not him, but here's some food for thought: https://superuser.com/questions/1256074/how-much-space-to-leave-free-on-hdd-or-ssd
Oh I'm not here for the discussion, I'm just a bit annoyed at his attitude. Thank you for the link though.
You actual cock
Isn't that what the cache is for? If you've been on a website before, it automatically loads it without having to download because you already did it? Forgive me if I'm wrong, I'm a fucking idiot when it comes to these things lol
Basically, yes. A cache is some mechanism by which data is readily available for speedy access. There are many types and levels of caches.

For example a CPU has caches that can provide data match faster rather then recomputing the same data. A CPU cache might be 2-16MB. Not that big for media storage. There are other caches at the hardware level.

However what you arw referring to are temporary files stored on your HDD like any other file. The browser actively saves media to your HDD as you access it. Revisiting the same site can load some of this media from the HDD which is much faster than redownloading from the internet.

Also, we are talking about the desktop which does not really have anything to do with the internet. Every icon on your desktop is an object. The PC has to refer to that object and load it's properties, mainly links and images, into the RAM. It's probably mainly loading the images that's the slowest bit. It's still not a big deal these though. It's not particulary intensive I don't think.

FYI I am only slightly less of a dumbass and I don't exactly know how it all works fundamentally.
Ah. Gotcha. I wouldn't really know on PC, but I use Android where I've seen that.
Pharmacist technically 
I got sucked into a game like that for about a year and a half. It *was* boring, but if you're depressed or your life has little/no external structure  (my game was mostly populated by disable people, NEETs, and stay-at-home moms), it offers routine. This goes especially if the game has daily events at scheduled times.
You guys think that is bad? My dad has been playing the same word search puzzle game for 6 years now. Every day. 4-5 hours. 

A word search puzzle game... This is the same man who used to tell me how weird I was that I didn't get tired of playing GAMES (Yes plural). He burnt the UI into the screen.
everyone in my middle school did that
Don’t tell her about Clash Royale then. Lmao
Oh she already plays that too haha
Oh good. It’s a game I’ve been playing daily for well over a year now and it’s better than Clash of Clans IMO
My mum is addicted to this five block tetris thing, and won't give up on this one level and is spending hours on it.
> Uninstalling mcafee also helped

Nice try.
What? McAfee and Norton are viruses in their own rights. They slow down your computer, nag you with popups, install toolbars, change your homepage, are a bitch to uninstall, and yet they still have the audacity to charge you for a service that in no way functions well.
Edit: Missed the joke, OP was saying McAfee is a complete pain to uninstall. Give that person your updoots
I think the joke was about how McAfee is a bitch to uninstall.
Thanks! Totally missed that one.
I think the joke being that McAfee always manages to find threats
A Chromebook runs a forked version of linux modified by google technically it **could** be an extension that's a virus.
Yeah honestly looking at weird stuff early on as a kid helped me develop a safe sense of how to navigate and avoid. You tend to learn a sixth sense of telling if something would be bad to see or not just based on the content around it.

I grew up with the internet, which feels weird, because most of the people on Reddit here grew up while it was still in its infancy. I think I've had a life that not many others will have because I experienced some of that early internet, and quickly grew into this modern UI style. Of course, there are millions that have had a similar experience, but with the next and last few years, that has changed. I'm scared for the future. I see dangerous trust, addiction, and safety problems everyday, especially with my friends kids. Its terrifying to see a 4 year old with unrestricted access to the internet, and since I'm not their kid, I won't try to police them, but I hope nothing scars them, or they don't get approached by a fucking pedo on ROBLOX of all things.
she's got it good, pornhub has it covered. Back in my day, we had to DCC porn off IRC and it took 15 hours for a 5 min slap and tickle.
My dad calls Mozilla 'Mozzarella Firefox' and my mum can't get her head around why she's able to access *her* emails from *any* computer. 
I told my husband that if I ever become that woman, the one who is still struggling to understand the very bottom-end basics of a technology that's been widespread for more than two decades, then it's time to put me in a home.
But Firefox is even better and it cares about privacy!
It took long enough to con them into chrome, im not doing it every time one not bad browser is slightly better than the other 
Firefox became too difficult to install addons on.  After spending 1-2 hours one night struggling to install an add on that should have taken 5 seconds I switched to chrome... and it took 5 seconds.

Firefox wanted you to use a developer version and manually change bits of code or something stupid since the add on wasn't approved.
>the add on wasn't approved

They should make it easier to install unapproved add-ons, so that people like OPs parents can do it?
then don't try to use illegal black market mafia crime family hacker deep web addons
Yeh download tor already 
Tor is firefox
The past six months Firefox has been crashing due to memory problems. I tried to fix it but nothing worked. I've had to switch to Chrome and I don't like it. But at least the broswer isn't crashing anymore. Really upsetting because I love Firefox.
My dad thinks anything I put on his computer is a virus that makes it slower. I managed to convince him to use chrome but he won’t let me put Adblock on it because he thinks it’ll make the computer slower. 

Meanwhile, he clicks a TON of ads to the point where my parents have lost money from it before...
I read somewhere that 10% of the people click on 90% of the ads. He's just trying to do his part.
My father straight up tried to forbid me from using Chrome on the house computer because he legitimately believed that any browser other than IE would automatically put viruses on the computer. 

Edit: a word
My grandmother used to always say her computer was broken or had a virus. One time when I was visiting her she asked me to look at her computer explaining that her computer was broken because it wouldn't power on, so first thing  I asked her was if it was plugged in or not which she said it was because she checked. Get under the desk, thing isn't plugged in. So i pluged it in and explained  that to her, but she still to her grave was convinced it was a virus.

She also thought the windows 10 update prompt was a "windows virus." Everything to her was a virus because of mass media
I did that same thing, but then I found a great way to explain it.  
"The internet is your local tv stations.  They all come to your house over the same airwaves, and you can use any tv to watch them.  The browsers are just different tvs."
This is brilliant...thank you
Just change the Chrome icon to the IE one, problem solved :)
I still haven't convinced my father, who has been an online gamer since the 90s, that chrome isn't a virus and is faster than ie.
That's why in Front End Web Development we decided to never change anything on the UI...
You know..."e" for internet!
Damn that's a pretty good idea! I never thought of swapping the icons... I'm gonna do this right now. LPT right there 
My dad kept removing firefox and chrome because "firefox is a virus" and "Google is skynet". He's not really wrong about the latter, but I'd rather trust proto-skynet than the dump that is IE.
Is there a reason you did this though? For most people IE would probably suffice. 
IE has never sufficed...for anyone.
Well if you’d kept them updated they’d just be on Edge by now right? And there’s nothing wrong with Edge. 
I've used IE all my life, it's always worked great for me.
Ugh. My dad works in IT, and yet refuses to believe me when I say ie is a shitty browser.
I had to do this to my Dad's laptop. It's mildly infuriating.
Some old people just can't comprehend internet browsers. No matter how many times I explain that Google the website, the Google app, and the chrome app, are not the same thing they just don't get it.
I have done this to my mom. It took her a few weeks to notice.
My in-laws don't understand the difference between the desktop, Windows, and Chrome/Firefox. I'll ask them to go to their desktop, they open Chrome. I ask what version of Windows they have, "It's Chrome." 🤤
Man, people need to stop licking Google's balls. But at the same time, gotta respec the icon replacement XD
Using chrome = licking googles balls?
Well, yes. Why give them your data when you could use Firefox and get the same improvement over IE without unnecessarily giving away your data.
Thats licking balls?
He must have boring sex
I still don't understand the argument against Explorer/Edge saying it's really slow, never in my life have I noticed any difference in speed between it, Mozzilla, or Chrome. If your parents only do basic web browsing, your insistence on switching them to Chrome may have just been an unnecessary added confusion for them.
Edge is significantly less bad than IE 6-9 were. And devs hate IE because Triton was dogshit and forced then to pixel push for years to get just IE to look half decent compared to the other browsers.
As a dev Safari is worse than Edge in cross browser support with its incomplete Flexbox implementation... And also <input type="date" />...
Still though, despite it not being the most suitable browser for devs, I dont see the reason why the original commenter would make his parents switch away from it when the parents clearly aren't devs
Ha nice try microsoft. If they complain about the internet being slow constantly when it really isnt, its the browser, also their pc is a piece of shit so chrome does work a lot nicer for them. 
Nice try, Google. Maybe their computer is slow because as you stated, it's shit, and installing a browser that eats so much storage space only bogged it down even more...
Nope runs much faster now and they are really glad I “fixed the internet” 
but chrome is not faster
Is on their pc, you’re welcome to pop round and check.
it's the most consuming RAM browser, you should get vivaldi
Nah im fine.
Just change the icon to the internet explorer icon
Pff, my mom doesn't even know what right-clicking is
My grandpa taught me how to use PCs. Then about 10 years ago he got a Mac. Then a couple years ago he says "what's right click"... You taught me, remember? 
You’ll need to triple click alternating left-right-left sir

/s
I have to say I have deffo been guilty of this!
It was drugs in the Halloween candy for me like people just give away their coke for free
There has only been recorded instances and it was a dad doing it to his own son to get life insurance and in order to not be suspicious he gave poison to other kids in the neighborhood 
And people giving out free drugs. 

I did drugs for years. No one gives them out for free. 
And now poison injected into water bottles apparently
If they've bred wouldn't that make them... parents? 
I like French bread!
“Bred” is a kind of fucked up dehumanizing term.

I’d agree more with “dumb people who have spread their dumb ideas”
Don’t breed
Yeah, you're definitely a breeder.
Please stop spreading your ideas?
It's good enough for the other animals, no?
I'm only 30 but my mum used to lay into me so hard for "reading too much" and saying it was bad for me and would ruin my eye sight. Meanwhile she's not read a book in over 35 years and is dumb as bricks...
Yeah, you know those sites that have many colorful DOWNLOAD HERE banners that are links to malicious sites and then the real download link is just plain hypertext just below them? My dad will go "this one?" "No" "this one?" "No" "this one?" "No" on EVERY banner before reaching the right link, no matter how many times I show him where it is lol. Then obviously if he does that when I'm not at home he will tell me that he clicked the right one. 
Make a fake tinder and WhatsApp in front of her to show her just how easy it is to fake things.
go with her!!! don't let her go alone
i can't, i have school. i talked to her and she seemed to have checked everything because of having the same fears. he seems to be a legit person and apparently they have skyped too. i still dont trust him but what can i do but hope
It's so ducked up that people actually do this.
Well for one thing, roofies didn't exist in their day.
My kid met his girlfriend on Xbox live, now I spend my weekends driving him an hour away to watch her play high school matches, see movies, or hang at her house. It doesn't seem weird until I think about it. I'm old.
You're a cool parent if you do as much as drive a combined four hours just so your kid can keep up a relationship.
Haha. I go from feeling overindulgent for doing it, to feeling guilty when I can't. I remember being that age, so I hate that they can't see each other as easily. 
My mom likes playing Words with Friends. She's shown me some of the chats from people she plays against, half of them being guys flirting with her.
I met my wife on Myspace. Still not sure which of us is the serial killer.
I met my husband online, it turns out he *was* a very convincing chatbot. 
Met my wife online,  
Still haven't found the axe.
You should probably meet her in person and find out.
> I can't be 100% sure she's not a very convincing chatbot.

How do you feel about very convincing chatbots? 
Wan sum fuk bby? No string connect, just good fuk fun time. I won't do stabs. Promise.
Just give her your credit card info. Then you should be safe. 
Who is this Four Chan?
Presumably he's much more dangerous than Three Chan but can't hold a candle to Five Chan. Six Chan is way out.
Yeah, you might get married or smt, just be careful!
And here's me thinking a virus would be bad, at least you can get rid of a virus by paying a profesional a small fee. It takes a much larger fee to 'get rid' of a spouse and an entirely different class of 'professional'.
Yeah, she might give him a pop up.
Found OP's mum and dad
Are you one of Joe's friends? Is that Tom? Hi Tom, say hello to your Aunt Judith for us, much love. And do you know where Joe is, he's not answering his cell. Bye Tom.
[deleted]
But it's the.....Internet....
Okay I am laughing my ass off but only because you just reminded me of my smartass bf.
> smart ass-bf

***

^(Bleep-bloop, I'm a bot. This comment was inspired by )^[xkcd#37](https://xkcd.com/37)
Good bot
Good bot
xD
tgirls? 
Tyrannosaurus rex girls 
[deleted]
made my day
what disrespect?
What? Is that actually what they meant? I thought the girlfriend might be a murdering drug dealer who’s trying to steal his money. What does being on tinder have to do with being trans?
Just because you're insecure about your life choices doesn't mean it's not funny
They had doubts about their relationship but when they matched in tinder they realised they were meant to be together
Could still be the gas station. Check for card skimmers.
I’m not old, but I am like your dad.

I just find searching around to be stressful and exhausting. If I know a product will fulfill my needs, I have no problem paying more for it to avoid that anxiety.
If I could pay less, I’d love to, but to me that is secondary.
My dad would be aghast at such reckless consumer habits. He always shops around. For EVERYTHING. 
Do I have a long lost sibling? My dad spent like a week trying to get a crate of canned pumpkin dirt cheap, succeeded , but you better believe that shit got donated cuz *wtf are we gonna do with all this pumpkin dad?!*
The site with the top Google ranking is less likely to be a scam than the site with a price that's lower than everyone else on the internet. If you aren't good at spotting fake websites, your dad's method is probably the safest. 
Yeah, but that's not why he's doing it. The last time he did this he needed two cardboard boxes. He bought 15 of them for $60 because he just wanted to get it over with and buy them. He could have gone to Walmart and bought two boxes for like $2 a piece. 
>My dad is the complete opposite. He will just Google what he wants and buy the one on the first Google link. He is always getting overcharged because he doesn't want to search around.

This is where the real pleassure of having money comes from. Not fancy cars or stuff like that. Just grabbing some pasta in the grocery store and getting on with your life, without checking the price to weight ratio of all 5 different kinds.
I just check major retailers really. Amazon, eBay, Walmart, maybe target or Fred Meyer. I’m not risking some side site. 
Ayyy
https://m.imgur.com/t/repost/ZxU8R6Z
Damnnnnnn
Who would you rather fight?
Nice. 
[deleted]
Me too! But because of the murders not this comment
The case of the missing comma.
Is she a bot? 

Edit: Because his wife is a she. 
*oof*
I'd tell you you're wrong, without having any argument for my side. Then when you try to explain the juiciest, most indisputable points, I'll just shut you out and ignore you completely.
That seems entirely reasonable. 
Meanwhile, I still remember my mom or someone saying something like the following (and seeing others reporting having the same experience as a joke): 


Me: "Yea I have this friend on the internet and we play blah blah"

Them: "Careful who you talk to,  how do you know they're not a pedophile trying to prey on you" 

Me: "You know I'm 25 now .."
Does anyone remember the Arthur fist meme?
Si
Yee think me be he?
Oui 
Ja
はい
Ναι
Siouid.
да
Привет русский! (In case you are not Russian then you can go lie to a non Russian thanks. (TL;DR: FUCK OFF.))
I learnt a small amount of Russian from my Grandmother, who wanted to work there a while ago.
لا
King.
是的
Evet
Yes 
𓍘𓏲𓀁
Certe
[deleted]
[https://redd.it/r/Showerthoughts/8duaqq/dxq8soo/](https://www.reddit.com/r/Showerthoughts/comments/8duaqq/our_parents_warned_us_for_years_about_the_dangers/dxq8soo/?utm_content=permalink&utm_medium=api&utm_source=reddit&utm_name=Showerthoughts)
You know, like "why I oughta bludgeon you with a hammer". 
Pow, bang, zoom, right to the Tesla!
I just knew you were a hun.
Stranraer?
Rangers?
The Magnificent Gorgie Boys?
St Johnstone?
Arbroath?
"M as in 'Mancy'..."
Working for an Apple provider:

There are so many old people who write down their passwords and even show them to me so I can type them in for them. I could easily remember them and hijack their Apple-Account if i wanted. I really gave up suggesting them to just use KeePass instead of writing them down on a piece of paper. 

The same people who later state that they’ve must been hacked; Me wondering where they suddenly gained that knowledge from. 
Writing down your password isn't that big of a deal. If someone was to break into your home the last thing they care about is your email password. It's not ideal but the risks are slim.
It is for me if you carry it around with your MacBook. To be clear, there are often also online banking passwords stored in Safari. To be fair, there are a few variables at play here and losing the passwords doesn’t mean you’re in immediate danger of losing money or valuable data but it was always mind boggling to me. 
Even storing them in the browser is okay compared to other options these people otherwise would use.
As long as the computer itself has some kind of password of course
The issue with passwords is, you are supposed to choose a different one everytime, and they should contain a lot of different types of characters and not resemble words. Also you shouldn't write them down anywhere. Now people usually have 20-50 accounts somewhere. So the requirement to deal with them correctly is to be a genius.
And misspelled it the first 5 times before the very patient polite scammer got it. 
Somewhere no one would think to look... under the keyboard or some crazy place like that
My partners Nana has a book which she purchased and is genuinely a published passwords notebook. Like has space for website, username, password etc. Alphabetical order and everything. 
It's not that bad of a thing to do, since it allows you to easily have different complex passwords for everything. As long as you don't get burgled, your online things are safe
My granddad was sharp as a tack - he was completely tech savvy, and when he passed in 2011, the biggest problem was that nobody could access his stuff, because he never wrote down passwords...
Yes! My grandpa does this too!
@ my dad
Eating candy is actually one of the five secrets. If you don’t believe me, don’t forget that it said number five would blow your mind.
What about a shady van that says "flat stomachs"?
A shady van that offered five secrets to having a flat stomach?
Complained... That her ads were gone... I'm having serious trouble wrapping my mind around that.
Agreed.  Use as many sorces as possible.

Still never trust a damn thing on the internet.  Always use that method in my opinion. 

My friends get mad when I ask questions about a topic they are well versed in. They tell me to google it. Sorry, but I will ALWAYS trust people who are good on a topic in real life before using google... easier to spot the trolls.
My grandma plays tons of candy crush and knows not to pay for anything. Just gotta keep up enough to get by.
to be fair, bill gates can afford to pay for porn, so he doesn’t have to click on sketchy free porn ads.
You say this now, but wait until the next thing becomes cybernetic enhancements and connecting your brain to a computer. Half our generation will be worried about getting a virus in their heads while the new one is taking notes in lecture without moving their hands.
I want thisssssssss
Thank you for suggesting this.
I'm not really sure, but she isn't usually this gullible. My father passed away recently, so my mom isn't in a very good state of mind right now. I guess whoever's scamming her decided to take advantage of this. I wish I knew how to help her, but she's so stubborn.
lonely people man. 

they probably know deep down it's a scam, but they're lonely and when people get older the other sex stops paying much attention to them. so it's 'well it's probably a scam, but on the off chance it's real this might be my last opportunity to find love.'
I want that on a tshirt
Very pithy.
If thomeone dethieved you, you'd be pithy too
When conthidering what may or may not be the truse, it'th nethethary to hyposethithe the thenario in which one becomes pithy in rethponthe to mithinformatthion.
Very sad but true. I always feel for older people trying to find love. I hope everyone can find someone without getting scammed. 
If Friends were a show today I feel this would totally be a Ross storyline.
hilarious_video.exe
Ah, nostalgia from I LOVE YOU...
You only needed those on CRT monitors because the picture would burn in. That's not really an issue on LCD screens unless you leave it on for a very long time.
I like the slide shows that Chromecast shows when you aren't watching anything. I leave my TV on a lot because of them. That's basically a screen saver. 
Modern screens don’t get burn-in like older ones used to. Screen savers aren’t necessary anymore, but some people still like them for nostalgic or aesthetic effect.
Linux Mint has dope screensavers.
Not as much need for them with today’s monitors. They were originally meant to protect CRT monitors from burn in. 
Tell that to OLED
I have one of those realistic aquarium screen savers that I put on while I'm listening to music and doing stuff around the house. It is really nice. Fish even swim between multiple monitors. So much easier to maintain than a real salt tank. 

It does not, however, activate automatically. I have hotkey set up for it. If it is not running my pc will just go to sleep to save electric. 

Edit: just to clarify. The screen saver will activate automatically if you set it up in the control panel like any other screen saver. I just choose not to have it start after x amount of time. 
I'm intrigued. What's the program called
https://serenescreen.com/product/maquarium3/
Asciiquarium.
You might like wallpaper engine
Man, I love wallpaper engine, but there's so so much weeabo bs to wade through even using filters
Yeah it's ridiculous. I usually filter out anime to get rid of most but fucking hell
Wow, that looks great. I've been using display fusion for wallpaper management but I will definitely check this out. Thanks. 
Laptops. Screensavers use power which laptops don't have.
The first thing after a clean install, is ALWAYS shut the screensaver off. Monitor going off is good enough after 30 minutes.
I was just thinking last week how it would be cool to install After Dark again.
I have my Mac screensaver set to the old Windows maze screensaver
There are still a few included with modern Linux and Windows.  Most people don't bother with them though because a blank screen or power save mode is far more energy efficient.  
As opposed to?
What is even the point of so many of these toolbars anyway? 
The medical thing hit home. My dad had a QUINTOUPLE bypass. Still eats terribly and is over 300 lbs. "Well the pipes are clean now."
As a son going through this exact situation, do you have any advice? I know he wants to do better, but he is very misguided/in denial.
> No behavioral changes are made. 

Here we go.  

"I keep fucking this girl with syphilis."

"Maybe ... wear some protection?"

"NO JUST ANTIBIOTICS"


Like my dad after his bypass.  Changed his behavior for about three weeks then went right back to eating KFC and not doing shit.  "Didn't the doctor tell you to get some cardio and eat better food?" "I don't need to, I feel great!"
Weaponized autism.
Don’t be too impressed. It was super easy to find the town it was in because he was posing for every in the towns pictures of him. That kind of help narrow it down. 
Got a link? That sounds amazing
That’s what you get with weaponized autism.
Can we not glorify the bad guys please.
Kek
oh man did i just get trolled by a 4chan user? oh man what am i gonna do.
That was once they got pretty close. To get to the point that you can even do that is pretty awesome, imo.
I started sending my moms back factually corrected in red text and now she doesnt send them anymore.
When I get chain messages like that I just delete them
I feel like they invented Facebook for this. Instead of chain emails I get tagged in every picture/video claiming all this kind of stupid shit. I also get them messaged to my inbox. Drives me nuts.
+1, can't agree more.

I dated a girl who's Dad legitimately thought Michelle Obama was transgender. Dad wasn't American, so it wasn't an ideology thing, he just genuinely thought Michelle was transgender.
Was a dead threat or a curse?
It was a curse I think
God I had totally forgotten about those, thanks for the memories 
...even though they weren't so great?
Not the original.poster but same for my dad and yes, it is the same for him. He always says I am better at finding the right car, but I have no idea how they work, while he coild build one from scratch.
He also loves to repair old-timers in his spare time, hence the car analogy... He uses them for a lot of things 
Yeah I’m very cutting edge in my views and perceptions. (I mean that in the humblest form of humble brag) 

When new tech comes out, most people think “what would I need that for?” 

While I look at it and think “Oooh this is great, I bet I can use this for XYZ!”
Self-driving cars with poor hacker protection would he a murderer's dream
Ticks every single one of your criteria!
I'm the youngest guy in my IT department and it's really cool seeing all these people in their 40s-50s actually knowing more about real world topics like AIX and virtualization than me that I learn new things from daily

It's like college only I get paid
Yeah, in an other post I talk about my dad who did school IT, my mom on the other hand...

> What's a computer?
Not necessarily. A lot of coupons are available to be printed online, but require you to download the 'coupon printer' application. Even those linked through major retailers or products. The program is awful, slows down everything and definitely grabs data from you even when you aren't using it. But every mom/discount/coupon blog recommends you have it. 
Ruining your computer is just not worth saving fifty cents on tylenol, Sharon. And please stop tagging me in memes. 
Oi Tan, tudo bem?
Olá?
Haha, nós não é BR fake não man!
The coupon printing program is actually legit. (Assuming it's the one from coupons.com) It ensures that you can't just print off 100s of the same coupon. I believe it limits you to either 2 or 4 copies per coupon. 

What about the reprint button on the printer
Yea. Not the smartest system.
But what I CAN tell you is there's a lot of "###" and body slamming.
Oh
Someone who saves porn is probably inexperienced and installing shit.
The most tech-savvy people I know all save porn.

The non-savvy ones can't figure out how to get a download link to work.
Now that I think of it, I wish I was downloading these back in my early years of adventuring. When nostalgy kicks in I want to rewatch some of them, only to find out that they are either unavailible or on different sites with shit quality.
See, that's always the real rub.

There is always going to be porn available in one form or another, even if we have to go back to drawing it in caves, what is difficult is having the porn you *want* available. Which is a lot less certain.
Why on earth would you save porn?

Do they think the internet will break? There's SO MUCH PORN. It's just wasted space...
Higher quality (No way you're streaming 4k 120fps porn), no chance of mirrors going down (especially a risk in niche fetishes), easier organization and retrieval (It's a hassle when mirrors are uploaded but only to shady-ass sites that probably add you to some russia botnet if you visit them), assurance that you will always have access to your favorites, etc. And some people live in areas that have slower internet.

And I mean, any argument that could be used against downloading pornography also goes for downloading music/movies/tv-shows too. They are all *available* through streaming, but that doesn't mean people won't *want* to download them too.

It's also probably worth noting that most of the tech-savvy people I know aren't exactly pressed for hard-drive space. Personally I'm just a data hoarder in general, so I've got about 32tb available in my current setup, but even the 'normal' people are rocking at a least a solid few TB. A full length movie at 1080p is only a few gigs, and 4k is only a couple of times more than that, so you can store a decent amount of footage without it being a drain on resources.

And that's especially true since the price of HD space is going down all the time. Even if you do run into a wall it's fairly trivial to buy an external enclosure and move past it.
Sounds like she got punk’d
My best buy experience.

"Thanks for calling Best Buy how can i help you?"

"My gigabit broke"

"Just to make sure do you mean your computer sir?"

"I mean my GIGABIT!  Can I get someone who knows what the fuck theyre talking about?!"

Every.  Single.  Day.
She did that to herself? We used to do that to peoples pcs then hide their icons as a prank lol
she didnt do that herself... someone did it to here... ive have done that to multiple ppl for a good laugh.. and the best one is just adding a folder and call it porn or something then screenshot and make it background then delete the folder... profit
I worked at Best Buy for 3 years during college and that was the most frustrating thing for me. Not that people needed help, but when people were not able to properly use something they thought “well, there are only two possibilities. Either 1) I don’t know what I am doing or 2) they sold me a piece of junk. Well, I’m fucking awesome, so option 1 is definitely out. Time to go scream at whoever is at customer service.”
When I was in Geek Squad, I had to teach someone how to use a computer. Like, they had no clue what to do when I said left click. How, in 2016, could a middle aged couple have had zero interaction with a computer? Ever? I'm so glad I don't work there anymore.
i did that (took a screenshot of his home screen and made that his background picture) to my dad once as a prank and the next day i came home from school and he’s telling me about how something really weird happened to his phone and he called apple or whatever other company it was (i forget now, this was like four years ago) and they had him FACTORY RESET HIS WHOLE PHONE. when i told him it was just a screenshot and his home screen, he was livid. i would be too if i had to factory reset my phone, but god what a mess. 
My deaf mom has had Best Buy employees call me to figure out what my mom is saying.... it’s usually something along these lines. Best Buy has replaced three of her phones. I had to save the number to the Best Buy she visits so that I know I need to answer these calls. I. Am. So. Sorry. 
Haha I can relate to this so hard. I used to be Geek Squad and our mobile team would always be calling me over for elderly customers that seemed to think mobile also meant troubleshooting and repairs. So many things ranging from "why did they do this?" to "How did they accidentally do this?". Those were fun days.
I feel you. I worked for T-Mobile for 5 years. So many dumbass questions I would spend hours on with people who refused to listen. One lady screamed at me for a while because “this piece of shit battery is defective”, and it was really because she just laid the SIM card under the battery (not in the slot/tray), and crammed it on top. The battery wasn’t even in place. Like it was common sense. When I explained she just walked out without a word. 
Indirect Verizon dealer here, it's the same for us. We're 100% commission but 90% of my day is telling old people to stop downloading "clean your phone" apps and emoji keyboards that take control of their lock screen and phone dialer. Had a lady calling the note 8 a piece of shit a few days ago because she couldn't answer her phone. I uninstalled the emoji keyboard, dialed her number, answered it with ease, and told her to stop downloading these terrible apps. 
I see a few of those every year.

I honestly don't know how they manage to do that on accident.
This will probably get buried, but it's worth it. It was close to fifteen years ago before Best Buy bought out Geek Squad and I was a service technician. A woman calls the store:

Me: Thanks for calling Best Buy...(*blah blah*) 

Woman: Hi, um, I think your servers are on fire.

Me: Excuse me, ma'am?

W: I think your servers are on fire. I was shopping on the website.

Me: Ma'am, I don't understand what servers you're talking about. What is the problem?

W: Well I was shopping on the BB website and my computer started smoking. You need to put out the fire.

(After a few moments of thinking I realize that *this woman thinks the BB servers are at her local best buy, that our servers caught fire, and* ***traveled through the fucking phone line*** *to her PC*.)

Me: Ma'am is your computer smoking?

W: Yes and it's getting worse.

Me: You need to hang up and call the fire department right now!

W: Are you sure? Oh, okay. *click*

I have no idea what happened after that.

Edit: formatting. 
I used to work at Best Buy in home theater and people would call us all the time asking how to install their shit. It was always the old people or poor rednecks buying 55” trash because it’s cheap but expected me to sit on the phone for an hour explaining HDMI again and input selection. Sorry Jim Bo, I have a line of customers and don’t have time to walk you through hooking up your VCR but I can send geek squad out for $100. 
Worked as a cell phone vender before, can confirm. I remember I’d even get the elderly customers telling me their old flip phone won’t turn on because it’s dead even though they’ve been charging it all night. “Did you try turning it on?” Id ask, and I’d get the same answer along the lines of “of course I tried, this things a piece of shit!”. The surprised look on their face when I turned it on for them every. single. time.  was well worth it though.
Nice work... understanding how your message will be received and explaining it in a way the recipient can understand is such an underrated skill.
I use ctrl too, and I have sticky keys off on my PC so I can press it as many times as I want until the screen comes on. Decent way to fuel frustration 
Yeah, space sometimes will do stuff. Best to use control or shift, as they do nothing. Real lazy shifty bunch, those keys.
I work in Digital Forensics. Shift is actually the best option as it doesn't write to the disk. We use this on live systems so evidence isn't compromised.

If we were to use anything else the computer would show an action being performed and the defense can claim the evidence was tampered with.
Fascinating. If I ever need to murder someone with a key I will use shift. The perfect crime.
Lol

A Solid State Drive would be even better as it's near impossible to pull deleted data from it because of it's garbage collection process.
W is obviously the best letter to wake up your computer
You spelt hookers wrong
At least they made it better than it used to be
the darpa chief would be proud snake 
Yeah, his parents do not know what a rootkit is
But unless it spread around the network, how would it persist onto a different computer?
'Have you tried turning it off and on again?'
Have you tried turning it off and walking away forever?
My friends and I all work for big tech companies. Fairly often we get into arguments about how awful computers are and we always end on the same conclusion that we should just turn off all of the computers and leave them that way.
Pray tell. Why should we leave them off?
Because they're awful. Everyone keeps telling me I should reconsider my profession since I work with them every day and play games on them as a hobby. But they just make me so grumpy so often.
It's not just yours mum. There are studies that show how the less people know on a topic, the more confident they are of their knowledge.
I've never in my life been too shy to tell someone they were the reason their computer is fucked up. Ofc they never believe me, but once I get permission to fix the computer "by any means necessary" it works... bc duh.
You got a divorce because of that? Tbh I would too
Delight in the fact that every time the computer is slow, for whatever reason, you still cross her mind for a moment. 



*furrows brow*
"Its all that damn blahbah's fault!"
Knowing her, it's quite possible she hasn't bought a new one since then.
NASA should hire this guy ymmv
My mom once got mad at me and deleted the shortcut for internet explorer, and proudly proclaimed she'd deleted the internet. I was almost crying from laughter.
Can't decide whether to do your idea or u/tanthebrazilian 's idea 
"Deleting Minecraft slowed my computer!"
This is genius!

There will still be a way for the game to be blamed though.
Do this: tape the Minecraft logo to a powerful magnet, and run it over her hard drive. 
Things aren't working: "What are we paying you for?"

Things are working: "What are we paying you for?"
I'd imagine its how doctors feel when their patients are against vaccines. "What do I know? I only went to school for this but I'm sure you're just as qualified"
This describes a lot of jobs, unfortunately.  
I was an auto mechanic for years, then I owned a bicycle repair shop. I have also worked as a sous chef and various retail jobs that require higher-than-average technical knowledge of some kind or another.  
Without exeption, someone will ask **me** a question and then ***argue with me about my answer***.  
If you already know the answer, then why the f*** are you wasting my time?
Try being a doctor. 
> Welcome to being an expert in something.


I do the same type of work. I sorta hate explaining something to someone then they ask "what does that even mean?"
Oh God This! I get fuckwits like this every damn day. "Why isn't this working" So I start remotely fiddling on their pc... "I'm sure you don't do it like that" "I don't do that at home" "WHY have you locked my account?" "I am NOT putting the password in wrong!" "It was fine until the last time YOU updated It!" *they grab the mouse on their side screwing things up even more while sighing loudly in my ear*  

FUCK YOU SIR I'm the one with a fucking DEGREE in this shit LET ME DO MY JOB YOU ARSEHOLE!! (Breathe... just breathe... I leave in four days!!!)
>"I am NOT putting the password in wrong!" 

I'm not suicidal, but when I hear this, for a brief second I want to kill myself. 
My father got into online poker before he passed away, he was born in the 60's, a construction worker his entire life, and pretty clueless when it came to electronics. He was 100 % convinced looking at anything on the web meant you were downloading it permantly. He would frequently get pissed when i was searching on Google or something because I was putting more internet on his computer. I didn't fault him for it though. He was a great man.
Welcome to the automotive industry!
“post cat too lean, you probably need a new catalytic converters” 
“But I read online check engine lights can be because I didn’t get the fuel cap on right”
“That’s true, but not in this case”
“Well my grandpa owned a shop in 19blahblah and he knows better about blahblahblah”
“...yup, bet he does”
*I’ve identified the issue and need you to follow steps one through...*

***It didn’t work.***

*Following steps one through...*

***It didn’t work.***

*Can you please explain what you’re seeing because it should take ten to fifteen minutes for...*

***I don’t think that will work, so I’m not doing it.***
Nope, being a doctor nowadays is pretty much the same
The scientists of the world feel your pain.
Worked retail hardware for years and it’s the same thing. “Hi I need help with *insert random plumbing or hardware question*” ok well you need these parts and...”No that’s not right” despite the person having NEVER done this before 
It's similar to telling your doctor he's wrong. If it's their job I'll trust them any where from the workers from a grocery store to a doctor or lawyer. 
This right here is why I quit tech support. Yes angry 60 year old woman, please, tell me about how careful you are on the internet whilst I remove literally 300 viruses. Must have been "those darn hackers again"
*DOCTOR shit poster* here, how may I be of service 
Can I have dose now, doctor?
Deep fried it just for you. 
Walgreens.
Yeah and the ones who prescribe them
They are a team let’s be real.
Every dealer has a guy growin it. Doctors are just the marketing department 
You want to be a real legal drug dealer? Become a budtender at a dispensary. 
I dont live in a cool enough place for it to be legal :(
Hmm I never thought about it that way! Thanks for clarifying, I think I understand better now:)
Sounds like MMO's.
> This goes especially if the game has daily events at scheduled times.

Games with daily events or daily rewards are almost universally horrible I've found. Usually because that's only one of the many things they use, but it's definitely a sign of a money grab game or whatnot.
What was the game
Is it Animal Crossing? :P
This is why I was sooooo into Farmville for a couple of years. It was havng something to look forward to, even if it's just what kind of sparky sheep could I breed.   Also,  pictionary on spogg.com.  there was a whole community to talk and play with when my marriage was falling apart. 

Now I'm divorced, happy....and here. D:  
I got sucked into MINESWEEPER in this fashion. I was in grad school, working on my capstone research project, working part time, barely keeping up with everything I needed to do, and going through a lot of family problems. I played minesweeper compulsively for hours at a time because I was so anxious that I had replaced working on actual, meaningful tasks with trying to beat my own high scores.

I got pretty good at it too. But I played so much my wrist would hurt from using the mouse. And it wasn't like I really enjoyed minesweeper. It is repetitive and dull. But I couldn't seem to stop.
And I thought my mom was addicted, holy cow.
If this was my parent I would seriously try to get him out of it. As someone else pointed out, the reason this addiction lasts might be because he lacks something else in life. You know your dad best, of course. Perhaps you've thought about it or made an effort already. Just figured I'd tell you.
We definitely tried to make him moderate the time and place he does it at. But at the end of the day it's hard to argue against a man who mainly plays it when he has free time at home in an apartment. And he does give good arguments, like he exercises words and his brain. 

And that is probably where you "lacks something" comes in, my parents do own a small summer cottage with a pretty big lawn at the edge of a forest. That seems to take his attention towards more physical activities.

Also, he is so cheap that he might have played this free to play game for 6 years, but he'd to this day probably still not spend the one time 1$ price tag to unlock the game and be free of the ads and slight disadvantage of having the free version.

At the end of the day I think he's totally fine, though I wish he would read a book too sometimes to actually use that newfound "knowledge". But thanks anyway.
Would Chromebooks allow flash? bc flash is apparently horrible for security
I don't think so it's been a while since I had an actual Chromebook
Mid 20s?
I'm pretty much the same as you, worst thing is seeing peers who are so computer illiterate they don't even know what shift does.
At least he acknowledges or knows of its existence, i explain it to mine once a week and then theyll want me to do something for them or whatever, and theyre somehow using ie again, ask why they arent ysing firefox/chrome and they dont understand what im on about 
I once had a user call in to tell me her "mozzarella stopped working." It took me a good minute to figure out what the hell she was talking about.
This thread seriously makes me feel so blessed about how my parents, the people that raised and educated me, are capable of just normally using PCs. You guys are poor, poor saps if that is what you have to deal with. 
Had to explain that to my mom a couple of years back. They were visiting & my mom mentioned something about not being able to check email. When I realized what she really meant, my head exploded a little bit.
Oh man this kills me. Also anytime anything crucial Internet related thing has to be done (think bills etc.) it can only ever be done from her “secure” out of date 2011 machine that doesn’t have enough ram to run word. Kills me. 
This! I have had hour long conversations of my dad not understanding why he can use any internet connected device to check his own email. It makes him very angry for some reason. 
>My dad calls Mozilla 'Mozzarella Firefox'...

He knows.
😂 yeah... I think you might be on to him there
> *her* emails from *any* computer. 

Wow, I've done IT for years and have been taking care of my computer illiterate families' technology for even longer. But damn, that's a new one to me. 

Not getting "it lives online and you can interact with it through a web browser or email program" is intense. I'll try to keep it in mind next time I'm getting annoyed at a family member for sending me a bizzare question via email. It could be so much worse. 

Good luck in your future endeavors with them and technology. 


My aunt made a huge deal about making sure I logged her email out when she needed to check it on my mom's phone, like almost panic. When I asked why she said because she needed to be able to open her "email box" at work the next day...not understanding you can be logged in on more than once device at a time...she still didn't trust me when I explained that to her. This was like 6 months ago. 
> Mozzarella Firefox

Well for me, that's the name from now on 😁
I love when they call it Foxfire. Like, really?
My God, I never realized how good I had it having a programmer for a father. He introduced me to Firefox, as a matter of fact. Actually, he introduced me to the original Mozilla and then recommended I try Firefox when Mozilla got a little bloated.

My mom still has minor moments of tech illiteracy and pretty much lets me handle all the printer problems, but she's a teacher and she's just had to adapt in many cases. She even uses her phone for email and I don't have to be proud in a condescending way.
My parents are in the sweet spot for me. They're capable of using computers well enough for what they need and no more, so it's still easy for me to show off / be sneaky with them about it. 
Oh jeez my mum is a bit like this. She thinks she only has certain accounts on certain devices, for example that she can only see her email on her phone, or see a certain website on her laptop. 

I pointed out that as they are just websites she can see them on any device, but she will still insist that her email / eBay/ PayPal or whatever account is "different" on different devices (I.e. has different information or different emails.) 
My father, as of 2 years ago, still used IE, got his email through his internet provider, and received said email through POP on MS outlook. 
My boss, an old lawyer, as of 3 years ago was still paying for AOL....because if he didn't pay then he'd lose his email address lol
Back when I got to use the family laptop for the first time, roughly 8 years ago, I always thought it was Mozilla fiferox. Young me was also confused why he couldnt get into the internet to watch youtube. 
I installed Firefox on my in-law's computer ages ago, before Chrome took over as top dog, and they still use it. I'm proud that 15 years ago I got them to change from ie, but I just don't have the time and energy to explain and switch them up again. They're fine. Mom-in-law still tries to comment on people's Facebook walls by writing on her own, but she's getting better.
At least Firefox and Chrome automatically update.
My mom keeps calling it foxfire lol 
Working for a hospital, not a week goes by that a nurse doesn’t call it Foxfire. 
You try drawing for her? The cloud with its stores of info and how you can't access it without the internet? 
No. I felt as though my explanation was clear enough and if she didn't get it from that then is a lost cause. I may try this if it ever crops up again though. It's totally what she'd do if the roles were reversed actually. But it's like she has this weird closed off thing about it though - like she does understand it academically but refuses to believe it's true.
But what if the home has a computer? 

Also this brings up a point, im really excited to find out what the crazy tech that we cant work out is.
By the time blu-ray players came out, my mom (who was 46 at the time) *still* hadn’t figured out how to use a DVD player. So even though the concept is literally the *exact* same, but with better picture and audio, she entirely gave up simply because the name changed and it apparently exhausts her to think about — don’t even get me started on Netflix or Hulu...

Not to mention the fact that after 7.5 years of poking, I finally got her and my stepdad to get iPhones so I can help them when they have issues with their phones, I went home last month and found that my mom didn’t even have me saved as a contact because she couldn’t figure out how to do it, so she’d just keep an eye out for my number when it popped up... 
Holy shit has it been that long... I'm holding on to that argument of yours for future use!
Don't forget the HIV-infected needles hidden in movie theatre seats! That was a viral email making the rounds among Midwestern suburban moms in the late 90s.

EDIT: Or the "stickers" that kids were trading that had cartoon charcaters on them that were really tabs of LSD. You can't make this shit up, and yet somebody did.
[For the curious](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ronald_Clark_O%27Bryan)
What a nice fella
Yeah but she's got eyes like a hawk, so who's laughing now?
i talked to her about that, and she claims they have videochatted. i also talked about the general patterns of human traffickers' techniques to get people to trust them she also has his address and his facebook with proof he lives in said house etc. i hate that i can't keep her from going
Shit dude, that’s scary.
Ask her to sit in on her next video chat. Tell her you can’t wait to meet him and want to know what he’s like over video. 
she offered that actually. i don't know, we might do that. idk what to talk about though, as i don't want to let him know we're suspicious, as it might make him more careful, if it really is the worst case scenario. i also talked to my brother and it seems we'll have another talk with her soon. 
If he doesn’t accept to talk to you over phone that should show your mom somethings up. Just talk casually as if you’re not suspicious and let the conversation flow but constantly be thinking to yourself about what it is he’s doing not saying. Is he explaining who he is or does it feel like something so smooth it’s rehearsed? Start asking questions in something he says you may know about like hobbies. Start by finding a small lie he’s saying and see if you can almost kinda dig more holes.

Edit: just a side note it’s ultimately her choice but make sure your voice on important things to her is clear. You are concerned for her but she should be concerned for her children’s well being, in the unlikeliness that something unfortunate does happen.
They use ducks for date rape?
Ducks *are* pretty screwy...
A duck penis is the shape of a corkscrew actually.  It doesn't look like a good time for anyone.
pretty sure that was the joke
Why not both?
I met my ex-boyfriend on MySpace. Our first date meeting face to face we hiked part of the Appalachian mountains with no cell service. I was  such a rebel. Lol
It’s you. Or at least that’s what he carefully laid evidence proves. 
*Surely* it's not both of you. I mean, what are the odds that *all three* of us are?
I bet she has 58 burial spots all picked out.
^^^maybe ^^^just ^^^little ^^^stabs.
Hot shingles in your area, 

Real girls ! Totally not roof tiles
Would you like some making fuck, bair-*zair*-kuuhh!
Send bobs and vegene
Send bob vegan
Go to dis website freecamfuck.net to axcess my privat picture.
You want fuk on me?
“Why have you done this?” 



                           Stabbed Man 
But I like stabs.
No strings attached?
This is my first comment to my next match...
Thank you.
Just give her your every credit card. And cash. Just to be sure. 
Summer rom-com material.
We need to update the pina colada song.
🎵If you like Piña Coladas🎵
And swiping right every day!
Then blow out your brains
So a modern Pina Colada song story?
Is this the 2018 version of the Pina Colada song?

Edit: dammit, someone beat me to the joke. Serves me right for not reading all the comments first.
It's the modern-day Pina Colada Song! 
Do you like piña coladas?  
If you like piña coladas…
*If you like Pina Coladas*
I tell myself that if i just spend 2 minutes looking for a better deal and save 10 bucks, i'm paying myself 300 bucks an hour.
Why is it exhausting? You can open some price comparison site and search for the thing. Choose the cheapest result from the list that's from a reputable seller and there you are?
It’s the effort of finding the comparison site, evaluating the reputable sellers, self-doubt about the product I’m actually buying, that sort of thing.

I switch to Macs not that long ago with this being a considerable factor, after two days of indecision regarding what laptop to get and from where.
I installed a chrome extension that pops up when I'm looking a product to highlight it's cheaper on another trustworthy site with a direct link. 

Half the time we are talking about a saving of a quid and I'm already paying for prime so end up using Amazon anyway. But seriously shopping around online is really easy and worth having something like a chrome extension installed for. 
can you provide the name of the extension?
There are a few worth using. I use these two

https://camelcamelcamel.com/camelizer gives you historic prices enabling you to pick up when prices are low or if a sale is not really a sale. Helpful when a price gets doubled for a short time then is suddenly half price. 

https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/fakespot-analyze-fake-ama/nakplnnackehceedgkgkokbgbmfghain?hl=en this enables you to spot fake reviews. 

Unfortunately I'm on my phone and can't remember the third one I use. I do recommend those two though as a good starting place to avoid being ripped off. 
Probably camelcamelcamel/cameliser or whatever it's called the icon is a camel
This is fun and vaguely relevant, except a comma is not the missing piece of punctuation in question. 
Man you’re picky. Here’s your [relevant xkcd](https://xkcd.com/37/)
>Wife

>He
Thanks. 
She is programmed to say she's not. 
Ooooof, even.
Maybe even *ooooooooooof*
I think my mom doesn't like me.  

"Yeah I was thinking about going 3-4 days for new year to some internet friends' place by 8 hours car sharing" 

>oh yeah cool see ya
Oh I can relate so much to this. Met friends from online through my 20s - watch out for paedos (I'm not their target audience for feck's sake). Had a girl from Russia and a Thai girl come over for xmas a fews back... must've been 35yo. Same deal. When I said again I'm not a target, me mum switched up to how did I know they were who they say they were, what if they're axe murderers?!!! I'd been chatting with and sharing pics with these girls for about a decade by this point!
Learn why pedophiles HATE him!
I don't want to admit it's celtic and wind up getting downvotes from both Rangers fans 
Tiocfaidh ár lá
/r/me_ira 

Oh ah up the ra
I'm actually a Hearts fan but absolutely in favour of a united Ireland (and a free Scotland).
You of all people
Number 5 is actually drinking nitroglycerin. You lose all of your weight at once.
If you think of the word, advertisements weren't a bad thing before the internet. It was a great way to learn about new products, businesses and sales. 

Now with the internet, you can easily find that information without ads, but to the generation before the internet, ads were a good thing. The closest thing to spam then was loud commercials and flyers left on you car windshield or front door. 
I can only assume they looked like legitimate content to her. You know, those creepy click bait ads that know what you had for dinner yesterday. 

I just disabled the ad blocker and accepted that I'd have to run a malware scan for her once a month.
Problem is now that you can have 15 “sources” that are all just the same story copypasta’ed on different sites. Because a lot of people won’t even read the first paragraph to realize it’s the same thing.
Rule 1 always applies. 

The more searched a topic, the more crafty/ greedy the trolls.
Right there with you. Like obviously I can google this for myself but you the expert friend already know everything about this so why not ask you first. 
Become her internet boyfriend. Collect the money and then return it to her every year in a check, like a tax return. But seriously I don’t have answers and that’s a shit situation to be in. Like MLM she has to find her own way out and all you can probably do is mitigate the damage and be upsetting. Directly telling her she’s being an idiot probably only makes her defenseive because humans need to beleive they are the protagonist in their own story so they have to defend their decisions and judgments often times. Basically it has to be their decision to change even if you lead them there with a bunch of bread crumbs
If you can have access to her Facebook account, block and unfriend this guy. Then create an account with the same name and profile picture, add it as your mom's friend.

Then log into this fake account and tell her it's over. 
Create some "drama" of your own that only she can fix.

Give her something to focus on
Sorry, I'm not sure what you mean by this?
Create a problem in your life that only she can fix. It gives her something to do to get her mind off your dad’s death. Old people always feel useless and bored and unwanted. You’ll fix all three of those at once. Then, while she’s busy solving that problem, take a barbed baseball bat to all her internet devices. That way she can’t send the scammer money anymore. 
She's not really old, she's in her early forties. I appreciate your advice, though.
That's old enough to feel useless, bored and unwanted

Actually mid thirties is enough for that as well
Well fuck...
High school does that too you know
What this person said!
Shut that shit down. No exceptions.
Make her watch some Dr. Phil episodes about this very issue. There are plenty. Then make your own list of red flags she should be seeing and point them out. 
She’ll hate you for this, but lock her computer or take away her internet until she understands what’s going on. She can thank you later.
I want it on a hoodie with a fake zipper 
"Conrad sent me this video but I can't get it to play"
Now I understand why they were called screen savers
I worked IT at the height of CRT monitors.  It takes years at a command prompt at the bottom or a window server screen to get burn-in.  A few utility PCs that might run a door, count air-wrench cycles (factory), shuffle transcription to a network server... some computer running in a closet somewhere might do that.  

Basically any computer that would have a user who might install a screen saver wouldnever get burn-in w/o a screen saver. 

 ¯\\_(ツ)_/¯

You'd see it on dumb terminals for mainframes and midrange.  Green-screens would do it fairly often.
[Huh.](https://media.tenor.com/images/6675b8149c7bb5f2cb503aaa924a5ab3/tenor.gif)
When channels started putting those logo watermarks on their programs is when at least one TV in every household had some logo burned into the corner of the screen. Might have been a children's channel or ESPN, but there was something burned into the bottom corner of some.
I have the YouTube app portrait viewing mode burned into my Galaxy S5 screen. Why is that? 

And to all of you haters, a preemptive yes, yes, still an old Galaxy S5. It still works flawlessly besides the light burn-in. I'm not paying $500+ for a phone. And I'm not financing a phone for $20+ a month. Just no.
I have the pre-updated Instagram from 2016 and my keyboard burned into my S7 screen. 
I think it's because of OLED. Happened on all of my Samsung devices that I had for a longer time. Anything in the top bar of the screen that doesn't change much like battery icon, wifi icon, time etc. is very lightly burned in.
Yeah, OLED screens do have the issue of burn-in again, and for similar reasons as with old CRT screens.
I don't know if this will work, but go to http://www.screenburnfixer.com/ and put one of their videos on your phone overnight. Make sure the screen stays on the entire time. Should fix the burn-in.
it doesn't really "fix" the burn in, but rather tries to cause similar burn-in in all the other parts of the screen. So in the end it looks like there is no burn-in anymore, but the whole screen is very slightly less bright at the same brightness setting
In July my GS5 is fully paid off, it's my first smart phone and I'll be running it it until it don't run no more.  But yeah, my status bar is burned into the screen :p
I have the "comment, options, back" buttons from my reddit mobile app burned into my Galaxy S8 screen.

I'm not proud of hiw much time I spend on this site.
Thanks for the TIL
Image retention (not the same as burn-in, but similar) is an issue with some LCD and OLED panels. And plasma TVs still suffer burn-in.
There's no point getting a screen saver *now*, we've already lost our screens!
just to be clear, you now need those for OLEDs too, in fact gaming on oled is not recommended because the ui is static and if you play a lot of the same game those UI elements can burn in
And then we realized how wasteful it was to display screensavers so the monitor simply powered off.

 A part of us all died that day.
Do OLED monitors exist? Because if they did I bet screensavers could still serve a purpose there, as unless the tech has improved, burn in has been a big issue with the stunningly beautiful OLED tech. 
If we get oled screens will we not need sceen savers again?

Well there is this still. https://electricsheep.org/

I only found it because for a long time I used my laptop to stream to my TV and didn't just want my boring desktop over my fireplace when nothing was playing. Kind of nifty for entertainment value alone I think. 
I like that I can put photos of my kids on th—

Ah. Welp, guess I'm one of those parents now.
Tell that to OLEDs
As a kid I thought they were just for saving energy (and I haven't used them since that so I may have still thought that until this thread...)
Used Linux mint for the past 4 years and never noticed, just looked now and yep, there they are! And I have only just finished looking through the ones beginning with A.
Aye, Skye is my favourite
Back in the day some were useful like Google toolbar, when even FF couldn't search from the address bar or even have the Google input field at the top
The internet historian on YouTube has a full series on the topic
Any tips on how to weaponise autism. This might be handy some day
Convince a group of people on the internet to raid 4chan, it’ll be the tumblr-4chan war all over again.
You can't do it intentionally. Trying is the quickest way to get it aimed squarely at you.
Got close? They found it, and switched the flag for a trump shirt and hat
I meant they didn't start using car horns until they had a pretty close approximation of the location using plane trails.
I mean, what else would you do with them?
Resend them to the person who sent them to me.
Tide Pods
I'm a hobbyist programmer (aiming to make it my career) but I've already found out that you'll never be done learning
Minion memes at that... r/WackyTicTacs
Just install the coupon printer in a VM and only give it access to the printer and the internet when it needs it.
You've got to remember that we're talking about people who'd download this in the first place - 'A VM? What's that? Some sort of virus?'
VM means Virus Machine son. Stop putting this fuckery on my computer. And no don't put Malwarebytes on it either it's obviously bad if it has Malware in the name
“Why do I want a wired shark in my computer? I want to save the environment, not kill more animals!”
This is why I put Linux on my mom's computers. Soooo much headache saved.
Because she can’t use it to fuck it up?
He probably just gave her no permissions and didnt tell her the password.
Oof
Pesky grandson!
Punk'd herself lol
That’s a pretty good prank. My MIL will love it!
But... what? What... what do they mean by gigabit?
What the fuck is a gigabit?
His son probably got him a new computer and mentioned how much RAM it had so he latched onto that one word. Like it's not a computer now, it's the new technology. The Gigabit. New set of rules on this one.
Please do, I'll wait here.
I work in tech support. This made me laugh and cringe at the same time. I feel your pain. 

I once had someone call me to ask me to create a shortcut to Internet Explorer on their desktop. I died a little inside.
To be fair, the new IE and edge are usable these days
Honestly that response sounds like a “the customer probably has no idea what he’s talking about so I’m so just asking to be sure” of course the customer service could be in the wrong but what do I know 
My personal favorite:

-Screenshot the desktop

-Rotate the image 180

-Set as wallpaper

-Hide all icons and task bar

-Physically turn the monitor upside down

Everyone loses their minds when the mouse doesn't work and when they figure out how to use it they can't click on any of the icons lol
I so read that quote in the voice of Ricky from Trailer Park Boys. 
I remember working a govt admin job in Vancouver, and the other admin asst was 58 and didn’t know how to use a computer and was reluctant to learn because “I’m retiring in 2 years so what’s the point?”

I literally had to explain what I meant when I said “drag and drop”. We were then discussing emails and I asked if she thought she might need the email later, if not, delete it, and if so, she could put it in a folder. So off she goes - at this point I was used to her just randomly wandering off so didn’t think anything of it - and she comes back with a paper folder from the stationary cupboard, with the printed email inside, asking “what now?”

🤦‍♂️
I'm actually impressed that she figured out how to print the email but doesn't know how to delete the email or make a folder for emails she wants saved
I can only assume because she had been asked to print an email before, by someone else, and been shown. She was completely incapable of taking the logic of one task and applying it to another scenario. Like even if the two things were exactly the same process, she would need to be shown each one separately, and be unable to see how they were fundamentally the same.
I guess it works though. I would have probably just told her to delete them after you have the email filed away somehow. Then explained that she doesn't have to print it, she just needs to find a way to be able to refer to the email and delete everything else
I'm not sure I would have fessed up at that point. You brave soul.
sticky keys is shift. ctrl is the way tho
I didn't spend much, so both terms apply
Oh but they do, it's Steam.
My Grandma has her TV locked to G rated only. Requires a pin to have anything else. She hates gory or violent TV shows and movies. Especially Bones and NCIS specifically. She also is against violent video games.

And yet? She loves watching football. A violent contact sport where people are trying to intentionally hurt other people. Never made any logical sense to me.
> She loves watching football. A violent contact sport where people are trying to intentionally hurt other people.

Wtf?
Dunning Krüger effect?
Yes this
Yeah, but then the next time there's a problem, you're expected to fix it again.
No, he killed her over it.
Ah ah! No, that was just a nice perk.
Your mileage may vary? 
Yeah lmao
Give her an award for "Most Murders Caused Through Laughter".
Either you're copying the same tumblr post I've read or your phrasing is remarkably similar lol
Rename some important file she has in her computer .Minecraft and put some random "shady" files in it. (Of course, backup the original content)
Problem solved! Computer can't run slow if it's dead!
That's what blows, I work in IT and when you do your job well and everything is in working order, people think you do nothing at all. 

Then again, there's been other times where people do something as simple as accidentally turn airplane mode on and flip out when they can't connect to wifi, then I walk over and hit the wifi button and "fix" their wifi within 5sec. and look like a hero.
The trick is to cause really complicated sounding problems yourself, but tell people it's someone else's fault. Like, turn off the wifi for a few minutes and tell everyone that it's a "Cascading bit-failure caused by a variety of chinese malware usually picked up when a user accesses their compromised facebook account over an insecure browser window."

Fortunately, you've been expecting something like this for a while now, so you have contingencies in place. Which is good, because it could have totally deleted all data on the server and your backups. But you think you can isolate the virus to the CPU cache, so everything should be back up and running in about an hour.

Then turn the wifi back on 40 minutes later and look like a hero.
That reminds me of that one greentext where that IT guy installed Google Ultron.
But Google said...
It's in the food business too. Heard one order brisket. I want it lean lean lean super lean! But put a lot of fat in it too. Also I am allergic to Gluten then asks for extra bread and extra mac and cheese despite them being told there is gluten in both of those.
And a diet coke please, i'm trying to eat healthy this week
If I can play devil’s advocate for a moment, there’s a vast difference in the level of complexity between a computer and a human body, and the number of years of school needed to be a professional in the respective fields is not a linear function of this complexity. Computers do exactly what we tell them to; bugs happen because developers tell them incorrectly, or because of a faulty circuit design, or of course because users with little understanding install shitty software that fucks up their PCs. But the point is, if something is going wrong with a computer, then someone who knows computers really well can pinpoint the exact cause given enough time. A lot of times the computer expert may even be “self-taught” through internet research and might not be a high school graduate yet. **Nobody** knows human bodies *that* well, even after graduating from med school and practicing medicine for decades. Also, replacing a computer is pretty easy; replacing a human is impossible. So when people go on Google and look up negative effects of vaccines and see hundreds of anecdotes (whether true, false, or overblown) of otherwise perfectly healthy people (as far as anyone knows) suddenly dying or having horrible side effects within days of getting a vaccine (I know, correlation does not imply causation. I know.), it’s actually very reasonable for them to be cautious about buying in on the program when their irreplaceable bodies are at stake. In comparison, if I suggest the only way to remove all the viruses from your computer is to wipe it and reinstall the operating system, the worst part of the news for you is the inconvenience of setting everything up again. It’s not like you’re suddenly dead. 

I’d like to use an example from my own experience to illustrate my point. I’ve had type 1 diabetes since 2003. I live with it 24/7. I know how my body reacts to insulin, food, exercise, etc. and it doesn’t quite match what I learned from the hospital when I was diagnosed. A few years ago I was telling a doctor whose daughter has diabetes about my experiences, and he had the gall to tell me that what I was saying wasn’t correct. Bull. Shit. Neither of us can explain why my sugar reacts the way it does, but I know damn well what the results are. Telling me that’s not how it works when my experience tells me otherwise makes me instantly lose respect for you. Tell me it sounds unusual or weird or that you’ve never heard of such a thing. That’s fine. But don’t tell me I’m lying about it because I know I’m not.

Another similar experience I had was when I switched from a pediatric endocrinologist to one who sees adults (I had had diabetes for several years by then). He made me talk to a “certified diabetes educator” who tried to tell me that it should take *days* for high blood sugar to manifest as an increased frequency in urination when I know from experience that it takes *hours*. Boom! I instantly lost all respect for her and tuned out for the rest of our session because she was obviously full of shit.

Regardless of who is *right* about this issue, discounting the concerns of anti-vaccine people because they’re not educated in a field as complex and nebulous as medicine is frankly pretty insulting and will get you nowhere in winning them over.
Of course its insulting. They deserve to be insulted. Their stupidity is an insult to humanity.
With any behaviour that you don't understand, look at the external factors. Everyone sees the world differently.
I'm in my teens, 16 to be exact. But I have a couple older friends I met a while back in school. The friend whose kid I am referring to, his father is 22.
true, the worst thing about it is that every time he says it it makes me hungry
This entire thread is deeply triggering to me 
You remove internet explorer, then rename firefox to IE and replace the icon and tell them it is the new update.
My dad is 71. Imagine how bad with tech he is.

Actually, he's mostly alright. Used to manage IT, and is a nerd of at least a few kinds. It's a fact for which I'm thankful.
My mum managed an IT department for 15 years, and appears to have learned absolutely nothing about IT while doing so...mind boggling 
I think everyone assumes that their parents are average or normal, and then resents them to at least some degree for whatever failings they do have. But, now that I'm a little bit older and hopefully wiser, I think I can say with confidence that my parents are alright.
Oh I bloody love my parents mate, they are fantastic. I
just dread the IT support phone calls.
Sounds like Jen off ‘The IT Crowd’
Almost exactly that.
I wrote out 2 pages worth of instructions on how to copy paste, it had pictures.
My grandpa was once seriously concerned that his employer could read his private mails because my uncle configured both his private and company mail to be fetched by his outlook
>At least he acknowledges or knows of its existence

Lol you just reminded me of how my dad would call anything that I used to play games a gameboy. Saw me playing my xbox 360 and he called it a gameboy lol. I would always correct him and he'd say it's the same thing ...
My mom still uses IE and uses Yahoo to search for stuff (I would say "google stuff", but.... ya know). What makes it worse is that she's pretty good with computers and understands why I recommend Chrome or Firefox. 
Remove all shortcuts to IE, place shortcut to FF, naming it "Internet". They won't notice the difference unless there are bookmarks or toolbars missing.
I'm gen z and I ironically call it mozzarella
If you don’t even know the name, WTH would you be using Mozilla? It’s a performance browser with unlimited plugin extensions and the ability to script your own plugins on the fly. Using it when you have no clue about computers is like having sex but only in the form of handjobs. 
Nothing annoys me more at work than people who can't friggin read. I don't work tech support or anything, but we send out letters with instructions for legal proceedings and I'm constantly getting calls from people who have the most ridiculous questions. Like, I could understand not knowing certain terminology or words but we get stuff like 'this letter says you deleted identity information from the attached investigation file, so that means you deleted my case?' Wtf man, no, we deleted identifying information from the file.

I literally had a call on Friday explaining that 12345-A is not the same as 12345-B. People are so dumb T-T
What was she talking about? A mouse? 
I'm eternally grateful to my father. When I wanted a computer he made me assemble one from parts. 90 Mhz processor 200 MB HD that was 4 inches thick an A 3.5" floppy drive and a B 5.25" floppy drive don't remember ram and linux to boot. This was around 1994 so I was maybe 11. Lead me to my career in the long run. 
My dad's an IT manager. He's still my second port of call, if Google can't find a solution to something. The man's a walking manual.
Same man, my parents are both software developers :D
I'm jealous of you
Same, they know not to do things too stupid, but I've given up on convincing them to give up on ie.



My grandma on the other hand...


She once spent 2+ hours on the phone because an ad said her Windows was broken (she had it for only a week)
That moment when your parent make you go from facepalming to facerubbing, because you just facepalmed so hard you need to rub away the sting.
"Oh I can? But I don't know my password"  
"Then just reset it". 
"It won't let me". 
"What do you mean it won't let you?"

My dads probably on his twentieth email because when he forgets the password he creates a new email...which defeats the entire purpose of having an email. He doesn't get that it's like a key or a phone number. He has a separate facebook on his phone and laptop. 
Omg I have to go through this with my mum all the time. Never knows her passwords for anything. 

Last time I was there I reset all her passwords, wrote them down for her, and stored them on my phone for the next time she claims that she doesn't know.

She also got a new phone like a year ago but still keeps her old phone charged up because her internet banking app is on there. 

I asked her why she doesn't just get the bank app on her new phone? She said that she doesn't know any of the password or login details. 

I asked her why she doesn't just reset the password? She said she couldn't, that it involved phoning the bank, and that they wouldn't let her reset it as she couldn't remember any of her information.

I offered to sort it out for her but she wouldn't let me, so I guess she's stuck using 2 phones forever now. Dunno what she plans to do after the old one finally gives up and dies. 
What did she mean 
She didn’t realize email is web based. Thought it just lived in her own ancient desktop. So she thought she could only check email at her own computer and nowhere else.
Oh my! Lol what an adorable grandma
I assume that computer hasn't got many security updates from the last seven years, might want to let her know that it's not just slow but probably also compromised lol
> doesn't have enough ram to run word

Damn, and I thought my $150 computer from 2012 was shit.
I was exaggerating here, you are absolutely right. But with the amount of 'necessarry' startup crap (think Skype) she wants in addition to the fact that she doesn't update anything since 'it works' has made this machine brutally slow. Also, I just checked her machine; she is running a 2009 macbook pro. So its not even 2011. 2gb RAM Core2Duo
How can a machine from 2011 not have enough RAM to run Word?  It only takes like, 200MB...
Our nursing homes will probably be equipped with the best mid-21st century tech and we'll think it's great even if it's outdated.
But you won’t understand it...so that excitement must be for everyone else who gets to experience it, because we will be less than blissfully unaware.
Any technology in enough advance of your own seems like magic, i want magic.
most probable would be world wide adoption of Augmented/mixed reality glasses, which in turn does away the need for any screens.  Where the younger kids use it 24/7 and we wont because "it strains are eyes" or "we dont need that screens are better" or whatever makes us feel better for not adopting it.   Then 10+ years pass and the tech has advanced to the point if makes us look stupid when we try and use it. 
I've wanted eyescreens like in the Uglies series since middle school, now I'm scared that if my dream becomes reality I'll be too stupid to live it.
I don't think that common technology will ever be a problem for post millenials until we become too old to learn because we've spent so much time learning the skills required to learn digital technology.
>excited to work out

You're going to be nothing like today's inept technophobes, haha
Non-Mobile link: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ronald_Clark_O%27Bryan
***
^HelperBot ^v1.1 ^/r/HelperBot_ ^I ^am ^a ^bot. ^Please ^message ^/u/swim1929 ^with ^any ^feedback ^and/or ^hate. ^Counter: ^173245
Good bot
Good bot
Thank you
We're not that good of a team. Too risky.
A couple that kills together, stays together. 
>A couple that ~~kills~~ slays together, stays together. 

FTFY 
Why does my girlfriend have a dick? 
^^^^2inch
Almost exclusively no stabs. 
Just little, breaky-breaky? 
I thought you meant lonely seniors covered on the shingles virus.
Sean Connery?
If you've had chicken pox, the shingles virus is already inside you
Did he say “making fuck?”
Nailed the spelling 🤘🏼
15 bucks little man. Put that shit in my hand.
bitch lasagna
Send bob vila
No. You git amy schumer. Git.
This inspired me to google the lyrics. Too much work. 
I had just hit my side piece, because my bae was out of town
I tell myself to get out of bed and do something but im paying myself $0 an hour so fuck this guy 
I like you
I mean, I literally ran off with friends I met online to move in with them suddenly one day and my mom and dad's reactions were 

>dont die have fun

meanwhile my grandparents were all

>hes going to get murdered
"They were just waiting for you to grow up so you'd let your guard down, and when you least expect it..."
They're just pulling the long con.  The really really long con.
So many cleaner ways to kill people, and the first thought was an ax.
Ikr. I was at a pet sitting appointment to a new block of flats and was let in at the door whilst on the phone to my mum, signal started going and all I heard was her frantically yelling. She thought this guy had started strangling me. She suffers from anxiety bless her but oh my god the leaps her brain goes to immediately... they are so bizarre!
They sound like good people.
Can't you just set them up with a VPN, then they can stream it? We've tried that for the Six Nations before. 
I wont downvote you. Even if i am a hun.
👍🏻 I'm not into football, just can't resist a joke
And physical mailbox spam. Still a fucking thing.
The real ULPT is always in the comments. Scam your own parents to be the one who gets the money. 
Fake incest is best incest?
I mean, its not wrong per se
I want to get that tattooed just above my ass crack
After Dark yo that shit was dank
Now I feel old.
Thats a new one for mee too
Just wait till you learn what the save icon represents.
A rigid disk, right?
Sane with lifesavers.
Holy shit, me too, after all this years... never asked myself what saving was done...
And now people say "screen saver" because they know it has some technical meaning but actually mean the lock screen background.

People are dumb.
I don't know what crt you had but i burned mine in bad with a desktop background just over the course of maybe a week. It was a very neon purple background and within a week everything on that monitor always had a purple tont.
I don't think this is correct for all CRT screens though.
I had a CRT TV and it still to this day has a burned image of final fantasy 7. I left it on for 2 weeks straight before i had a memory card so as not to lose my progress whilst abroad
That would also depend on the quality of your crt. A professional bvm would last much longer.
We had a dummy green screen terminal. It had burning from the order entry page. Keep in mind this terminal was used alot, I guess the collective time spent on order entry burned it in.
Yeah, this is typical.  I had an accounting terminal I had to change because the entry page was burned in, and any other operation was almost impossible.  That meant disconnecting it from Twinax which had probably never touched in 20 years.  This led to problems down the Twinax line and with a Token Ring translator.  Then the Token Ring hub went down, and there was no replacement.

And that is how my former employer decided to install 10/100 Ethernet over the entire company
Token ring?  How long ago was this?
not as long ago as it should have been...
Truth.
It was decades ago.
We've got lots of old CRT monitors in our factory machines that have ridiculous burn in
Old video game consoles would get it pretty bad, it was not uncommon to see the Pac Man maze burned in.
I would if I could actual buy one.
Right? Screensavers could have a nice comeback if OLED screens on PCs become more common
Do you have a link to that? I can't seem to find it
WTF was that place
All I know is that I never want to go there again
Oh Karen
How I missed you
Excuse me, stewardess, I speak User.

They probably mean their web browser. Let's say they have Cox, and even though they think that "Google is their Internet" or something they know Cox is somehow involved. Cox has been hyping their G1GABLAST brand Gigabit Internet service like crazy.

So follow the crazy train.

"Google is my Internet"

"I pay Cox for my Google"

"Cox has Gigabit Internet"

"I pay Cox for my Gigabit"

"Google is my Gigabit"

*clickety click*

Huh, no Google.

MY GIGABIT IS BROKEN!

Of course, User is a very imprecise language, so it could be their printer won't print for all I know. But more than likely it's a browser issue.
It means whatever broke is in a billion pieces 
It's a billion bits. Equivalent to 125 megabytes.
Steam is a rootkit because it's saved in the wiring of our brains. I've had my steam account for 15 years and there hasn't been a day that it wasn't installed. 
They usually didn't like it when I wiped the hard drive and started fresh. I only got asked once by each person lol.
This was the problem I had. My family was at least reasonable enough to not blame me if things went wrong, but my vacations to visit family turned into fixing everyone's computers.

Until I got angry about that happening, then I only fixed a computer when I offered to do so (which I did, it's family -- but the insistence stopped).

It may have helped that I would explain what was wrong every time before doing the repair, even if they didn't quite know what I was talking about.
I used to get this a lot until my brother and I went halfsies on a used Mac for my mom.  She rarely asks for help anymore and when she does, "Sorry ma, I don't know anything about Macs."
our drivers at my work use tablet's for navigation. I do this EVERYDAY. They're blown away every time I do it so fast. How the hell they keep turning it on honestly scares me, they're just tapping the hell out of those tablets, I want to get a therapist and ask the tablets where they touched them.

also we have this one driver EVERYDAY, "THIS TABLET ISN'T CHARING!" No matter which one she grabs, it has charging issues. None of them actually do. I asked her to show me how she charges Tablets in her car once. She wraps it around the tablets, the cord... She thinks as long as it makes contact with the Tablet it should charge. I was so dumbfounded. I showed her how to actually charge it and she's like "yeah its making touch, less messy, but what's the difference?" I wanted to slap her. I just said "oh you're right there's not any difference, my mistake." She's still having charging issues to this day :/
All technicians are infrastructure.  I'm a biomed tech, fix medical equipment in a hospital, if everything is kept in working order upper management decides we don't need our budget and cut our resources, if tons of stuff starts breaking because it's 20 years old and they refuse to upgrade then we are wasting our buget and they not only cut it further but then run an assessment to see if they would save money by farming is out to 3d party.

We work pretty closely with IT and Facility Services, it's the same all round :-/
I work in education(school district) but you're right, its the same thing all around, you hit the nail on the head there. They'll keep cutting our budget, but then they'll complain that their computer is old and sluggish. Well maybe if we had a decent budget we'd be able to upgrade your machine every couple years. Sometimes though you just can't satisfy people, our principal wanted a faster laptop because his was too slow, so I hooked him up with an i7, SSD, and 16GB ram. Still not good enough for him and all he does is probably e-mails and maybe MS Office. Then I found out he never closed anything when I had to do maintenance on it and he had like 20 active tabs open in chrome and a bunch of other things, I tried explaining the concept of closing out of things when you're done and explained in a non-techy way how memory works, but he didn't take my advice and blames me for getting him a crap laptop. So now when staff takes their PC's to me to speed up I just leave it in my office for a few hours and give it back and tell them I downloaded more ram and upgraded the processing unit. Placebo effect really works haha
>I just leave it in my office for a few hours and give it back and tell them I downloaded more ram and upgraded the processing

I just did a spit take... of OJ... on my fluffy white dog... morning made!
Damn. That's terrible.
Also the ones where all you do is show up at their office and they’re like “Oh. It’s working now. I swear it wasn’t working until you got here.”
Unrelated but you just reminded me how i accidentally turned on airplane mode on my laptop when i was 12 and didnt know why wifi wouldnt connect for a week
The IT guys where I used to work had written a bunch of scripts for different things. So for literally every problem I ever asked them about they just did this.
Sometimes I walk over and see the issue on-screen before they even ask. If it takes less than an actual minute I just stare at them, and eye the screen. Sometimes they get the hint.
I wonder if their battery is getting low and the prompt for battery saving mode comes on. That turns off your wifi and puts it in airplane mode. 
Yep, no matter what you do, everybody thinks you're just screwing around playing Fortnite in your office all day.
I wonder if their battery is getting low and the prompt for battery saving mode comes on. That turns off your wifi and puts it in airplane mode. 
I wonder if their battery is getting low and the prompt for battery saving mode comes on. That turns off your wifi and puts it in airplane mode. 
I wonder if their battery is getting low and the prompt for battery saving mode comes on. That turns off your wifi and puts it in airplane mode. 
I wonder if their battery is getting low and the prompt for battery saving mode comes on. That turns off your wifi and puts it in airplane mode. 
But Jenny McCarthy said...
My best friend's dad is a clinical psychologist at a top hospital in the U.S.  he says that the majority of his job is explaining to people why they don't need the happy pills advertised on TV.
There's been a couple of times where my Google fu was right and my doctor was wrong.
You probably used good sources! Like a sane person. I think he means people who "research" but can't tell those conspiracy circlejerks from reputable answers haha. They're surprisingly common :/


Conspiracy culture is so depressing.. Now to a wholesome subreddit to regain hope in humanity.
I had a relative post a long copy-pasta about a girl who was perfectly healthy until she had her cervical cancer vaccine, then she slowly developed every medical problem in the universe before finally dying. I tried arguing with her for a while, but had to stop because I was obviously driving her further into stubbornness. Her closer friends and doctor posting as well may have made more difference.
Anecdotes > Evidence /s
And an obviously fake anecdote at that. I wanted to point out how ridiculous it would be for someone to have *that* many totally different problems from a single vaccine, but for her that would have just highlighted how many problems it caused in that story.
I saw the internet go from a hobbyist's plaything and a bunch of official utility stuff to people using it for things like chat, shareware, command line text games, aaaalll the way to what it is today. My pc had less processing power and storage than what it takes reddit to render my comment. Internet so slow you'd normally start stuff and then go have a full meal with your family. Now my computer runs virtual reality headsets, high end games, renders and code, and starts up in less than 6 seconds. It's really wild

We watched stuff like [this](https://youtu.be/UlJku_CSyNgn) in school occasionally and I was fascinated. It lead to my career as a computer scientist. 
Oh, you sweet summer child. We got the internet when I was 13, in 2002. It was mostly cat gifs and racist bink clips in those days. I remember seeing a thread that wad frozen in time on 9/11. 
Aside from ease of access, the internet really isn’t that different today than it was 10-15 years ago when it comes to seeing really screwed up stuff.

I was born in 1990, and started using the internet a little bit around 98-99. Back then it was different for sure. It was extremely slow, you had to log in each time, etc. there weren’t videos everywhere like there are today.

By 2004 though we had things like Limewire, where you could download all kinds of crazy videos. Obviously not as fast as streaming today, but the content was all there, completely unfiltered. Also by this time the computer was constantly connected to the internet, so one click and you’re in it. Back then, you could turn google’s safe search completely off, and find anything. It wasn’t watered down and super market-driven like it is today.

I didn’t fully grow up with the internet, but anyone who is about 22 and under certainly did, and anyone under 30 definitely had easy access in their teens.
i’m 16 as well, and i also feel like i grew up with the perfect amount of “exposure”, but i would mostly credit that to my parents for not being too controlling when it comes to the internet and letting me have a lot of privacy.
then you call adobe pizzashop and make sure you get enough for everyone.
I think its getting worse... my gran thinks she would have to change her email address if she switched network provider
We need an elderly IT cringe stories subreddit.
/r/talesfromtechsupport
r/vintagebattlestations
Headon: apply directly to the fore head
Instructions unclear: apply to 4 heads
Ladyboi special. Usually you pay more for that
It's a feature, not a bug
r/traa irl
Even better!
is for loving stabs
Get off Grindr
Yours too?
It's a 2 for 1 deal
Why does my girlfriend have *my* dick
*hits blunt*
At least 20% of Thai girls on tinder have man parts 
That seems low
> At least 20% of Thai girls on tinder have man parts 

Don't you find it strange that you refer to them as "girls" yet also say they have "man parts" ?

Seems a bit of an oxymoron.
But it’s not. A person who identifies as female is politely refered to as such, regardless of their genetalia.
^^^^^^isenough
No, no -- too beaucoup! 
So wrong


Would you like to suck my cock, bair-zair-kuuhh!
G'on, git!
On the other hand, if anyone can get sarah silverman on the phone....
'amy schumer' is not a git command. Use 'git --help' for a list of commands.
Git --help
git checkout Amy_Schumer
So who was right, your parents or grandparents?
Sounds like my mother
Playing the long game, I see. Why murder someone if you can wait until they die of natural causes? 
News: "Local man dies at the astounding age of 100, 1 day after celebrating his 100th birthday"

"Right on time you pig-stealing bastard"
username checks out
Flying toasters?
I had one that would pretend to be a bsod from Microsoft toolkit (? I can't remember the name anymore, but it was a guy who worked on Windows i think)  i forgot to tell my dad i changed the screensaver for my account and he freaked out when he walked up to our computer the first couple times
I'm 33 but I remember using monochrome monitors that had s*** burn in the screen already and you could kind of anticipate what was coming before the program loaded
Tont
You left the console and tv on???? Why not turn the tv off?
Why wouldn't you leave the console on and turn the TV/monitor off?
Dude, I didn't have a memory card for my PSX when I first got it either. FFVII was my first PSX game so I had to keep the game on for a few days before I was able to convince my mother that I did indeed need one in order to save. I did turn my TV off, though. 
My roommates did this with my PS2 and completely screwed the spinny disc in it. The TV was perfectly fine.

They didn’t even have the excuse of not having a memory card. 
Phantasy star online for game cube, my friend did it. His dad was pissed.
CRT with a GameCube?  Kid did his dad a favor.
https://youtu.be/O_ldHq3NzC0

Edit, here's the full. Playlist HWNDU: https://www.youtube.com/playlist?list=PLHTeAiqTTlUgv17EkpWRX9vHIelEvOJVm
Wouldn't that be a gigabyte?

Edi: okay, TIL
It's actually saved in the humidity of the air, hence the name *Steam*
You dont ask before doing something like that?
Once it's reached the "by any means necessary" stage, I save pictures and important documents. The rest gets the wipe.
>Repair the PC by any mean necessary.

Aka

Whatever takes the least amount of time. Wich is normally a complete reset.
This.
That.
Holy fuck... I'm sorry your mental wellbeing was so molested by that woman. Did you try to explain conductivity to her?
“I want to get a therapist and ask the tablets where they touched them” this is pure gold.
...omg... the "charging" lady... just, how...?
I hope you'll forgive me if I'm having trouble believing you. Jesus Christ. As long as it makes contact? Damn, lady. Damn.
This sort of thing was really bad where I work for a while and we were getting blamed because productivity was not where it was expected to be.  The users were just blaming their troubles on "IT issues". Now we have a department policy where we collect and report all "user training issues" so we can in turn expose what the true cause of the slow down is.  Training has improved dramatically.
I think that's something you should tell their boss. Like look, this driver doesn't know that cables need to be plugged in. Get them some help!
> She thinks as long as it makes contact with the Tablet it should charge.

I don't know if I would have the words to adequately explain the concept to her. This is well beyond the level of an expert who knows something too well to explain it to a novice. Somehow, this lady is the only novice in a world of experts when it comes to charging tablets.
You sir need gold for the therapist bit, alas I am a poor man. But “making touch” Jesus that’s next level stupid 
Violence is never the answer, but sometimes it is very tempting.
I wonder if she thinks that the same rule applies to penises.
I... what??

When she goes home does she wrap the toaster cord around the kitchen island and then get mad when it doesn't work?

What does she do at the gas station? Oh god...
LMAO I've seen a lot of user error in my day, but that lady trying to charge her tablet just takes the cake. That reminds me of that April Fools' joke a few years back where there was a fake ad saying you could charge your iphone by putting it in the microwave, you know people like her fall for that crap. How they even get dressed in the morning is astounding, not understanding tech or how to use it is understandable, you have to start somewhere, but sheesh, some people just lack common sense altogether
The tapping wildly thing is just insane to me. I was working with some 2nd-4th graders for a few months this year and they had tablets to use at school. All the time, just slapping the hell out of it without paying attention to the words on the screen or what the bottom they're smashing says! It's insane because they use tablets all day every day, and yet they haven't picked up on the basic idea of pushing a button or reading what it's asking them to do. I know they're kids of course, but I mean I feel like I learned pretty quickly how to use a computer at that age. 

I also didn't realize how lucky I was that they know how to put in the charger lol. 
I've watched my sister use the tablet my mom lets her use everyday, it's "kid safe" but does have access to kids YouTube. It's insane how quickly she loses interest. 3-10 seconds per video and then ontop more taping. I think it's really unhealthy to let kid's have access to something like that
wat
Use a car and gas analogy. You can't fill up a car by spraying it with gas. You need to put it in properly. Same with a tablet.

Hopefully that works ~~but it probably won't~~.
Worked for a broadband company a few years back had someone call up as their router wasn't working. It's self set up arrives in the post so you're always going to get some silly calls but this one took the biscuit. Router was delivered via courier and she put it in the cupboard without removing the packaging. 
Her- "But it's wireless" 
me - "yes the WiFi connection is wireless to compatible devices but the router needs to be connected to a power source and phone line"
Her - "get me your manager this is not what I'm paying for"
“Just because the toaster is somewhere in your house doesn’t mean that it works!”
My MIL somehow managed to turn off 'mobile data' on her phone, and was complaining that WeChat, etc., weren't working. I couldn't figure it out either so I popped into the store. It took the guy there several minutes to work out mobile data had been turned off, and to turn it back on he had to drill down through something like 4-5 sub-menus. It was not something you could turn off by pulling down and tapping a setting. How the fuck the MIL was able to turn it off I don't know.  
  
Unless...maybe she went over her data cap watching all the videos all her friends send her via WeChat and got a prompt to turn it off? Possible.
yeah that sounds very likely, unfortunately for me the tablets they use the data icon is in the first pull down menu :/
That’s really funny, but I think it’s easy to forget that many in tech have internalized certain “norms” about how to approach and interact with technology. 
Some people pick it up better than others. Was she someone who was otherwise unexposed to it growing up, maybe more on the creative side?
I would have tried explaining it to her. *sometimes* something sticks. 

I would’ve still been laughing later however. 
This is fucking every job. I spent 5 minutes explaining to someone that the only difference between a screw with a Philips top and one with a hex wrench head was the tool you used to screw it.

"bUt MaNuFaCtUrEr sAiD!"

No, the manufacturer just used hex wrenches cause they're cheap and easy to send with the furniture. 
Part of my job is UX design, and it's truly surprising how much of stuff like this just comes down to a badly designed / thought out layout of a UI.
Hi! You might remember my rubber boobs from 90's Playboy! Don't vaccinate your kids! Good night folks!


I just don't get it.
From a British perspective the aspect of American Healthcare that is brought up most over here is the lack of universal, free at point of entry healthcare, and most of us find that utterly baffling.

Equally baffling to me, though not brought up nearly as much, is the fact you advertise powerful medications that require a prescription directly to patients over the fucking television.  Honestly, I find that absoloutely fucking insane.
>What is internet?

That’s an interesting clip, I can’t believe that’s only 23 years ago
Yeah, but adobe pizzashop is 5 times more expensive and has lots of weird ingredients. So order extra!
Just don’t call Pizza by Adobe. It’s like eating a hot circle of garbage.
Good reference, take my upvote
I'm disappointed at the lack of content, but I understand how difficult it is to have pictures of old systems from before digital cameras when you had to get film developed. 
DickLadyCock. For when you want to feel pride and accomplishment for all your Grindring.
No, they are super cheap. Boom boom $15. Normally girls $35+
Your accurate prices scare me...

The fact that I KNOW your prices are accurate also scares me...

I didn’t ask for this knowledge reddit!
As long as there is cobra whiskey. 
Yep. Dead already
She say, 'No boom boom with soul bruda'
Yes.
Yup! I used to have mine set to "bad dog." Basically an animated dog would pop up on your desktop and start digging holes everywhere.
I used to have one with a guy stranded on a desert island. Every day he would do something else (go fishing, find a treasure chest) and then after like two weeks he escaped the island and the screen saver would reset.

Edit: [Found it](https://youtu.be/PqXIKeTVcyA).
I have flying toasters on my hackintosh.  Ahh the nostalgia 

*edited cuz words 
Lightning, "max forky"
LOL, I remember playing some sort of Flash game where you'd navigate that toaster thru a building.
I grew up on that thing.
Say What?
Poor guy facepalmed himself to death. RIP
Well, I did the same thing on an old tv when gta lll came out for ps2. 

Except I turned the tv off when not playing.
Because you'd have a burn in?
Not if the crt was off. His post made it sound like the burn in was because he left both on for two weeks.
Yes, i left both on for two weeks. As a 7 year old child my primary concern was not to lose my progress. Turning off the TV could have led to a loss of progress and in my 7 year old logic, this was just not worth the risk.
We're not asking you dude, we're asking 7 year old you.
No video on the cabin though. 
Not the internet historian, but this one is about the cabin. 

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fqWHnfkPD0I
Saved comment, thankye
A byte is defined as 8 bits, so 1 gigabit == 1/8 gigabytes == 125 megabytes. 

It gets a bit confusing because GB means gigabytes, Gb means gigabits, and then the old standard GiB means gibibyte, which is 1024 mebibytes...
No. 1/8 of a gigabyte. Or 125/1000 of a gigabyte. 
No a gigabyte is 1000 megabytes or 8000 megabits
Where would you start with a person who wraps a chord around the tablet to charge it? Honest question. I have degree in engineering and I can't think of an answer. Maybe something like "charging is like making babies - if you don't put it in, you can't make it." 
I'm curious if she has like a wireless charger or something at home that led her to that conclusion
I've been asking my boss for something like this
Don’t even need to bring that first part up. Like ok I understand there might be a tiny chance it might not work but would you really want to take that chance? Apparently a lot of people do. And soon we will have a generation of anti-vaxxers that because they didn’t come into contact with such and such when they were children or growing up that they’ll then not vax their kids and if it ever does somehow get an epidemic/pandemic(not sure which would be the right word) then a lot of Americans and a fair few British will die to something entirely preventable with a little jab as a child. 
Try watching an NFL game over here. Pizza ads, Budweiser ads and then ads for ED pills.
wow. I'd never thought about it, but I don't think I've ever seen a prescription medication advertised anywhere. I imagine that's just going to encourage people to look at symptoms a particular medication solves, and lie to the doctor to try to get them to prescribe it?
Wait, do other countries not have ads for prescription medication?
No, the only medications you'll see advertised in the UK are over the counter ones. None of this "ask your doctor if x right for you". We leave it to our medical professionals to decide what to prescribe without encouraging patients to hassle them over something they saw on TV. Can't speak for other countries, but I'm under the impression that it's strictly an American thing 
Not gonna lie, that blows my mind. In America you can't go 10 minutes without seeing an ad for some weird medicine with side effects that take up half the commercial.
American here, those ads are absolutely ridiculous. The best part is how only half the ad is actually advertising the product. The rest of it is just a narrator listing all the ways the medicine could fuck you up, while saccharine footage of puppies or kids or whatever distracts consumers from the horrible side effects.

Do these ads even make sales? Who would just buy drugs based on TV ads? Who makes these drugs? Do they even work at all?
To shreds, you say?
There was a Simpson's one where Homer would walk around eating donuts. I think there was this other trippy one where something would walk around the screen eating desktop icons.
Holy shit I grew up with this!  Thanks for the reminder.  Now if you'll excuse me, I need to go google something.
It's even more confusing though, because GB and GiB are used interchangeably depending on the context 
I still stubbornly refuse to admit that GB has changed from 1024^3 bytes to 10^9 bytes, and the former is now called GiB. 
Ask her, "When you put fuel in your car, do you put the nozzle IN the gas slot, or do you just wrap it around the car?"
Personally id use a water analogy i think. Call the tablet a water balloon and ask if you can fill a water ballon by spraying it with water from 3 feet away. 
Simple. I'd wager that most any adult has plugged in something to a wall outlet. Be it a toaster, hair dryer, etc. Tell them that the charger is like your cable and the tablet is like the wall outlet, it won't work if the cable is near, it has to be plugged in. 

-Engineer who deals with illiterate operators 
Yeah, but earl's been puttin it in my butt every day at lunch, and i aint pooped a baby out yet.
Really? Mine came out after the their try.
she kind of has some merit trying to induce an EM field with a coil 
"If you wrap the cord around the tablet the energy particles leak out into the air. You have to put it in the slot so that the juice goes into the tablet without spilling."
That is.. the perfect explanation. Plus you could dickslap her face (if you're a guy) and explain how she isn't pregnant from it. 
“Ever since we got Aunt Betty that Apple Watch..... she just takes one look at those cables and starts thinking of trimming ‘er tablet like a Christmas tree”
Natural Selection is a bitch.
And for some people that natural selection is good enough to survive without any problems. But we can improve our lot by helping natural selection by getting a jab. 
Non-vacinated children should have their own schools so they can't hide in the herd immunity. You really can't reason with parents until they see some children dying.
And then they try to sue you for not forcing them to vaccinate their kids

(A futile lawsuit but yeah)
They where probably nice people, only shredded a hand or two
Or “when you want to drive, do you get in the car or just climb on the roof, spread out and hope for the best?”
"my husband puts gas in my car." 
This is perfect.
I love this analogy, and now I'm imagining someone wrap the fuel hose around their car. Sorry for the useless comment
Facepalm.   It seems so obvious now! Thank you!
Jesus no then she’d try to put water in it 
Or by wrapping the hose around a limp and empty balloon 
